Side Stories 1 to 26.

The morning scenery at the Langess estate was peaceful.

Lush greenery, a bright sky, and the distant sound of birdsong. The mansion, situated deep within private property, far from the city center of Buerno, was a place detached from the chaos of the world. If one didn’t make a habit of reading the regularly delivered newspapers, it was easy to remain unaware of the outside world.

Philip, who woke earlier than anyone else in the mansion, began his day by bringing the newspapers to Daemon’s study.

During this routine, he naturally skimmed the front-page articles. Usually, these articles featured topics of high public interest, and today, Daemon’s name was prominently displayed on the front page.

To be exact, it was about the fireworks that Daaemon had set off at the lakeside. The article covered just how expensive those fireworks were, why he had gone through the trouble of securing government approval to take over the entire lakeside, and, most importantly, who all this effort was for.

This wasn’t the first time. Ever since Liv confirmed Corida’s enrollment and returned to the Langess mansion, Daaemon had begun openly showering her with extravagant gifts and events for all of Buerno to witness.

Thanks to this, instead of focusing on the inaccessible Marquis Dietrion, people’s interest shifted to Liv, the recipient of his intense affections.

Some had rashly judged Liv and tried to wield their status against her, only to be humiliated and retreat. After a few such incidents, people realized that, like Marquis Dietrion, Liv was not one to be trifled with.

However, this didnSide Stories 1 to 26.

The morning scenery at the Langess estate was peaceful.

Lush greenery, a bright sky, and the distant sound of birdsong. The mansion, situated deep within private property, far from the city center of Buerno, was a place detached from the chaos of the world. If one didn’t make a habit of reading the regularly delivered newspapers, it was easy to remain unaware of the outside world.

Philip, who woke earlier than anyone else in the mansion, began his day by bringing the newspapers to Daemon’s study.

During this routine, he naturally skimmed the front-page articles. Usually, these articles featured topics of high public interest, and today, Daemon’s name was prominently displayed on the front page.

To be exact, it was about the fireworks that Daaemon had set off at the lakeside. The article covered just how expensive those fireworks were, why he had gone through the trouble of securing government approval to take over the entire lakeside, and, most importantly, who all this effort was for.

This wasn’t the first time. Ever since Liv confirmed Corida’s enrollment and returned to the Langess mansion, Daaemon had begun openly showering her with extravagant gifts and events for all of Buerno to witness.

Thanks to this, instead of focusing on the inaccessible Marquis Dietrion, people’s interest shifted to Liv, the recipient of his intense affections.

Some had rashly judged Liv and tried to wield their status against her, only to be humiliated and retreat. After a few such incidents, people realized that, like Marquis Dietrion, Liv was not one to be trifled with.

However, this didn’t lessen the public’s fascination. The volume of letters arriving at the Langess mansion also subtly increased.

“Oh.”

While sorting through the letters that had arrived with the newspaper, Philip found a neatly sealed one and let out a quiet exclamation. The letter was addressed to Liv.

Philip’s expression turned subtly complex upon checking the sender. He could already imagine how Daaemon’s face would twist upon seeing it. Of course, Liv would be delighted to receive it.

What followed was obvious. Daaemon would reluctantly suppress his emotions upon seeing Liv’s joy, likely resorting to smoking a cigar and snapping at those around him.

Philip walked calmly, deciding that it would be wise to discreetly warn the staff not to upset their master.

 



 

Half-asleep, Daaemon became aware of the emptiness beside him.

A sudden, breath-stealing shock gripped his chest. Daemon, now wide awake, hastily sat up. At the same time, bright light poured into the once-dark bedroom. He frowned, turning his gaze.

He saw her pulling the thick curtains all the way open, letting the sunlight flood in. She had yet to notice that Daaemon was awake. Her long, flowing hair cascaded naturally behind her.

Through the fluttering silk chemise she wore, her skin was faintly visible. The sunlight from outside highlighted the curves of her body even more.

Daemon, his initial shock quickly fading, quietly watched her back. Liv seemed intent on adjusting all the curtains in the room without turning around.

“Leave that to a maid.”

His voice, lower and lazier than usual from just waking up, echoed through the once-quiet room. Liv turned at the sound of his voice. Bathed in sunlight, her figure seemed to glisten.

“You don’t like the staff coming in and out of here.”

It was true. Since long ago, aside from a skilled servant cautiously entering each morning to open the curtains, there hadn’t been much fuss in his bedroom. For Daemon, who was far from having restful sleep, the bedroom was a highly sensitive space.

Moreover, since Liv had moved into the Langess mansion, access to the bedroom had become even more restricted. The servant who used to enter each morning to wake Daaemon had stopped long ago, and now the staff simply waited for him to wake on his own.

Fortunately, Liv maintained a regular schedule, which meant the staff didn’t have to wait endlessly to serve breakfast. Daaemon always followed Liv’s waking time, and the staff were grateful for her consistency. Liv seemed to understand this as well.

However, the current situation wasn’t ideal.

“Better this than waking up to find you gone.”

Liv’s eyes widened at his reply, then her brows furrowed slightly. Her lips pressed together, the corners turned down.

She was apologizing now. She knew how much comfort Daaemon derived from her presence, especially given his frequent nightmares. She also knew that her past escape attempt had left him with a deep-seated anxiety.

“Did I scare you?” Liv asked, her voice tinged with worry, as Daaemon ran a hand through his disheveled hair.

“Yes.”

Over time, Daaemon had grown adept at expressing vulnerability. But Liv still hadn’t become immune to his uncharacteristic admissions. Whenever he said something so unlike him, she always took it to heart—like now.

As Liv moved closer to the bed, seemingly to check his expression, Daaemon reached out, wrapping his arm around her waist as if he had been waiting. In an instant, Liv’s body fell atop his.

He could feel her warmth through the thin fabric of her chemise.

Daaemon felt his mouth water. No matter how often he had her, his desire never seemed to be satiated—it only grew.

His hand slid sensuously along her slender waist, moving down to grab her round buttocks. Liv let out a soft noise—somewhere between a sigh and a moan.

“But if the staff came in here, you wouldn’t let me do this.”

“…Of course not.”

Liv, her face flushed a bright red, replied in a small but firm voice. It was the answer Daaemon had anticipated.

She wasn’t the type to display affection casually in front of others, nor had she yet grown comfortable enough with the Langess staff to be entirely open around them.

Perhaps it was because of the tumultuous escape and chase that marked their relationship.

Daaemon’s aides and the staff were overly attentive to Liv—almost excessively so. They seemed constantly worried that, should she be upset, a situation like before might happen again.

They were especially overzealous in serving whenever Daaemon and Liv seemed on good terms, as if to remind him not to have any other thoughts.

Liv found all this attention burdensome, but Daaemon made no effort to stop them. In fact, he was secretly pleased. Philip, as always, had likely handled the staff discreetly. It was the kind of capable response he expected from his butler.

In short, having the staff enter was out of the question.

If a servant were to enter their room each morning to wake them, Liv would surely change her nightwear immediately—opting for a long, cumbersome nightgown instead of the sheer silk chemise she wore now.

“Well, there’s no helping it.”

Daaemon clicked his tongue in a feigned tone of regret.

“Then I’ll just leave the curtains alone.”

What did it matter if the curtains weren’t drawn? What was far more important was waking up and finding Liv beside him.

Burying his face into her neck as she squirmed in his arms, Daaemon let out a deep breath.

It was the start of a peaceful morning.

 



 

Damn Buerno.

Perhaps he should take back what he said about it being peaceful.

Sitting with his arms crossed, Daaemon thought that returning to Buerno in the first place had been a mistake. He should have stayed at the estate in Adelinde.

He had returned to ensure that people wouldn’t dare describe Liv as a mere mistress, gossiping behind her back. He had deliberately treated her with all the reverence she deserved, ensuring everyone in Buerno saw it.

His intention was to prove that all the circulating rumors were false, to make sure no one would ever dare to spread similar gossip again.

Daaemon had expected the change in the attitude of Buerno’s residents. People’s nature was predictable, especially in high society, where ignoring past offenses was practically a virtue.

Still, one should have some sense of shame.

“Baron Pendance?”

How dare they send an invitation after dismissing Liv?

“To be precise, it’s from Milion.”

“There’s no way the Pendance couple wouldn’t have seen the letter addressed to my estate.”

Daaemon responded in a displeased tone, glancing at the letter Liv held. It was obvious—the Pendance couple, now embarrassed, had pushed their daughter forward to extend an olive branch.

They were desperate to forge a connection with the woman who had Marquis Dietrion so utterly captivated. That letter was the best idea they could come up with after wracking their brains.

“A sudden reading session? How transparent.”

And the date was set for tomorrow. How inconsiderate could they be?

 Unlike the disgruntled Daemon, Liv had a calm expression.

“It seems they met the author by chance and hastily arranged this event. Milion had always wanted to invite the author of that famous romance novel, and I had promised to attend the reading session if it ever happened.”

“The famous author just happened to visit Buerno by chance? It’s far more plausible they paid a hefty sum to hastily schedule this event.”

Their intentions were transparent.

Having been eager to reconnect with Liv, the Pendances likely clung to some trivial promise made during a class to hastily prepare this event. That Lady Pendance, Milion, who had always liked Liv, must have cheerfully written the letter.

Had the invitation come from Baron Pendance or his wife, Liv might not have readily accepted. However, since it was Milion who sent it, Liv seemed genuinely pleased. She had been regretful about not properly saying goodbye when she was dismissed and still appeared to feel some lingering attachment.

Moreover, the reading session was not to be held at the Pendance mansion but rather at a location rented in the city of Buerno, which made the invitation much less burdensome for Liv.

It wasn’t difficult for Daaemon to predict that Liv would eventually accept the invitation.

“Do you not want me to attend?”

Daaemon narrowed his eyes at her question.

It wasn’t that he disliked the idea of Liv attending the reading session. He just disliked the thought of her reuniting with Milion there.

Milion was a girl around Corida’s age.

Liv, who cherished her sister dearly, might try to fill the void left by their separation with Milion. And Milion was like a duckling following its mother—no, more like a young lady who followed Liv everywhere she went.

Daaemon had no desire to share Liv’s attention with anyone else. Even his feelings toward her relationship with her sister, Corida, were tinged with irritation, let alone having Liv devote herself to someone else’s daughter.

“If that child from the Pendances clings to you, you won’t be able to shake her off.”

“I’ll make sure to conduct myself so as not to cause any trouble for the Dietrion.”

“I couldn’t care less about causing trouble.”

After all, even if Liv attended the reading session, there wouldn’t be any problems that affected the Dietrion. It was just…

“I don’t like the idea of expanding ‘the places your gaze touches.'”

If they met again, it wouldn’t be surprising if Liv and Milion rekindled their connection. This only reinforced Daemon’s regret about returning to Buerno in the first place. The rumors could have been quelled in other ways. He should have stayed with Liv in Adelinde, surrounded by strangers who knew nothing about her, monopolizing her entirely.

But then again, if they had stayed longer in Adelinde, it was likely that annoying children like Milion would have appeared there too, clinging to Liv. Liv was kind and polite to everyone, which would undoubtedly have drawn attention, even in Adelinde.

Having a popular lover was truly exhausting.

Liv found herself at a loss for words, staring at Daemon’s petulant jealousy, which seemed incongruous with his otherwise nonchalant demeanor.

Only after seeing Liv’s expression did Daaemon begin to wonder if he might be acting somewhat petty. Still, he unabashedly expressed his dissatisfaction. If he didn’t like something, he wasn’t going to pretend otherwise.

Liv looked at Daemon, her lips pressed into a tight line. After a moment of silence, Daemon’s voice softened slightly.

“…I’m not trying to force you to stay away.”

He hesitated briefly before adding, “I just want to say that you don’t have to put yourself through something unpleasant.”

Daaemon remembered Liv mentioning how she found others’ judgmental gazes intimidating.

His efforts to change Liv’s reputation within Buerno were one thing, but Liv having to face those people directly was another.

From Liv’s perspective, seeing the people who used to gossip about her suddenly acting obsequious was revolting. If it twisted Daemon’s insides just watching it happen, how much worse must it be for her?

“If you truly want to reconnect with Lady Pendance, we could arrange a more comfortable and private meeting instead.”

The reading session was nothing more than a pretext. Considering the other guests that would be in attendance, it would undoubtedly be an event full of uncomfortable glances. If anything, the Pendance family would probably prefer a private meeting rather than a formal event.

Liv’s expression turned slightly enigmatic at Daemon’s suggestion.

“Of course, if you did that, it would be more convenient for now. But it would only be a temporary solution. I can’t keep avoiding gatherings like this forever.”

With her lips pressed firmly together, Liv looked at Daaemon before clearing her throat softly and turning away.

“If I am to stay by your side for the rest of my life, I need to be resilient in the face of others’ opinions.”

How mature and wise she was. It was a stark contrast to a certain baron family who sent invitations pretending that nothing had ever happened.

Daaemon barely managed to suppress a sigh. The idea of showcasing such an incredible woman to others filled him with frustration and irritation. He found himself feeling a completely unnecessary sense of jealousy toward the attendees of the reading session, people he had never even met.

“You’ve already changed my reputation for the better. So now, I want to carry myself confidently.”

“Then I should attend with you.”

“Oh, I know you have other plans for tomorrow.”

As if plans couldn’t be changed. True, Daaemon had an appointment with guests coming from the capital, and postponing it would likely make Charles faint from shock. But Charles would adapt. Dates could always be rescheduled.

Liv either didn’t know what was on his mind or simply ignored it. She looked perfectly at ease, her earlier hesitation completely gone, as if she had made up her mind.

“Besides, with all the dresses and jewelry you’ve given me, I need to go out more often if I’m ever going to wear them.”

“You don’t need an invitation to wear those things…”

“But I’d like to show off the gifts you gave me, to someone, anyone.”

Speaking gently, as if soothing a child, Liv cupped Daemon’s cheek and gave him a light kiss.

“I’ll boast about it as much as I can—about how much I’m loved.”

Having gone this far, there was nothing left for Daaemon to say. Frowning, he finally nodded.

“Do as you please.”

A brief image of an entire room filled with dresses crossed Daemon’s mind. He was glad he had already prepared an abundance of clothing and accessories for her.

Now that it had come to this, he’d ensure she had the best outfit and jewelry for her outing.

 



 

The reading session was held near Buerno’s central plaza.

Daaemon personally dressed Liv from head to toe before escorting her to the venue. Even that was enough to be considered overprotective by many, but Daaemon took it a step further—he decided not to return home and instead waited nearby. The reason was simple: the venue was close to the central plaza.

The very plaza where Liv had once tried to flee from him.

Daaemon had sent Charles to meet the guest from the capital in his place. He even suggested that Charles use the opportunity to take a tour of Buerno. Though Charles had been shocked, it was more important to Daaemon to stay close to Liv than to entertain some visitor.

Of course, Daaemon understood rationally that Liv wasn’t going to run away. It wasn’t just a matter of logic; emotionally, he knew she had accepted him. Only yesterday, she had promised to stay by his side for the rest of her life.

It wasn’t that he doubted her feelings. It was just…

This was more like a lingering trauma—an inevitable side effect of having lost her once before.

By now, Daaemon wondered if it might have been better for him to simply accompany her, but Liv had turned down the suggestion once again that very morning.

“It’s a gathering for young ladies and madams. If you come, it won’t be a reading session anymore.”

Liv had gently declined his offer and went into the building alone. He thought he saw attendants at the entrance fussing over her, leading her inside with much fanfare. He couldn’t see what lay beyond the entrance.

As Liv said, the reading session was a women-only event. It seemed Baron Pendance and his wife, concerned about their daughter’s reputation and safety, had gone out of their way to make this clear.

If Daaemon were to follow her in, it would be seen as… quite unnecessary. Even if the Pendances wanted to strengthen their connection with the Marquis Dietrion, there were limits.

“I should have assigned a proper maid sooner.”

Daaemon bit his lip nervously, regretting his oversight.

The maids at the Langess mansion were few, and they were still in the process of hiring a new one specifically to attend to Liv. In particular, selecting a maid for Liv required extra care, which meant the position had not yet been officially filled.

Liv had chosen one of the existing maids, a competent one, to accompany her today, but that wasn’t enough for Daemon.

The maid needed to be highly skilled in various areas—not just in attending to Liv’s personal needs but also in terms of her family background, personality, health, and even basic self-defense abilities. Unfortunately, the applicants kept falling short when it came to the self-defense requirements.

For today, Liv was accompanied by a maid who had been temporarily assigned. Daaemon doubted the woman even knew how to handle a gun and worried about her ability to properly serve her mistress.

“It seems the event is proceeding without any major issues.”

“Can you not see inside?”

“No, it’s not visible through the windows.”

Roman, who had been tasked with keeping an eye on the reading session, reported carefully from outside the building. Daaemon frowned, glaring across at the building opposite.

If they were going to hold an event, why not host it somewhere open? What was so secretive that they needed to rent such a hidden venue?

From beginning to end, there was nothing about this situation that pleased him.

 “No special reports from the inside either.”

Naturally, Daaemon had hurriedly planted someone inside the event as well. It was to receive immediate reports if any issues arose. Judging from the lack of reports, it seemed the event was proceeding without incident. However, no news wasn’t exactly comforting.

“I should have instructed them to report periodically, even if there were no issues.”

Lately, it seemed that Daaemon found himself regretting things more often than before.

He took out a cigar, lighting it to suppress his growing frustration. Outside the carriage, Roman watched him and spoke in a low voice.

“It’s not a long event. There’s no need to worry…”

“You call wasting half a day ‘not long’?”

“It’s only half a day… Yes, very long indeed.”

Roman, who had responded reflexively, quickly corrected himself. Daaemon shot him a cold look, inhaling deeply on his cigar before turning his head away.

Charles and Adolf had also grown insolent lately, and now even Roman. Once, Philip had been the only one to talk back, but now it seemed everyone had grown rather cheeky. In the past, Daaemon wouldn’t have tolerated even the slightest lapse in discipline, but these days he couldn’t be bothered with such trivial matters. He was more interested in just getting through this tedious time.

After checking his pocket watch, Daaemon leaned back. The carriage was soon filled with thick cigar smoke. Just as he was taking another drag, the entrance to the event building opened, and someone stepped out. It was the person Daaemon had planted just the previous evening.

Daaemon narrowed his eyes.

It wasn’t yet time for the reading session to end. The fact that they had left the building meant there was a problem.

Almost as if he had been waiting for this moment, Daaemon threw his cigar to the ground, the polished toe of his shoe crushing the end of the red cigar.

 



 

Liv had heard enough from Charles and Adolf about how the rumors surrounding her had changed in Buerno.

Indeed, she could feel a slight difference in the way people looked at her when she went out with Daemon. However, the truth was, facing many people alone still made her anxious.

When Daaemon offered to arrange a private meeting with Milion instead, she had to admit she was tempted. As Daaemon pointed out, there really wasn’t a need for her to attend such an event alone. Even if Milion had extended the invitation, it wouldn’t have been strange for her to refuse, considering her past dismissal under poor circumstances.

Despite this, Liv decided to attend, and moreover, to do so without Daemon. It was because she realized that she couldn’t always live in the shadows of Daemon. Now that she had returned to Buerno with him and had resolved to stay by his side for the rest of her life, she needed to grow stronger.

Daaemon was a man who attracted attention even without his secretive past. A single outing with him was enough to stir all of Buerno. If she intended to stay by his side, Liv needed to grow accustomed to the public’s gaze and become resilient in the face of it.

Besides, this time, she had every right to hold her head high. She was his lover—not a mistress, but an equal standing partner.

To Liv, this was a determined decision.

“Teacher!”

To her relief, Milion greeted her warmly, just as she always had. The familiarity of Milion’s behavior helped put Liv at ease.

Milion, acting quite maturely, introduced Liv to the other guests. Outwardly, everyone was very polite to Liv, regardless of their true feelings. They all smiled warmly, whatever they might actually be thinking.

The mood was further enhanced when Baroness Pendance briefly appeared before the event began, publicly apologizing for “unilaterally dismissing her without verifying the truth.”

It was as if Baroness Pendance wanted to prove that this event was indeed Milion’s pure invitation. After offering her apology, she left the venue. After she departed, several unfamiliar guests stepped forward, each apologizing for their own “misunderstandings.”

From what Liv could gather, it seemed that the nude painting displayed on the street had been dismissed as a forgery. Technically, it wasn’t entirely false, since the painting had used her as a model, but it wasn’t something Liv felt compelled to correct. She simply accepted their apologies, doing her best to mask her embarrassment.

Overall, the atmosphere was pleasant. Even after the reading session featuring the special guest author began, the mood remained amicable. Although Liv hadn’t read the guest author’s book, Milion whispered explanations, making it easy to follow the story.

The problem arose just as the reading session was nearing its end.

“Oh, you mean whether the characters were inspired by real people?”

During the tea time that followed the elegant reading, someone asked the author a question. On the surface, it seemed a simple enough query.

However, the author, who had maintained a calm demeanor throughout, visibly stiffened at the question.

“Well…”

The author’s hesitation made her appear awkward, and the young lady who asked the question grew visibly uncomfortable. As the previously pleasant atmosphere took on an awkward silence, the author spoke in a rather curt manner.

“I can’t lie to my dear readers, so I’ll be honest: yes, the protagonists are always based on real individuals. There’s someone who has been a particularly significant inspiration to me. I’m sure everyone here knows of her.”

At that moment, Liv instinctively knew what the author was going to say next.

“Lady Luzia Malte.”

The author’s gaze fell on Liv, who was seated in the front. Though the author wore a subtle smile, Liv felt a faint hostility in her eyes.

“Please don’t be offended. You are… the Marquis’… uh, I’m not quite sure what to call you.”

The author smiled as she openly singled out Liv. In an instant, all eyes turned to her. Finding herself the sudden center of attention, Liv calmly parted her lips.

“Liv Rodaise.”

“Ah, Miss Rodaise. Yes. I never imagined I’d meet you here. What a surprise.”

The author laughed cheerfully, but her underlying emotions were evident—she wasn’t pleased. Liv was certain that most of the other guests picked up on it too.

Even after Luzia Malte had been forced into a convent, the author still spoke of her as “my muse.” It was clear that Luzia was someone incredibly important or special to her.

If that was the case, it was easy to understand why the author held such animosity toward Liv. After all, it was Liv who had been at the center of the dispute between Daaemon and Luzia.

Liv licked her lips briefly before answering calmly. “I didn’t expect you to know me.”

She suspected that the author had known her name from the very beginning.

Upon hearing Liv’s response, the author smiled, her voice intentionally softening. “Well, you’ve been making quite a stir lately.”

No matter what relationship the author had with Luzia or how she felt toward Liv because of it, Liv had no interest in it.

Just because the people of Buerno were now smiling in her presence didn’t mean she believed everyone in the world held a favorable opinion of her. No matter how much Daaemon spread the story, Liv didn’t expect everyone to accept it. Naturally, there would be people like this author who viewed her with disdain.

Liv didn’t need everyone to like her.

But by the same token, she had no reason to tolerate the hostility directed at her.

After testing the waters, the author watched Liv’s reaction, while Liv responded with a composed smile.

“As you said, Lady Malte certainly faced her share of disgrace recently.”

The author’s lips tightened slightly. She shrugged and answered nonchalantly, “Well, the media always shows just one side of the story, you know? Every narrative has its characters and flow of events. They just presented the most sensational side of things this time.”

“You seem to distrust the media quite a bit.”

“Writing as I do, I hear a lot from those around me. You need to listen from all angles if you want to write properly.”

The author smiled meaningfully, glancing at the other guests. “Besides, nothing is more fascinating than a scandal.”

It was clear she was referring to the rumors about Daaemon and a “mistress.” It seemed she had heard her share of gossip somewhere.

As Liv watched her with indifferent eyes, someone suddenly raised their hand and spoke up, “Author.”

The one who spoke, with a slightly tense smile and a firm voice, was Milion. Perhaps because it was her reading session, she seemed particularly determined to lighten the tense atmosphere in the room.

“It seems there are other guests who also have questions.”

Hearing Milion’s words, the author sighed softly and turned her attention away. At the same time, another young lady quickly interjected with a question.

Seeing this, Milion subtly leaned toward Liv.

“Teacher, this is…”

“It’s fine, Milion.”

How could Milion possibly be at fault? How important could it be to verify every personal connection of an invited author? If Daaemon was right, this reading session was likely hastily organized, and there probably wasn’t enough time to verify the author’s relationship with Luzia.

Even if they had known, they might not have considered it an issue. After all, the reading session itself wasn’t important—what mattered more was finding an excuse to meet Liv again.

“I’m sorry.”

“You have nothing to apologize for.”

Who could have expected that the author would reveal such personal resentment in a setting like this?

 
Despite Liv’s words, Milion still appeared uneasy. Perhaps Baroness Pendance had given her specific instructions before the event began, as Milion occasionally glanced at Liv with concern.

Then, she quietly spoke to her again, “After the reading session, we should…”

She was likely about to suggest that they catch up since it had been a long time. However, Milion was unable to finish her sentence because the author once again directed her attention towards them.

“I heard you enjoyed my novel, Lady Pendance.”

“Oh? Yes, yes!”

“For someone who enjoyed it, you don’t seem particularly interested in me.”

Milion’s eyes widened at the author’s words.

“Or perhaps there’s an implicit protagonist for this event?”

he author asked this without a hint of a smile. It seemed she had guessed the true intention behind the reading session, which had initially appeared to be the pure endeavor of a young lady with a love for literature.

“You’ve shown quite a lot of interest in just one person, and I was curious.”

Milion’s smile turned awkward. Liv glanced at Milion’s embarrassed face, then turned her gaze towards the author. It was clear what the author was trying to criticize.

The author was expressing her displeasure with how Milion, as the event host, was focusing her attention solely on Liv.

But was there really any need to voice such displeasure in this way?

Picking on Milion like this would inevitably strain the relationship between her and the Pendance family. What reason could the author have for doing this?

“A protagonist must have a noble background, exceptional beauty, and an extraordinary story. No one is interested in the narrative of an ordinary woman. Since you’re one of my readers, I thought you would naturally understand that.”

Hearing the author’s words, Liv let out a quiet, involuntary sigh.

If anyone had an extraordinary story, noble background, and beauty, it was Luzia Malte. It seemed that the author wanted to indirectly insult Liv. Who knew just how close she had been to Luzia to openly express such animosity towards Liv?

Liv played with the handle of the teacup before her, contemplating for a moment.

If she reacted to every one of the author’s provocations, it would ruin the atmosphere of the event and put Milion in a difficult position. Judging by Milion’s anxious expression, she was clearly troubled by the situation.

Though Milion was the host, she was still a young lady in the early stages of learning her role. She probably hadn’t anticipated this kind of conflict, which only added to her discomfort. Liv thought it might be best to avoid unnecessary trouble, for Milion’s sake… but she didn’t see the need to hold back.

“If you can’t handle writing about diverse characters, isn’t that a lack of skill as a novelist…?”

She murmured as if talking to herself, but there was no way her voice wouldn’t carry. Liv had spoken clearly enough for everyone to hear. She widened her eyes slightly, as if realizing her mistake belatedly.

“Oh. That was just a personal thought.”

Liv, gently stroking her chin with her fingertips, then added in a calm tone, “But I do think it’s quite narrow-minded and lazy for someone who claims to be a creator.”

“…Excuse me?”

“Doesn’t everyone have a unique story? Every person is one of a kind. Yet, according to your perspective, it seems only certain people are meant to be protagonists.”

“Well, of course…”

“It seems you’ve relied too heavily on real people as inspiration for your writing. Perhaps it’s time to develop your own imagination and creativity. I hope you’ll explore a broader world of storytelling.”

The author’s lips parted, and her cheeks gradually reddened. Just as she was about to retort, her face contorting in frustration, there was a sharp sound that echoed through the hall.

Thump!

A loud, brief noise resounded, breaking the tense atmosphere of the event. Those who had been watching Liv and the author suddenly realized the presence of a new figure.

Liv also turned her head towards the source of the noise. Standing at the entrance of the event hall was a man, leaning on a cane. It was evident that the sound had been made by the cane striking the floor.

His piercing blue eyes, which had been scanning the hall, found Liv. His gaze, sharp as a well-honed blade, softened for an instant. The change was so subtle that no one but Liv might have noticed.

Most of the attendees were shocked by the sudden appearance of Daemon, but Liv wasn’t particularly surprised. In fact, she was more surprised by her own lack of reaction to his arrival.

It seemed she had unconsciously anticipated that he would be unable to wait for her and would barge in like this.

“Daemon.”

The crowd, who had been staring at Daaemon in shock, now turned their astonished gazes towards Liv. Among them was Milion, whose pale face seemed on the verge of losing consciousness as she stammered, “Di-Di-Di…”

Liv, who had thrown the hall into chaos, rose gracefully, her expression composed.

“As you can see, someone has come to pick me up, so I’m afraid I must leave early. Milion, it was lovely seeing you after so long.”

No one stopped Liv, and she left the hall calmly with Daaemon escorting her.

 



 

After returning from the reading session, Daaemon immediately ordered a thorough investigation of the author who had antagonized Liv. Charles, alarmed by Daemon’s fury, dropped everything else to conduct the investigation, which led to a swift report.

“Her pen name is Miel, her real name is…”

“Who cares about her name?”

Daaemon snapped sharply, causing Charles to cough awkwardly. He quickly flipped past the pages containing unnecessary personal details and cleared his throat before continuing.

“She was sponsored by Lady Malte. However, due to the recent trial, her sponsorship seems to have been jeopardized.”

“Is she bitter because she lost her patronage?”

Even so, why direct that bitterness towards Liv? It was Daemon, not Liv, who had brought Luzia to her current state. How incompetent did one have to be to fail to grasp such a simple fact?

Displeasure surged within him. To blindly lash out without understanding the full picture was utterly foolish.

Of course, Daaemon could guess why the author had targeted Liv instead of confronting him directly—antagonizing Marquis Dietrion would be madness, so she had aimed for what seemed like an easier target. But anyone with even a bit of sense should have known better than to provoke Liv. After all, anyone who had crossed Liv, like Luzia, had faced dire consequences.

In every way, the author was foolish.

“She seems to be seeking a new sponsor now. She’s avoiding Torsten, likely due to the Malte family’s influence, and has moved to Beren.”

“So her goal was Baron Pendance’s money,” Daaemon muttered coldly, furrowing his brow.

It seemed Miel had tried to win over Baron Pendance at the reading session. However, upon arriving, she found that Baroness Pendance had left early, and Milion, the event’s host, was solely focused on Liv, which displeased her.

The entire reading session had likely revolved around Liv. Daaemon could easily imagine the scene without having witnessed it. The author, already frustrated due to the Luzia affair, must have been further incensed by the attention Liv received.

“It seems her spending habits are quite extravagant, and she can’t sustain them with her book earnings alone.”

No surprise there. Given that she had been sponsored by Luzia, she must have mingled with high society and grown accustomed to a lavish lifestyle beyond her means.

When Daaemon first heard that the invited author had antagonized Liv, he could hardly believe it.

Daaemon pressed his fingers to his temples, a look of irritation crossing his face.

“How pathetic.”

He leaned back against his chair, gesturing dismissively. Understanding the unspoken command, Charles quickly bowed and left the room.

After Charles departed, Daaemon also stood. He intended to find Liv and comfort her, as her mood was surely ruined after an unpleasant encounter at the reading session.

“Where is Liv?”

“She is resting in her room.”

Upon hearing the servant’s reply, Daaemon hurried his steps.

 



 

“Oh, sponsorship…”

After hearing Daemon’s explanation, Liv nodded, her expression subtly complex.

“I did find it a bit odd. The animosity she showed couldn’t be explained solely by her relationship with Lady Malte.”

Liv’s voice, as she murmured this, was so calm that she seemed like someone relaying a story unrelated to herself.

Daaemon already knew what Miel had said to Liv. He had heard that Miel had belittled Liv, bringing up Luzia’s name, mocking her without overt insults but rather with sneering, sarcastic remarks. Liv, sharp as she was, couldn’t have missed the intent behind Miel’s words.

Attending the event to show herself confidently in front of others must have made the experience all the more unpleasant for her.

Daaemon knew that, apart from matters involving Corida, Liv rarely showed her emotions. But even so, her demeanor was almost too calm. It reminded him of the day when her nude painting was displayed in public.

Instead of getting angry that day, she had remained composed, tricked him, and left him behind without hesitation…

A sudden sense of unease crept in, prompting Daaemon to speak quickly.

“I’ve already instructed Charles to handle it, so there’s no need for you to think about that woman.”

At his words, Liv’s eyes widened briefly, then she smiled faintly.

“It seems like you’re more concerned about her than I am.”

Liv chuckled softly, almost as if she found the situation amusing.

“In the past, I think you would have agreed with her.”

 “No way.”

Daaemon immediately rejected her statement, frowning. However, Liv asked again with a face that clearly showed she didn’t believe him.

“Really?”

“Of course…”

Of course, he wouldn’t have agreed that she was lacking compared to Luzia.

Daaemon was about to say as much, but stopped when he met Liv’s gaze, her eyes staring at him quietly. His tongue, which had been about to move smoothly, seemed to freeze in place.

Neither of them had forgotten how their relationship had begun and how it had continued. Liv had seen Daaemon closer than anyone else and was a woman who quickly understood what Daaemon wanted.

Daemon, who had been about to say something, eventually lowered his voice slightly and admitted:

“Yes, I would have agreed.”

The old him, at least.

To be honest, there was no need for such a grand qualifier like “the old him.” It was still true now that Luzia had a higher social status than Liv and that they came from completely different worlds.

Daaemon believed that, regardless of his dislike for high society, there were still distinctions between its members. Status and power were clear indicators of those distinctions. Although his perspective had become a little skewed because of Liv, that was only because she was involved. Outside of situations involving Liv, Daaemon hadn’t changed one bit.

Especially back when he hadn’t yet realized his feelings for her?

Naturally, he would have acknowledged the gap in status and power between Liv and Luzia. But…

“Even if I agreed, I would have felt inexplicably annoyed.”

Yes, Luzia came from a good family and had a high status. Because of that, she might deserve to be treated with more respect than Liv. And yet…

Even knowing Liv’s objectively lacking circumstances, he wouldn’t have been able to tolerate it. He might have understood in his head that Luzia was treated as more valuable than Liv, but in his heart, he would never have agreed.

Just thinking about it was enough to make him angry again. He should remind Charles to deal with that author, Miel, even more thoroughly.

“And since it upset me, I would have found a way to make that author pay.”

Liv let out a breathy laugh at Daemon’s words.

“That’s a strange logic.”

“I’ve always been strange when it comes to you.”

Daaemon responded in a nonchalant tone, reaching out to wrap his arm around Liv’s waist.

The distance between Liv and Daaemon closed. Daaemon could smell the strong scent of roses on her, as she had mentioned taking a stroll through the rose garden while Charles gave him his report. It was as if she was wrapped in the scent of blooming red roses, and it suited her perfectly.

“Looking back, every moment.”

He lightly bit down on her slightly parted lips, catching the faint taste of cream. He could easily imagine Liv being persuaded by Philip to enjoy a simple tea while walking through the rose garden.

Daaemon imagined Liv, sitting at the white outdoor table between the half-bloomed rose petals, leisurely eating a piece of sweet cream cake—a scene that fit naturally into the daily life of Langess mansion, like it belonged there.

His lower body tightened.

“I can’t understand why it took me so long to realize.”

Liv let out a low laugh, wrapping her arms around Daemon’s neck and pulling him close.

 



 

It was true that Miel’s taunts had upset her.

However, the unpleasantness was easier to control than she had expected. Not only had she not remained silent in the face of Miel’s words, but the sight of Daaemon barging into the reading session had unexpectedly set her mind at ease.

She didn’t need to think too hard to know that he would respond immediately to such insults.

Miel, who had crossed borders in search of a new patron, would not achieve her goal. Considering Daemon’s unforgiving nature, it was uncertain whether she would even be able to continue her work as an author.

To be honest, Liv didn’t pity Miel. She didn’t want to stop Daaemon from retaliating.

To put it bluntly, Liv rather liked the fact that Daemon, enraged by her insult, would demand appropriate retribution. That was all.

‘I don’t care anymore.’

Yes, she no longer cared about how others treated her.

While working as a tutor and secretly continuing her relationship with Daemon, Liv had always been conscious of others’ eyes and the rumors that would spread. She thought her life could be easily shaken by even the slightest careless words.

Even when she returned to Buerno after confirming Corida’s enrollment in Adelinde, a part of her was still worried. But she thought she had to endure it. It was her choice, her desire to stay by Daemon’s side. Having made that decision, she had to take responsibility for the consequences.

When she met Milion again and found herself less nervous than she had expected, she thought it was merely because she was reconnecting with someone familiar.

But even when she faced Miel’s confrontation and drew attention from everyone at the event, Liv wasn’t scared or burdened.

After returning to Langess mansion with Daemon, Liv found herself wondering why she felt so at ease.

‘Is it because of this man?’

Late at night, Liv stared at the man lying peacefully beside her. The faint embers of the fireplace cast a soft glow on his face.

His long, even lashes, his straight nose, his lips closed in a line—with his eyes closed in peaceful sleep, Daemon’s face was angelic.

Liv raised her eyes without thinking, gazing at his face as if entranced. She soon came to her senses, slowly blinking. While nestled against him, she shifted slightly. When she rested her head against his bare chest, she heard the steady thumping of his heartbeat.

Even if it was only for a few hours, Daaemon always seemed to fall into a surprisingly deep sleep whenever he went to bed with Liv. He breathed so quietly when he was asleep that Liv would sometimes press her ear to his chest during sleepless nights, just like now.

In the stillness of the bedroom, the sound of his heartbeat seemed exceptionally loud. As she focused on that sound, her heart gradually calmed. At the same time, her paused thoughts began to stir again.

‘On my side.’

No, rather than saying ‘on my side’…

‘My person.’

Liv’s gaze rose again. The sleeping man’s face looked so serene that it was hard to believe he was usually so sensitive. If she were to touch that face, would he wake up?

Even if he did wake up, he wouldn’t get mad at her for interrupting his rest. After all, Liv was his ‘exception.’

This man loved her. So much so that it was impossible not to know. He was utterly devoted to her. The proud, fastidious man softened his thorns and bent his head submissively only for her. Yet he was also a man who didn’t hesitate to wield his power for her sake.

His love gave her stability. The fears she had carried throughout her life no longer seemed significant—not when he supported her.

Suddenly, Liv felt her heart itch. Her emotions were overflowing to such an extent that she felt as though they might burst at any moment.

She wanted to do something special for him. To ease his worries and show him that he, too, was her ‘exception.’

Just as she could easily understand his feelings, she wished he could also feel her emotions just as easily.

Sometimes, the early hours of dawn lead people into irrational thoughts. The chaotic thoughts swirling in her head right now might just be a temporary phenomenon, like morning dew that disappears with the sunrise. But Liv had already been seized by an unusual impulse.

Staring at the peacefully sleeping Daemon, she made up her mind.

She would show him her love.

Just as he had given her peace of mind, this time, she would bring comfort to his heart.

 



 

Milion requested a meeting, wanting to apologize for the incident at the reading session.

This prompted Liv to rekindle her interactions with Milion. Daaemon watched Liv leave for her outings, barely concealing his disappointment. Even for him, there was no way he could follow her when she went to meet Milion.

In truth, he could have, but Liv, knowing him all too well, had asked him to ‘let her meet comfortably,’ leaving him no choice.

The problem was that others, having witnessed this, began to change their approach and started to reach out to Liv again. Word got around that Liv had a soft spot for young ladies, thanks to Milion, and soon enough, people in Buerno were sending their daughters or cousins to get close to her.

The girls were around Corida’s age, and Liv seemed less inclined to draw a firm line with them, as she had in the past.

“Damn Buerno.”

Daaemon thought irritably, feeling as if he was increasingly gripped by the same frustrations. His fingers tapped impatiently on the book before him.

“A ring won’t be of any use against children.”

Liv always wore the ring that Daaemon had given her, but it could only deter the advances of scheming men. Young girls paid no attention to the ring; they just wanted to befriend Liv.

That very morning, he heard that Milion had asked Liv to resume the lessons she hadn’t completed. Liv hadn’t given her an answer yet, but Daaemon was already displeased that Milion had even made such a request.

Seeing Milion do this, the other young ladies would likely follow suit, and Liv seemed unlikely to refuse them. Given how she had enjoyed her role as a governess, she seemed well-suited to teaching others.

What if she tried to fill the space left by Corida with these girls?

 If only I had already made her the Marchioness, I could have easily justified keeping others from receiving any lessons from her by stating that she was too noble for such tasks.

Daaemon frowned at the documents in front of him, clearly frustrated.

“Why is this process taking so long?”

Unfortunately, Adolf, who had come merely to report on the progress, bore the brunt of Daemon’s displeasure. Adolf looked momentarily disheartened, though he quickly adapted to the situation and replied in an even voice.

“Well, it’s because you chose Eleonore as one of the witnesses for the marriage oath, Marquis.”

“So what?”

The Eleonore family should be grateful and sign eagerly, considering they were covering up the disgraceful actions of their son, who had overstepped boundaries with someone else’s lover.

Daaemon glared sharply at Adolf—a look that made his thoughts unmistakable without words. Adolf took a deep breath, doing his best to remain calm as he continued.

“…Camille Eleonore is quite beloved in his family.”

“What does their affection for that brat have to do with my marriage oath?”

Adolf couldn’t help but marvel at how quickly Daaemon reduced Camille from a beloved son to a “brat.” Adolf gave a dry laugh.

“The cherished brat is throwing a tantrum, and his parents can’t ignore it.”

“Are they suggesting they want to cancel the negotiation?”

Being a witness to the marriage oath was only one part of the agreement between the parties involved. While it may have seemed less important compared to other clauses from Eleonore’s perspective, Daaemon certainly wasn’t going to let it slide.

“They’re not refusing to sign; rather, they’re trying to delay it as much as possible.”

“There’s nothing to gain by doing that.”

“Exactly, which is why it’s simply a childish tantrum—a spoiled brat’s stubbornness.”

“Pathetic child.”

Daaemon scoffed. If Camille had openly tried to block the marriage, Daaemon might have at least respected the audacity—even if it meant cursing him as a madman. But this? Delaying things out of petty spite? Such pettiness was why Liv had never spared Camille a second glance. The boy remained foolish and small-minded to the very end.

He laughed mockingly at Camille, wishing that the brat would be forced to watch his marriage to Liv unfold before his eyes, causing him endless agony.

“But in the end, Eleonore will sign.”

“Of course.”

Daaemon hadn’t chosen Eleonore as a witness solely to spite Camille. The main reason was that the Eleonore family was a well-respected noble house in Beren.

Having an influential figure act as a witness increased the value of the marriage. With the Eleonore family’s respected name on the oath, it would also strengthen Liv’s authority as the future Marchioness.

Of course, the Eleonore name had faced some scandal lately due to Camille’s disgraceful actions. But at least Daaemon hadn’t hauled him into court, as he had Luzia. In his heart, Daaemon would have preferred to issue a public challenge and settle things permanently and legally.

“Yes, Camille Eleonore is fond of Miss Rodaise, after all. He should understand how much his family’s name on this oath will benefit her. Eventually…”

Adolf trailed off abruptly as he saw Daemon’s expression change at the mention of Camille’s feelings for Liv.

“…Eventually, Eleonore will sign, thanks to the astute negotiation conducted by you, my lord. Thus, it will be you who pave the smooth path ahead for Miss Rodaise.”

Adolf narrowly avoided making a serious mistake with his quick redirection. Daaemon clicked his tongue in disapproval but didn’t press the issue further, shifting his focus back to the documents. Adolf let out a silent sigh of relief.

“Tell them to take their time, but sign eventually.”

“Understood.”

Having survived the tension, Adolf was now visibly calmer as he answered. He was about to leave after giving a polite bow when he noticed Daaemon picking up his coat, preparing to head out.

“Are you going out, sir?”

Adolf was certain that Daaemon didn’t have any outings planned for today, though he had heard that Liv was out. Did that mean…

“Should I confirm Miss Rodaise’s whereabouts?”

“No.”

“Pardon? Then where are you headed now?”

Adolf’s eyes widened, surprised that Daaemon wasn’t about to go after Liv.

Daemon, who gave him a disdainful look, answered curtly, “Art lessons.”

 



 

If there was one thing Daaemon found somewhat acceptable about Liv reconnecting with Milion, it was that it had led to fewer shared sessions with the art teacher.

Liv hadn’t quit her art lessons entirely—she simply couldn’t attend them as often due to her frequent outings. Meanwhile, Daemon, with little reason to leave and no desire for extended absences, continued with his usual lesson schedule.

Their gap in skill had become evident over time, and their lessons began to differ. Liv’s skills had been improving rapidly, whereas Daaemon was still struggling. Even if it wasn’t just about the frequency of their lessons, it seemed inevitable that their classes would diverge.

Daaemon needed extra lessons, much like a struggling student staying behind after class for remedial help.

As much as he hated to admit it, Daaemon had to acknowledge that, when it came to art, he was very much a slow learner.

“You are truly consistent in your steadfastness, Marquis!”

Daaemon shot a sideways glance at his art teacher, who clapped in exaggerated admiration. He turned his gaze back to the canvas before him.

“Are you saying there’s been no progress at all?”

“Well, an unwavering skill is quite remarkable in itself…”

“I asked for improvement, not to stay the same.”

Daaemon cut him off coldly. The teacher, now used to the routine, calmly took out a handkerchief and wiped his forehead before responding in a composed manner.

“It seems to me that there’s impatience in your brushstrokes, Marquis. Instead of focusing on completing the piece immediately, you might benefit from observing the subject more thoroughly, contemplating, and taking your time…”

“I’ve already spent plenty of time observing and contemplating the subject.”

Every night, Daaemon looked at Liv—thoroughly, attentively, never missing a single detail. He studied her meticulously, touching and caressing every part of her body.

Who else in this world could know Liv’s body better than him? Even when she wasn’t present, Daaemon could clearly picture her in his mind.

The problem was that his mind wasn’t a canvas he could show to others.

“Tsk.”

Frustrated by his stagnant progress, Daaemon threw down his brush. He had recently been visiting the shooting range and training grounds again, trying to regain the dexterity he once had when he was adept at handling all sorts of weapons. But it seemed those efforts weren’t enough.

Maybe he should change his canvas. Perhaps the texture was too rough, making it difficult to draw proper lines.

The fact that he had already replaced his tools several times seemed to have slipped Daemon’s mind. Crossing his arms, he glared at the canvas for a while before his gaze shifted to something else.

Not far away, an empty chair and easel stood. It was Liv’s spot.

Even when they took lessons together, Daaemon never bothered to peek at her canvas because Liv didn’t want him to. But he could roughly guess what she was drawing. Like him, Liv had a clear objective when she started learning art.

“What has Liv been drawing lately?”

“She has been very interested in portraiture.”

It seemed Liv’s plan to draw Daemon’s nude portrait was progressing steadily. Daaemon nodded, a satisfied smile on his face, before narrowing his eyes. Something felt off about the usual setup.

“Where is Liv’s canvas?”

“Oh, since her lessons are less frequent now, she said it would be better to work on it separately. I’ve already reviewed the basics, so she’s capable of continuing on her own.”

Separately?

Daemon’s expression shifted slightly.

Liv was staying at the Langess mansion. Although her residence in Buerno still existed, it was safe to say that her true home was now at the Langess mansion. Therefore, if she wanted to work on her art separately, it only made sense for her to bring her canvas there.

And besides, he had always attended her art lessons with her. If she had taken the canvas, he would have noticed.

“When did she take it?”

“Quite some time ago.”

“Did you meet her personally?”

“No, not at all! The future Marchioness sent a letter, and afterward, she came by herself to collect it.”

The sharp tension Daaemon had felt eased slightly at the teacher’s prompt response, though an unpleasant feeling lingered.

Daaemon tilted his head, staring at the empty chair and easel.

There was nothing inherently wrong with Liv taking her canvas. If she wished to work on it alone, he could easily accommodate her. He would even go as far as offering an entire mansion for her to use as her studio.

It was just… what bothered Daaemon was the whereabouts of the canvas. If she had taken it to the mansion without his knowledge, that would be one thing. But if, by any chance…

If by any chance the canvas wasn’t at the mansion, it would mean Liv had her own space somewhere that he didn’t know about.

 “The lesson is over.”

Daaemon stood up immediately. He had to return to the mansion and meet with Philip. No one, person or item, could enter or leave the mansion without Philip knowing. If Liv had brought the canvas back, Philip would surely know.

The art teacher, pleased by the prospect of ending work much earlier than usual, quickly tidied up his things, hiding his joy.

As he offered Daaemon an overly polite farewell, Daaemon said in a dry voice, “The marriage is near, so it makes no difference if you think of her as the Marchioness already. There’s no need for unnecessary ‘future’ qualifiers.”

Daaemon believed in correcting things that needed correction, no matter the urgency.

The art teacher seemed at a loss for words at Daemon’s statement, falling silent for a moment before slowly nodding.

“…Oh, yes.”

Though it wasn’t exactly a satisfactory response, Daaemon didn’t have time to nitpick. He strode out of the studio with larger-than-usual steps, his face even more hardened than usual.

 



 

…Had she set up a secret place, hiding it from me?

This was the first thought that crossed Daemon’s mind when he heard from Philip that there was no canvas stored within the mansion. A cold sensation swept over his body, like a bucket of ice water had been poured over him. His fingertips tingled as if all the blood had drained from them.

Since returning to Buerno, Liv hadn’t had anyone secretly following her. They were living together now, so he hadn’t needed constant reports on her every move. He knew her general outings, but he didn’t have anyone shadowing her or reporting on her actions.

‘Was my confidence too premature?’

Daaemon ordered Philip to confirm once again, and as he strolled through the rose garden, he found himself lost in thought. As he waited for Liv to return, countless possible scenarios flashed through his mind only to be dismissed. His thoughts were disorganized, his reason and emotions clashing moment to moment.

It was the most inefficient use of time imaginable. Even knowing this, Daaemon couldn’t stop the chain of suspicions and anxieties from gnawing at him. The sense of control he thought he had was giving way to a lurking volatility, and he was tempted to fall back on the familiar, straightforward solutions he’d relied on all his life.

If Liv had secrets, he had the means to uncover them all. A few words to his subordinates would be enough to reveal everything.

Yet, he hesitated.

He had decided of his own accord not to pry into her affairs. All he could do now was wait for her return. And so he found himself aimlessly pacing the rose garden, doing nothing but wasting time.

Liv returned home just as the twilight of the setting sun began to cast its orange hue over the rose garden. Until that moment, Daaemon had been wasting time inefficiently.

“Daemon!”

Hearing that he was in the garden, Liv came directly to find him, still dressed in her outing clothes. Her steps were light and lively as she approached him.

Daaemon had intended to ask her about the canvas as soon as they met. He could tell himself he had been patient enough simply by not investigating behind her back. A slightly sharp inquiry could be justified.

At least, that was what he thought until he faced her.

“Did you come out here to greet me?”

Her eyes sparkled as she asked, her voice full of excitement. Just seeing her like that made the tension that had been coiled tightly within him for hours slacken.

“You said you didn’t like seeing the roses wither. You usually prefer the rear garden to this one.”

“…You can see the entrance from here.”

The rose garden offered the best view of the carriages approaching the mansion. Not that it made a huge difference compared to waiting inside, but he hadn’t been in the right state of mind to sit still and wait, so he had chosen the place where he could see her return just a little bit sooner.

“So you came out to meet me.”

Liv’s conclusion was correct. Though it wasn’t for the tender reason she was likely imagining now, there was no need to ruin her joy. Daaemon gave her a subdued nod, and Liv’s eyes crinkled as she broke into a radiant smile.

Had her outing been particularly enjoyable today? She looked genuinely happy—happier than she’d been in recent memory.

And now, Daaemon realized he couldn’t bring himself to interrogate her. He didn’t want to upset her with suspicions when she looked at him so innocently, with no idea of what had been troubling him. In the end, what escaped his lips was not an accusation but a simple comment.

“…It seems you had a good time.”

“Oh, right. I visited a lakeside today. Not the one we’ve been to—a different place. It’s not well known yet, but I think you’d like it.”

Learning that she intended to take him with her next time gradually eased the turmoil in his mind.

Of course, she hadn’t taken the canvas to some secret place for some clandestine reason. If Liv had intended to plan something behind his back, she would have been much more meticulous. The canvas was likely left somewhere in her carriage, or perhaps it was stored in some corner of the mansion that Philip had overlooked.

There was no reason for her to hide anything from him. Liv wasn’t bound by any contract anymore. She was staying by his side of her own free will.

Still, he disliked leaving even a hint of suspicion lingering. He decided he would bring it up casually during dinner.

Surely, Liv would answer easily, brushing it off as nothing important.

 



 

He didn’t ask.

As ridiculous as it was, every time Daaemon tried to ask about the canvas, it felt as though something was stuck in his throat, and no sound would come out. After a few failed attempts, Daaemon analyzed his state with his characteristic rationality.

What was stopping him from asking?

It wasn’t hard to find the answer. He was afraid of her response. Whatever Liv’s answer might be, it was bound to unsettle him.

If she admitted there was a place he didn’t know about, he would hate the fact that she had created such a place. But if she denied it, pretending such a place didn’t exist, he would only grow more suspicious inside. Whether it was a yes or a no, he didn’t want to hear it.

Did he really need to know the whereabouts of that canvas? Was it really that significant? Wherever Liv kept it, did it truly matter?

No matter where she went during the day, she would always return to sleep beside him. That wouldn’t change.

When Liv, who had been in a good mood throughout dinner, continued to appear cheerful even in the bedroom, Daaemon found himself unusually lenient. He wanted to let go of trivial annoyances.

The more he thought about it, the less important the issue seemed.

Rather than worrying about the canvas, it was far more productive to focus his attention on Liv right in front of him.

After finishing her preparations for bed, Liv climbed into bed, her skin fresh and warm from a recent bath. She nestled against him without hesitation, her body pressing partly against his chest.

She was not just in a good mood; she was almost overly affectionate. Had something particularly good happened?

Before Daaemon could ask, Liv spoke first, her face bright with excitement.

“Today, Milion gave me tickets to a concert. The performers are supposed to be skilled enough to be invited by the royal family.”

Concert tickets had made her this happy?

It was such an unexpected reason that Daaemon frowned slightly without realizing it.

“I thought you didn’t like performances.”

Daaemon recalled the time they had gone to see an opera together.

“I remember you didn’t have a favorable opinion of it.”

“If high society’s idea of proper decorum is like that, then I’d rather not attend performances in person.”

That was what she had said back then. Despite the dark interior of the theater, people’s eyes had followed them throughout the opera, and Liv had found it extremely uncomfortable and intimidating. In fact, she had even described it as “threatening.”

It wasn’t just a matter of disliking it—it had made her feel genuinely unsafe. After that, Daaemon hadn’t considered taking her to another theater.

Liv seemed to remember the same day, letting out a low sigh.

“It was like that back then.”

“And it’s not as if people’s gazes have changed much since then.”

While saying that, Daaemon adjusted Liv’s position on top of him. As their lower bodies made closer contact, he could feel his arousal building, his half-erect member now fully hardening.

Liv must have felt his erection pressing against her, yet she seemed less affected than he was, more focused on reminiscing about the past.

“Things are different now.”

The green eyes that had been filled with joy suddenly dimmed, and Liv gazed steadily down at Daaemon without blinking.

“Back then, you didn’t care at all about my reputation. That’s why I was so nervous.”

Daemon’s fingers, which had been about to push aside the thin chemise she wore, paused.

Momentarily at a loss for words, Daaemon missed his chance to respond and remained silent.

During that opera outing… yes, she was right. He hadn’t cared about her reputation at all.

In fact, he had secretly hoped her reputation would be tarnished. At the time, he had found her public activities distasteful. He wouldn’t have minded if she had been dismissed due to troublesome rumors. Moreover, he had wanted to make a point to Luzia, deliberately fueling the gossip.

He had never discussed that day with Liv afterward.

Naturally, she had no idea that the opera visit was meant to provoke Luzia. They had never talked about it, and there was no way for her to find out, so she still didn’t know.

Daaemon never imagined that he would hear such words from Liv.

 
Daemon, momentarily at a loss for words, offered a feeble excuse.

“That was just an attempt to bind you to me.”

“I understand now that your way of expressing affection is a bit unusual.”

Liv spoke with a surprisingly calm expression. She didn’t look like someone who was trying to express lingering grievances or make a belated accusation. She was simply stating the facts, openly and honestly.

“But it wasn’t pleasant.”

And because of that, even without getting angry, she made it impossible for him to justify himself.

Daemon, lips parting and then closing again, let out a shallow sigh. What had happened could not be erased. Moreover, Liv was clearly stating that she had found his behavior back then unpleasant. Continuing to make excuses would be nothing but a waste of time.

Daaemon quickly made up his mind.

“…I apologize for not respecting you. It was a poor judgment on my part.”

The words, unfamiliar to him, came out in an uncharacteristically blunt tone. Still, they were sincere.

Now, Daaemon had lost all confidence regarding his relationship with Liv. While he still had the power to control her, it was not something he wished to use on her—something he might do with his subordinates. He didn’t want Liv to be like his subordinates or akin to the statues he kept in his private gallery. His desire went far beyond that, and past experiences had made this abundantly clear.

“Now that I’ve recognized the problem, I won’t repeat it.”

His hands, which had paused briefly, moved slowly again—more to soothe Liv, whose mood had sunk, rather than to fulfill his own desire.

“That’s why I’ve been making an effort to provide what you like.”

At his words, Liv tilted her head slightly. Her flowing hair moved with the motion, gently tickling Daemon’s bare chest, like the mischievous tail of a clever fox who knew just how beautiful she was.

“Really?”

“Of course.”

“What is it that I like?”

Liv’s eyes gleamed with interest.

From time to time, Philip would quiz Daaemon on “Liv’s preferences,” as if it were an exam question. When Philip first asked, Liv had been more embarrassed than Daemon, but now she wore an intrigued expression similar to Philip’s, waiting for Daemon’s answer.

That was exactly the expression Liv wore now as she sat on his stomach. She didn’t seem to be hoping he would give the right answer but rather looking forward to whatever absurd answer he might give.

“My body.”

Liv’s eyes widened at his answer, given without hesitation. She stared blankly at Daaemon for a moment, then gradually parted her lips. Her exposed neck began to blush.

Liv, her lips moving slightly, spoke in an embarrassed voice, “…If you put it that way, I sound like some lewd woman who only desires your body.”

Given their current position—Liv straddling him—his answer seemed all the more believable.

Liv, apparently aware of the suggestiveness of their posture, tried to slide off him, inching sideways. But with Daaemon holding her waist firmly in place, she couldn’t do as she wished.

Every time Liv shifted her hips, a heat built up in his lower body. Daaemon subtly applied pressure to her waist, rubbing his hardness against Liv’s bare skin, his voice calm to the point of dryness.

“But it wasn’t my personality you fell for, was it?”

“Well…”

Liv seemed at a loss for words at his self-aware comment. She appeared so taken aback that she forgot her earlier attempt to move off him. Daaemon seized the opportunity to pull her closer, adjusting their position.

Her soft, full breasts were pressed against his chest, their stomachs touching. His swollen head, slick with precum, nudged her entrance, ready to push in.

Daemon, moving his hands from her waist to cup her soft buttocks, suddenly curled his lips in a sly smile.

“Ah, maybe it wasn’t my body but my face.”

“No, that’s not… Ah!”

Liv, who seemed about to protest, swallowed her words as he thrust into her, her body bending forward. Liv, too, must have been aroused while their bodies were in contact, as her inner walls were wet and slick.

Perhaps it was because he entered her nearly every day.

It was easy to bury himself to the root in one go. It felt as though her insides had molded perfectly to his shape. Just imagining the walls being identical to his member had his heart swelling with satisfaction.

Daaemon paused for a moment with his pillar fully buried. Just being enveloped by her warmth felt incredible.

But the moment of respite didn’t last long. The subtle squeezing of her walls continued to stimulate his senses.

“Mm, ah…”

Liv, lying on top of him, rubbed her breasts against his chest, her breath hot against his skin. She seemed to be trying to manage her growing arousal, but to Daemon, it only felt like she was urging him on.

So he decided to grant her unspoken request.

“Ah!”

He tightened his legs, thrusting up. His cock pulled out just slightly from the base, then plunged in again. It wasn’t an explicit in-and-out motion, but even the slight movement was enough, given how tightly her walls gripped him.

With every thrust, Liv’s thighs trembled, her love juice spilling and soaking the area between them. As she clung to him, moaning, her lips brushed against his scarred chest.

Whether it was intentional or not didn’t matter. What mattered was that the small, playful caress stirred something primal within him.

“Ugh…”

Daemon, propping himself on his knees, began thrusting harder. Liv’s body collapsed fully onto his, her back arching.

The creaking of the bed, the sound of their skin meeting, and their gasping breaths filled the room. Daemon, holding Liv tightly, sank his teeth into her flushed neck. The reddish mark left behind stood out against her heated skin.

Licking over the mark, Daaemon bit down again.

It was easy to cover her neck in love bites, marking from her round shoulders to just below her ear. Yet even with her skin marred in red, he felt no relief—only a growing hunger.

An unknown yearning took hold.

It was strange. No matter how deeply he buried himself in her or how many marks he left on her, it was never enough. The faint hunger only seemed to grow.

“…Haa.”

Daaemon licked along the edge of Liv’s ear, his breath hot. When his breath tickled her ear, Liv shivered, wrapping her arms tightly around his neck, almost desperately.

“Ah, Daemon…”

Calling his name in a voice thick with pleasure, Liv kissed his jaw and cheek.

“…Daemon.”

“Yes.”

His thrusts sped up, the wet sound of their bodies meeting growing louder. He was on the verge of release, his shaft throbbing. Liv’s tight walls squeezed him, and Daaemon gritted his teeth, holding back a curse.

With his voice tight with impending climax, Daaemon whispered against her ear, “You called me. So say it.”

“Uh!”

“Hm?”

“Haa, ah! Ah!”

At the force of his thrust, Liv’s moan turned sharper. Daemon, teeth gritted, growled low.

“Liv.”

“Ha, Daemon…”

Between her trembling thighs, a surge of hot fluid gushed out. Tears and sweat drenched Liv’s face as she gasped through her climax.

Even as she reached her peak, his thrusts didn’t slow, sending her reeling from one wave of pleasure to the next. Unable to keep up, Liv’s body went limp, her lips repeatedly murmuring his name in a daze.

“…Good.”

At that moment, his rough thrusts halted. With his shaft buried deep inside her, Daaemon let out a groan. A rush of heat seemed to explode in his head, blinding him momentarily.

With his cock buried to the hilt, he released inside her, marking her as his. His shaft twitched repeatedly, pumping his seed deep. But what truly heightened his pleasure wasn’t the physical sensation—it was Liv’s drowsy murmur.

Without pulling out, Daaemon asked quietly, “You liked it?”

“Ah…”

“Liv.”

“Mmm…”

Her body limp, Liv rubbed her forehead against his neck in a gesture that seemed more out of exhaustion than affection. Yet Daemon, unwilling to let it end there, rubbed her sticky back insistently, pressing her.

“Did you like it?”

“What…”

His fingers teased her entrance, still filled with his cock. He began gently prying it open.

“Did you like having me inside you here?”

 Even after ejaculating once, the girth of his shaft left no room for gaps where they were connected. Yet Daaemon moved his fingers slowly as if trying to find a place to push deeper.

Liv, who was lying languidly, was startled and raised her head at the sensation of his fingers trying to force their way in, despite the already tight space.

“…Wait a moment…!”

“You said you liked it.”

Daaemon didn’t stop teasing her even after seeing her shocked expression. It was rare for Liv, who had grown accustomed to their lovemaking, to look flustered, and seeing her like this stirred something inside him even more.

“No, wait, Daemon…!”

“Why?”

“Your fingers, no…!”

“What do you mean ‘no’?”

Liv’s eyes shook as Daaemon persisted, creating a small gap with his fingers. Her trembling lips spilled out words in a rush.

“It won’t fit! I’ll tear! I’m scared!”

As if. The human body didn’t tear that easily. Besides, seeing how her entrance was already sucking his shaft in, it was clear she was prepared.

Daaemon considered denying her words outright, but decided against it. He could push his fingers in if he wanted to, but seeing her genuinely scared killed his mood.

Instead, Daaemon moved his hands, firmly supporting her thighs, and slowly withdrew his shaft.

The thick pillar that had once again grown fully hard slid out, grazing against her inner walls. The stimulation from the slow movement seemed to ease the tension in Liv’s rigid shoulders.

Seeing her body go limp, Daaemon slid his long fingers back down. The entrance, which had just housed his shaft, had already closed up as if nothing had happened, though the sticky essence covering her opening was proof of their earlier activity.

“Now that I think about it, you do seem to like my hands.”

“What I like is… Ah…”

Daemon’s thick fingers parted her tender flesh. He couldn’t reach as deep as with his shaft, but the freedom with which he moved his fingers brought about a different kind of pleasure.

“Just rest a little longer, ugh!”

Inside, he felt something squishy. It wasn’t like the inner walls or her essence—it must have been his cum.

“Didn’t I say I would do my best to provide what you like?”

So now, he whispered that he would thrust his fingers in, as she liked, and smiled arrogantly.

Daaemon was willing to give her anything she liked—anything that could make her swoon in pleasure.

 



 

During a long, sticky night, Daaemon pushed thoughts of the canvas away.

However, it didn’t take long for that canvas—once almost forgotten—to resurface, its presence unmistakable. It all started when Liv’s outings grew excessively frequent.

Of course, ‘excessively’ was a highly subjective term for Daemon, as he barely left his estate compared to the average person. To him, even Liv had not previously seemed particularly fond of going out as often.

Thus, it was odd how frequently Liv had begun leaving the mansion.

The main reason for her outings seemed to be her meetings with Milion. According to the guard who escorted Liv, she did indeed meet with Milion. However, the guard was only responsible for accompanying her to the designated meeting location and waiting outside, so there was no way to know what the two talked about inside.

Should I assign someone to her again?

Of course, it wasn’t that Daaemon doubted Liv. What could she possibly be doing with Milion? The only activities they could be engaging in were sharing tea, listening to that child’s endless chatter, and…

And… Damn it! That’s probably all they’re doing, yet why do they meet so often?

Outwardly, Daaemon remained the same, appearing sarcastic and indifferent. Inside, though, his thoughts had flipped a thousand times over. In his head, he had long imagined storming the place where they met.

Had their meetings not taken place in the Pendance mansion, he would have turned that scenario into reality by now.

 

“Another outing?”

“Yes.”

“Have you taken up a new tutor position behind my back?”

“Of course not.”

Perhaps mistaking his comment for an awkward joke, Liv chuckled as she shook her head while preparing to leave. She was too busy getting ready to even look at him.

Liv, pressing a bonnet onto her head and tying the ribbon under her chin, suddenly looked back at Daemon, seemingly remembering something.

“…Um, I do go out a lot, don’t I?”

It seemed she had finally noticed his mood. There was a hint of unease in her large green eyes, blinking beneath the light brown bonnet embroidered with floral patterns. Her reddish-brown hair, styled in waves and hanging down, looked like a fox’s tail swishing back and forth.

…How could she look so lovely even now? Because of that, Daaemon couldn’t bring himself to utter anything harsh, not even in jest.

Liv wasn’t the one at fault. The clueless Pendance child probably pestered her into meeting. So, swallowing his displeasure, Daaemon answered briefly.

“Not really.”

Not wanting to reveal his discontent, Daaemon bit down on an unlit cigar. Unfortunately, he had no justifiable reason to stop Liv’s outings.

He really should hurry up with the marriage oath and establish her as the marchioness. His mounting frustration shifted towards Eleonore, who had been delaying their witness signature.

Camille Eleonore—that bastard was the root of all problems. From the very beginning, he had been the cause of everything. That filthy scoundrel who had deceitfully used multiple aliases to hide Liv…

Surely Liv hadn’t learned anything nefarious from him? Like how to keep secrets from him, or how to set up a hidden retreat… Could her missing canvas be in that secret place?

“I’ll be back soon.”

Completely unaware of what was running through Daemon’s mind, Liv gave a casual promise to return early before turning away. Daaemon watched her leave, chewing on the end of the unlit cigar.

Today again, she would meet Milion at the Pendance mansion.

Could there be a secret passage leading outside the Pendance mansion? One she used after dismissing the guard, slipping away through it…

Daemon, lost in these thoughts, laughed at himself.

“What an idiotic idea.”

Before meeting Liv, Daaemon had never been an imaginative person. His creativity was sorely lacking. Yet when it came to Liv, even the tiniest sliver of possibility bloomed into endless scenarios.

He really had become a fool. Irritated, Daaemon ran a hand through his hair, turning away.

“Philip, prepare the hunting grounds.”

 



 

It had been a while since Daaemon had last taken in the metallic scent of blood.

It had been ages since he last visited Berryworth Mansion. After indulging in hunting and soaking in hot water to ease his exhaustion, he had time to leisurely stroll through the arboretum.

He reached the greenhouse, filled with the fresh scent of greenery and earthy undertones. The flowers blooming in season decorated the inside beautifully, and the air was thick with their scent.

Despite this, his blue eyes remained indifferent. Neither the beautiful flowers nor the sweet fragrance moved him.

Come to think of it, after Liv had escaped, I spent quite some time here.

Memories surfaced of waiting helplessly for news about Liv, sitting idly in this place. Though the situation was entirely different now, the helplessness and irritation felt similar to back then.

“Shall I prepare some refreshments?” Philip, trailing at a distance to serve him personally, cautiously spoke up.

Daemon, sitting on a bench, replied in a cold voice, “Forget it.”

Daaemon never cared much for snacks. To be more precise, he derived little pleasure from eating. To him, food was something to be consumed out of necessity.

“Bring me some alcohol instead.”

It had been quite a while since he last had a drink. Not since finding Liv in Adelinde had he touched any alcohol—it had been quite some time.

As Philip went to prepare the drink, Daaemon leaned back on the bench, closing his eyes. His relaxed posture exuded decadence and ease.

Daaemon knew he was in a somewhat sensitive state.

He never noticed it when Liv was by his side, but her absence made his nerves stand on edge, almost unbearably so.

Although he had never shown it to Liv, the aftereffects, which had subsided for a while, began creeping back in with the increasing frequency of her outings. It wasn’t as if the scars ached or itched severely as before, but the sensation was still there, creeping in with an uncomfortable subtlety.

He never expected the symptoms to disappear overnight, not after having dealt with them for years. But only recently did he realize just how dependent he had grown on Liv.

Now, a new symptom seemed to have emerged, piled on top of the old.

An abnormal obsession with Liv. Paranoia, anxiety, delusions.

If this wasn’t a mental illness, what was?

To Daemon, this state of his was a genuine nuisance. It felt like carrying a loaded revolver without a safety mechanism, liable to fire off at the slightest mistake.

 Shall I bring Miss Rodaise here?” Philip asked subtly as he placed the whiskey and glasses on the table.

Daaemon glanced at him and filled his glass without answering. Philip didn’t press further and quietly left the greenhouse.

Time continued to pass, empty and meaningless.

What had he spent his days doing when Liv wasn’t around?

When he first arrived in Buerno, he was in such poor shape that he spent most of his time doing nothing in the mansion. Even after regaining his composure, he still didn’t engage in anything noteworthy.

At best, he would occasionally buy some artwork—though that wasn’t a regular activity. It wasn’t easy to find pieces that caught his interest.

Other than that, he spent his time hunting, drinking moderately, smoking cigars, or simply lounging idly.

Yes, that was everything. His days were originally filled with little ambition or meaning.

“I see.”

Realizing how aimlessly he had lived without any real purpose, he felt an unexpected sense of clarity. There had been nothing significant in his life in the past.

Without Liv, his life would truly be no different from being dead.

If that were the case, then his sensitivity was understandable—it was a matter of survival, after all.

Finding some justification for his mental instability made his unpleasant feelings a bit more bearable. It was easier for him to accept discomfort if it had a clear reason rather than lacking logic or justification. Furthermore, having a rational basis made it possible to persuade others of his argument.

In other words, Daaemon had now found a reasonable argument to present to Liv, who had just entered the greenhouse.

“You came back quickly.”

“I did say I’d be home early today.”

Liv was still in the same outfit she had worn when she left that morning.

“But why are you drinking here in the greenhouse…?”

“Your hairstyle has changed.”

“Huh?”

Liv, who had been reaching for the whiskey bottle, paused and looked up. Daemon, watching her wide eyes, spoke with a cold expression.

“This morning, it looked like a fox’s tail; now it looks like a horse’s.”

“…Excuse me?”

Liv’s clear green eyes filled with confusion. Instead of explaining his metaphor, Daaemon continued speaking in a dry tone.

“Did Lady Pendance show off her bathroom today?”

Liv’s expression wavered slightly. Daemon, who had been watching her closely, noticed the subtle change in her emotions. The confusion from his odd remark had been replaced by another kind of discomfort, as if he’d struck a nerve.

“Otherwise, why would you have bathed outside the mansion?”

Having confirmed his suspicion, Daemon’s lips twisted into a faint smirk, and his voice grew colder and heavier.

“Or did you go somewhere else?”

The casual follow-up question made Liv frown deeply.

“There are plenty of people who can verify where I went.”

She seemed genuinely hurt by Daemon’s suspicion, but he didn’t try to comfort her. Instead, he brought up the topic that had been tormenting his mind for days.

“Where is the canvas?”

“The canvas?”

Liv, unable to follow the sudden shift in topic, looked bewildered once again.

“The art teacher isn’t the type to lie to me, so it’s clear you took the canvas. But Philip couldn’t find it anywhere in the mansion.”

Daaemon hadn’t ruled out the possibility that the art teacher was lying, but he doubted the man would risk getting caught so easily.

On the other hand, if Liv had truly intended to move the canvas secretly, she wouldn’t have acted so openly. It was probably nothing, but just bringing up the topic made his emotions spiral.

“Has returning to Buerno made you feel suffocated again? Are you trying to stay out of my sight?”

That was understandable.

It wouldn’t be surprising if the past rumors in Buerno still haunted her, leaving some lingering scars. Perhaps old feelings had resurfaced, making her want to distance herself from him. Maybe she even missed her life before getting involved with Daemon.

Surprisingly, Daaemon wasn’t angry. He was simply trying to understand Liv’s state of mind rationally. After all, only by understanding could he convince her.

“I said I’d give you what you wanted, but not like this. Your actions are killing me. Fighting to stay alive is a natural instinct for any living being. So it’s only natural that I want to keep you in the mansion.”

Of course, rationality aside, his words came out more like a plea than an argument.

No, in truth, it was closer to begging than persuasion.

And he wasn’t even sure if his reasoning was logical. It might have been the strong whiskey he’d had after such a long time clouding his mind.

The only fortunate thing was that, despite everything, he still managed to keep up his usual cold and arrogant demeanor. If he had shown even a hint of vulnerability, he would have rather kept his mouth shut. Otherwise, who knew how much further his delusional thoughts might have spiraled?

In fact, Daaemon thought this was a good opportunity. Since the topic had come up, he might as well settle it clearly.

“If you really can’t stand it, out of pity…”

“Wait, wait!”

Liv, who had been listening to Daaemon absentmindedly, finally raised her hand to interrupt him. Seeing Daaemon fall silent, Liv spoke more firmly.

“You should give me a chance to respond.”

“Speak.”

Daaemon nodded slightly, his chin tilted upward—a gesture full of arrogance.

Seeing his attitude, Liv sighed heavily, pressing her forehead. Watching her, Daaemon subtly lowered his raised chin.

Without noticing his reaction, Liv rubbed her temples and began to speak.

“I didn’t realize taking the canvas would upset you like this. That was my mistake. I can see how it might have caused a misunderstanding.”

“A misunderstanding?”

“Yes, a misunderstanding.”

Liv emphasized the word ‘misunderstanding’ as she crossed her arms.

“The canvas is at the Pendance mansion. I borrowed Milion’s old art studio for a while.”

“The Pendance mansion?”

“Yes. I wanted to work on it separately, so I didn’t bring it to Langess mansion.”

“Why?”

If she needed a studio, she could have asked him. He would have transformed the entire Berryworth mansion into an art studio if she wanted.

Sensing his confusion, Liv explained further.

“I wanted to finish it secretly and then show it to you.”

There was no need to ask who she intended to show it to. Her gaze was fixed directly on Daaemon as she spoke, “And about my hair… I didn’t expect you to notice, but yes, I washed it. But it’s not what you think. I got paint in my hair while cleaning up, so I used their bathroom. I didn’t want you to find out I was painting, so I asked to use the bathroom.”

Liv fiddled with her hair as she spoke, then sighed deeply again. She took off her bonnet and placed it on the table, her shoulders slumping slightly with a hint of disappointment.

“It seems it was all for nothing.”

Muttering that she didn’t understand why this had to become such an ordeal, Liv shook her head. Then, she took the glass from Daemon’s hand and casually put it aside, closing the whiskey bottle.

Daemon, who had been watching her quietly, asked suddenly, “So, you’re not creating secrets to get away from me?”

“I don’t understand why you’d think that.”

Judging by how she moved the whiskey bottle and glass out of his reach, she seemed to believe his odd comments were the result of drinking.

Even if alcohol had played a part in loosening his tongue, it wasn’t the main reason.

This unstable mindset wasn’t because of the whiskey—it was because of Liv’s absence.

“It’s because you’re not here.”

Daaemon corrected Liv’s assumption bluntly, pulling her towards him.

“So don’t start anything secretive. Or if you must, at least hide it well.”

With Liv sitting on his lap and his arms wrapped around her waist, all his chaotic thoughts seemed to vanish like magic.

Liv, resting quietly in his embrace, answered calmly, “I’ll keep that in mind.”

His arms tightened around her without him even realizing it.

Daaemon lifted his head slightly to look at Liv, his eyes narrowing.

“…Are you declaring in advance that you plan to keep secrets?”

Even though he had told her to hide things thoroughly if she must, that had been an empty remark.

“Declaring? I’m sorry, but I’m a pacifist.”

Liv smiled gently at his reaction, wrapping her arms around his neck. Though their conversation could have soured her mood, she didn’t seem upset at all. If anything, she seemed to be growing more content.

Daaemon didn’t quite understand which part of their conversation had pleased her, but he supposed it was better than her being unhappy.

With that thought, he tightened his embrace around her, letting the alcohol dull his senses a bit more. A strange fatigue settled in, making everything else feel trivial. All he wanted now was to stay like this, holding Liv close.

 
Liv squirmed a bit in Daemon’s arms, but soon relaxed and leaned against him. She buried her face into the crook of his neck and began to whisper.

“When you said that my actions are killing you, you meant that being apart from me is unbearably difficult, right? It’s a common expression, but hearing it from you doesn’t make it sound light at all. So I’d appreciate it if you could avoid using such frightening words.”

Daaemon decided not to say that it wasn’t just a metaphor. That would only scare her even more.

Unlike his relaxed body, his mind grew clearer. Daaemon judged what Liv could and could not handle.

The nightmares that plagued him each night might invoke her sympathy, but the extreme obsession and delusions he struggled with would more likely evoke fear.

Liv was a woman who could accurately assess what she could and couldn’t handle. To avoid losing her again, Daaemon felt the need to manage his own instability, to ensure that his mental illness never became apparent.

Fortunately, she was by his side—a woman who served as a safety device for him.

Daaemon closed his eyes.

It’s fine. As long as the safety is on, the trigger won’t be pulled.

The revolver in his chest would not be fired.

 



 

Liv asked Daaemon on a date.

It was true. She spoke in a somewhat shy yet clear tone, saying, “I’d like to ask you out on a date.” And this, despite seeing each other every morning and eating dinner together every night!

They even agreed to meet at an outdoor location after taking care of their individual tasks, rather than leaving the mansion together.

Ever since Daaemon discovered that she had tried to complete a painting in secret, Liv no longer hid her work. Now, she openly announced she was leaving to paint, and today, she mentioned she would go to the Pendance mansion in the morning.

Though Liv didn’t say anything specific, Daaemon instinctively knew her painting was complete. Today would likely be the day she presented the finished piece as a gift.

“I want you to put extra thought into your outfit.”

“Should I wear something more elaborate?”

“Hmm.”

Daaemon rubbed his chin, narrowing his eyes as he stared at the prepared clothes.

Daaemon always felt pleased when Liv made requests of him. And this date proposal was, in its own way, also a request she made of him.

However, what made it different from her previous requests was that she was planning to give him something. Because of that, his feelings weren’t just pleased—they were complicated.

When it came to material things, Daaemon lacked nothing. Frankly, if not for Liv, there would be nothing else he desired. Liv surely understood this well. There was likely little she could give him that he didn’t already have.

So was that why she secretly painted for him? A painting by Liv was certainly a unique and special gift—something that couldn’t be obtained anywhere else.

If that were the case, then he needed to fulfill his role as the recipient properly.

“Alright, something elaborate.”

Daaemon resolved to make sure Liv wouldn’t be disappointed, even if it meant putting on an appropriate act. After all, the fact that she had asked him on a date for the first time was enough to make the occasion interesting.

 



 

The man stood out even from afar, his appearance splendid.

Typically dressed in black or dark shades close to black, today Daaemon wore a blue tailcoat, and that alone drew attention.

The smooth fabric resembled the piercing blue of his eyes, adding an icy quality to his look, while the finely crafted silver buttons and silver-thread embroidery lent an air of sophistication. Underneath, he wore a vest and shirt made of ivory silk, with his collar turned up and wrapped with a cravat.

The unusually voluminous cravat was fastened with a sparkling diamond pin. The glimpse of a handkerchief added a touch of elegance, making him look like a fine gentleman. The perfectly tailored trousers highlighted his long legs attractively.

But no amount of finery could overshadow his features.

His platinum-blond hair was elegantly swept back, revealing a smooth forehead. His brow furrowed slightly, likely annoyed by the attention from all directions. Yet, with his sharp nose, pale skin, lips pressed into a firm line, and defined jawline, it was inevitable that anyone who saw him couldn’t help but stare.

Even Liv, who had seen his face just this morning, stood frozen, gazing at him now. She found herself admiring his beauty all over again.

The feeling she had on the day they first met—when his appearance had stunned her into silence—resurfaced.

‘I’ll never get used to this…’

With that thought, Liv snapped back to her senses and took a step forward.

Daemon, who had been standing casually, holding his cane loosely, noticed her approach. For a moment, the previously indifferent look in his eyes gained a faint light, and Liv felt as though she was witnessing a statue coming to life.

“Liv.”

He even slightly lifted the corners of his lips. The smile was subtle, but it was enough to draw gasps from those secretly watching him.

Even from her vantage point, Liv could spot a few women stumbling behind a nearby alleyway. Seeing their flushed faces, Liv quickened her pace, feeling somewhat flustered.

“What brings you out here?”

Usually, he wouldn’t even get out of the carriage, let alone open the curtains.

From his expression, he clearly wasn’t pleased with the attention he was receiving. He could’ve just waited in the carriage.

Liv’s eyes drifted toward the waiting carriage nearby.

“You could have waited inside.”

“Since you were the one who asked me on a date, I thought it proper to at least step out of the carriage to greet you.”

Though Daemon’s thought process often deviated from common norms, there were times when he would take his wise butler’s advice to heart. It seemed today was one of those times.

Seeing Daemon’s puzzled expression, Liv averted her gaze slightly, murmuring, “Mr. Philemond’s suggestions aren’t always perfect.”

“Was this one wrong?”

Daaemon mumbled quizzically, clearly curious to understand. Instead of answering, Liv examined his attire again. Up close, it was evident that today’s outfit was more elaborate than usual. Even the cufflinks seemed meticulously chosen.

Normally, his fair and handsome face stood out against his dark coat, but today, even in this more elaborate coat, his face shone just as brightly.

Truly, it seemed as though the clothes were relying on the wearer for their splendor.

“Was Mr. Philemond also behind your outfit today?”

“No, but is this outfit wrong too?”

Daaemon raised an eyebrow and tilted his head slightly.

“Judging by the look on your face, it seems you approve.”

“…I couldn’t possibly say otherwise.”

No one in their right mind would call this look unappealing. If anyone did, they surely had issues with their eyesight.

Blushing slightly, Liv nodded honestly, and a faint smile played on Daemon’s lips.

“I thought so.”

Daaemon extended his arm to her.

“I look quite good in blue, don’t I?”

Liv placed her hand lightly on his offered arm, walking alongside him as she spoke, “I didn’t know you liked blue.”

For him to say, “It suits me well” implied that he had worn blue often or taken care to examine himself in it. Given how uninterested Daaemon usually was in his appearance, this revelation surprised Liv.

Catching her curiosity, Daaemon answered indifferently, “It was the color of my uniform.”

“The uniform you wore during your service?”

Liv’s eyes sparkled with interest. Without turning his head, Daaemon noted her reaction with a glance and spoke matter-of-factly.

“Everyone said it was a uniform made just for me.”

He didn’t say it boastfully—in fact, his tone was so dry it bordered on emotionless.

“It suited me so well that Philip couldn’t bring himself to discard it and kept it in storage.”

Liv imagined Daaemon in a uniform similar in color to today’s attire. Of course, it looked incredible—perhaps even more stunning in person. Beautiful, even.

Seeing Liv fall silent, Daaemon suddenly stopped walking. With her arm hooked around his, Liv had no choice but to halt as well.

She looked up at him with a puzzled expression, and Daaemon leaned slightly closer, his voice dropping low.

“Should I wear it in bed for you?”

In bed, wearing that blue uniform…

Liv’s eyes widened, her lips moving soundlessly. Without needing a mirror, she could feel the heat rising to her face. Her cheeks were surely flushed in an unbecoming shade of red, and she was too stunned to even think of covering them.

Daaemon watched her intently, his lips curving mischievously. There was a hint of mischief in his blue eyes.

“This seems to be the right answer.”

Liv, having missed her chance to refute him, quickly averted her eyes. To hide her embarrassment, she coughed awkwardly and tugged on his arm.

“Ahem, let’s get going.”

“Alright, where are we headed?”

Daaemon followed her lead easily, and Liv responded to him resolutely, “First, we’ll have lunch, then we’ll take a stroll, and after that, we’ll go on a flower boat ride!”

 



 

Once, Milion had boasted about building a beautiful flower boat and enjoying a boat ride on it—and eventually, she fulfilled that promise.

When Liv had been struggling to find the perfect spot for a special occasion, Milion had willingly lent her the flower boat. Thanks to Milion’s generosity, Liv’s plan for the date could be made even more beautiful.

After lunch, they took a light stroll to aid digestion, eventually arriving at the lakeshore. The sky was bathed in the colors of sunset, and the lake’s surface reflected warm hues, adding a sense of tranquility to the scene.

 The pre-prepared flower boat was quite large for just two people. They could sit far enough from the oarsman that, without raising their voices, they could easily have a personal conversation.

Daemon, seated against the backdrop of beautiful lilies and peonies, looked as if he were part of a painting. Liv, who had personally chosen the flowers, couldn’t help but smile in satisfaction.

“These days, young ladies are lining up just to ride the flower boat.”

Liv spoke in an excited voice as the boat slowly made its way toward the center of the lake.

“I thought you were only meeting that Pendance child.”

“Milion sometimes brought friends along.”

Though Liv’s visits to the Pendance estate had been primarily for her painting, they weren’t limited to that. As word spread that Liv was visiting the Pendance estate, some people made a point to visit just to see her. Liv had tea with a few of them who were close to Milion, considering it a form of thanks for Milion’s help in lending her the studio.

“Actually, some of the young ladies subtly asked to see you.”

Recalling those she met at the Pendance estate, Liv spoke cautiously, “But I refused.”

“If you wish it, I could show myself.”

“That’s…”

Daaemon disliked mingling with others, so his offer was undoubtedly a significant gesture. However, Liv had no intention of accepting his kindness.

In fact, the reason she had rejected the young ladies’ requests so flatly wasn’t only because of Daemon’s temperament.

“Do you know why I didn’t attend the reading session with you?”

Liv, who had been gazing at the softly rippling lake surface, took a small, deep breath. The farther they moved from the lakeshore, the more the only sounds they heard were the gentle splashing of water and the occasional call of distant birds.

This allowed their voices to reach each other more clearly.

“The truth is, I didn’t want others to steal glances at you.”

Not having the courage to look at Daemon, Liv lowered her gaze, fiddling with her skirt.

“We’re not yet married, and I can’t completely claim you as mine.”

The word “claim” felt so explicit that it made her face flush.

Despite mulling it over, Liv couldn’t find a better way to express it. What she wanted was the right to declare Daaemon as hers. The clear evidence that this man—the one who gave her such peace—would belong to her for the rest of her life.

“Teacher Marcel was right. We’re merely lovers, and no one knows what the future holds. You’re handsome, and everyone wants you.”

Of course, Liv wore the ring Daaemon had given her. However, this diamond ring alone couldn’t deter others from gazing at Daemon.

“So, I felt jealous in advance—over something that hasn’t even happened yet. Foolishly.”

Throughout Liv’s confession, Daaemon wore an expression she’d never seen before. It seemed he’d never imagined her feeling jealous.

Daemon, frozen like someone who had been struck, squinted as he asked, “Are you confessing this because you’re determined not to be jealous anymore?”

“No.”

Of course not. Liv couldn’t promise that she wouldn’t be jealous again. Instead of making that futile pledge, she decided on something else.

Liv took out the canvas she had prepared on the boat.

“I can’t afford an expensive ring like you.”

Daaemon seemed unsurprised as he took the canvas—perhaps he had already guessed it had something to do with this. He calmly unwrapped the cloth covering it.

Despite having braced herself, Liv felt embarrassed and ashamed when handing over her first completed work. She fidgeted with her fingers, hoping her flushed face would be mistaken for the glow of the sunset.

Finally, the revealed painting came into view. It was a clumsy first work, made with awkward brushstrokes and simplistic colors.

Liv, watching nervously, licked her lips.

“Instead, I’m giving you myself.”

It was a self-portrait.

Daaemon gazed at the canvas without a hint of a smile. Judging by his expression, Liv couldn’t tell what he was thinking or feeling.

Seeing him unable to take his eyes off the canvas, Liv grew anxious. She swallowed hard and spoke cautiously, “Honestly, I thought you might like this more.”

She had thought so, but now she was feeling less certain. Perhaps she should’ve painted Daaemon instead?

But the painting was already done, and she had given it to him. There was no taking it back, so Liv decided to proceed with her original plan.

Her green eyes, warmer than ever, gazed at the man.

“So, if you’re okay with it, will you have a beautiful wedding with me?”

Finally, Daemon’s gaze shifted from the canvas to Liv. His blue eyes shimmered like the lake beneath them.

Meeting his eyes, Liv’s nervous heart slowly calmed. She was able to smile as she finished speaking.

“So everyone can know we belong to each other.”

Daaemon stared at her without blinking. The time spent waiting for his answer felt like an eternity.

The calm she had barely regained began to deplete again. Just as Liv was starting to feel an unavoidable sense of unease at his stillness, Daaemon finally spoke—letting out a low sigh and murmuring.

“Ah, a grand wedding.”

If his quickly blinking eyes looked somewhat overwhelmed, could that be a misinterpretation?

Liv, watching him carefully, called out to him in a worried voice.

“Daemon?”

“A grand wedding, huh.”

“…Are you alright?”

Was her proposal for a beautiful wedding that shocking?

Liv began to feel embarrassed.

But hadn’t he also intended to marry her? Or did he plan on skipping the wedding?

Seeing Liv’s complicated expression, Daaemon spoke slowly, “Of course, I’m alright. I was just momentarily stunned by my own stupidity.”

“Stupidity?”

Without giving Liv time to ask, he murmured, covering his mouth with his hand.

“I was so focused on the marriage oath that I hadn’t even considered the wedding.”

He seemed genuinely shocked, his rare pale complexion betraying it.

Daemon, lost in thought for a while, finally nodded as if coming to a conclusion. It seemed his previously paralyzed rationality had begun to recover.

Returning to his usual cold and indifferent demeanor, he said, “We’ll need some time to find the most beautiful location in Buerno.”

“Yes.”

Of course, it would take time. Liv nodded in agreement, thinking it was only natural.

“So, shall we hold the wedding next week?”

Liv, who had been about to agree without hesitation, paused and asked again, incredulous.

“…Next week?”

“Ah, we’ll need to fit the dress too. It should be possible if the tailor works through the night.”

Daemon, having wrapped the canvas back up and set it beside him, seemed to genuinely ponder. His voice, drifting out as if talking to himself, was utterly serious.

“What else do we need? Rings?”

Seeing his earnest expression without a hint of playfulness, Liv frowned in astonishment.

“Wait a moment. Holding the wedding next week is impossible.”

“Why?”

“…Are you seriously asking that?”

Daemon’s face twisted in frustration at Liv’s question.

“You know I’m not a patient man.”

This had nothing to do with patience. Liv shook her head firmly.

“Even so, it’s not possible. I don’t want a rushed wedding. I want to plan it meticulously and invite everyone in Buerno. Plus, we need to call Corida.”

“Oh, yes. That’s something we agree on—especially your younger sister. She won’t be convinced until she sees with her own eyes that her sister is mine.”

Liv held back the question that rose to her throat—why exactly Corida needed to see it—instead focusing on calming Daemon, who looked ready to book a venue and order a wedding dress the very next day.

“If you don’t know, let me tell you. Adelinde School for Girls doesn’t allow students to leave during the semester. And the semester just started.”

Daemon’s already displeased expression soured further.

“You don’t mean to wait until she graduates, do you?”

“Even I can’t wait that long. But we can at least wait until the end of the semester, can’t we?”

Daaemon pressed his lips into a thin line. Seeing the dissatisfaction on his face, Liv suddenly thought he looked quite endearing. No one would agree with her, but that was how she felt.

Smiling without realizing it, Liv gently placed her hand over his. Daemon, as if he had been waiting for her touch, pulled her into his arms.

Looking up at him, Liv asked, “So, are you accepting my proposal?”

The question, though unnecessary, was one she wanted an answer to.

Daemon, tilting his head for a kiss, let out a small chuckle.

“Of course.”

It was an arrogant acceptance, befitting him.

 



 

In the center of the basement of the Langess mansion, a woman’s clumsy self-portrait hung in place of a nude painting.

The man who had hung the frame himself stood before it, lost in thought for a long while. It still felt as if the scent of lilies hung thick around his nose.

Whether the woman knew it or not, lilies were the purest flower, dedicated to those who had served faithfully until the very end. And now, surrounded by those noble flowers, he had received the most unique gift in the world—a moment he would never forget.

His heart was calmer than it had ever been. After staring at the self-portrait for a while longer, he slowly turned away.

A gentle darkness settled over the gallery.

At last, there was peace.

 The child was lost.

The realization came late, only after being swept away for a long time by the crowd. The surroundings were unfamiliar.

It all started because of the intoxicating songs and lively atmosphere that made the child wander about as if enchanted, drawn further by the sweet aroma. The child, now alone amidst adults wearing colorful and ridiculous masks, hugged a small basket of candies close.

It was the candy seller, who had given the basket to the child, thinking the child was cute, that had led the child this far into the unfamiliar plaza. The child had been overjoyed to receive the gift, only to realize the situation afterward, but by then, the candy seller had vanished.

 

“It’s the Harvest Festival, so there are lots of people around. Don’t cause trouble and behave quietly. If you act up, the scary man will come and get you!”

 

The child’s face darkened rapidly at the memory of their mother’s stern warning. To avoid meeting the “scary man,” the child had been good, listened well, and even ate all their food.

But now, it seemed today’s mistake might lead to an encounter with the scary man. The thought almost made the child cry. Tears began welling up as the child anxiously glanced around, hoping for help.

But the adults around were all too busy enjoying themselves. They either didn’t notice the child, or they didn’t see any reason to care. And approaching them was difficult—everyone was wearing a mask. Just when the child, holding back tears, was about to finally give in to sobbing—

“Are you alright?”

With a worried voice, someone bent down to meet the child. The child, momentarily forgetting about the tears, looked up wide-eyed. Staring blankly at the person who had addressed them, the child watched as they knelt to match eye level.

“Do you live around here? Where are your parents?”

The child opened their mouth unconsciously.

 

“Shh! If you’re good, the beautiful angel will come down and bring you a gift. Alright?”

 

Suddenly, the child realized—mother’s words were always right.

“Angel!”

“Huh?”

When the child exclaimed, the angel looked puzzled. The round, gentle brown eyes were so serene that the child, without hesitation, concluded this person was indeed a kind angel.

“Did you come to bring me a present?”

“…What?”

“But you don’t have to give me anything.”

At the child’s unexpectedly mature declaration, the angel frowned slightly.

“…Um, alright.”

“Instead, could you help me find my mom?”

When the child mentioned their mother, the reality of being alone sank in again, and the tears began welling up once more. They should have stayed by their mother. What if they met the scary man before finding her? It was terrifying to think how angry mother would be…

“You seem to be lost.”

The angel gently patted the child’s small shoulder, looking troubled while glancing around.

“Where’s your house? Do you remember where you lost your mom?”

“I got candy, but my mom wasn’t there.”

Seeing the basket of candy clutched tightly by the child, the angel chuckled.

“You shouldn’t just follow someone because they offer you candy.”

“A man gave it to me.”

“Still, if you wanted candy, you should have gone with your mom.”

“I’m going to share it with mom.”

“I see… well, that’s true. I’m not really in a position to talk, am I?”

The angel seemed to mutter something else but then nodded, seeming resigned, and stood up. They held out their hand to the child.

“Let’s get out of this plaza first. There are too many people here, and it’s not safe to stand around.”

After a moment’s hesitation, hugging the basket tighter, the child carefully took the offered hand. The warmth of the slender fingers spread through their grip.

Strangers might be dangerous, but angels are kind!

This isn’t disobeying mother’s words—so the scary man won’t come and take me!

 



 

Liv was lost.

After looking around the plaza three times, she concluded that Daaemon had gone missing while she had gone to a nearby shop for a moment. She had left him there to wait in the plaza.

She could imagine a few possible reasons.

Today was the Harvest Festival, and the streets were overflowing with people. Daaemon wasn’t in his usual carriage either. There were spontaneous parades popping up here and there, making it even harder to navigate. Everywhere, masked groups moved about in colorful clusters.

And she and Daaemon had decided to wear masks too, as he didn’t like being the center of attention. Ironically, this helped them blend in with the crowd.

Perhaps if they had brought a guard, things might have been different. But today was supposed to be just the two of them—Daaemon had decided they should try walking through the streets like a regular couple after seeing young lovers enjoying their time.

Riding a carriage with guards was comfortable, but they had wanted to blend in, just like the other couples. Liv agreed; it seemed fun to try for a change.

If only she had known this would happen, she would never have agreed to such an impulsive plan.

Or perhaps coming to a strange city to enjoy the Harvest Festival was the root problem.

An unfamiliar place, a festival, traveling on foot—in hindsight, it seemed like a recipe for disaster.

‘He hasn’t punched someone already, has he…?’

Just standing there, Daaemon exuded arrogance from head to toe—always a prime target for trouble. Normally, his face and status acted as a buffer, but today both were concealed. It wouldn’t be surprising if he had already gotten into a scuffle with someone.

Daaemon wasn’t one to avoid trouble when it came his way. If someone challenged him, he wouldn’t back down—he’d fight first and settle things later with money and status.

‘No, no. If there were a fight, it would be far louder than this.’

If Daaemon had gotten into a fight, there’d be no way for the surroundings to remain so peaceful.

Liv, arms crossed, scanned the plaza again. The exaggerated masks made it difficult to pick out faces.

When one was lost, the best course was to stay put. But in a place like this, surrounded by identical masks, staying still might not help—it could easily make her lost too.

Liv sighed, her frustration evident, and looked up. Returning to their lodgings and reuniting with Roman and the guards seemed the most sensible plan.

Liv had always had a good sense of direction. Before getting tangled up with Daemon, she had mostly traveled on foot. She could navigate by landmarks and find her way back even if she got lost.

But Daemon?

A man used to traveling by carriage was unlikely to navigate a strange city easily. Even if he had a better sense of direction than her, she doubted he’d return to their lodging alone, leaving her behind.

Finally deciding, Liv began to make her way out of the plaza. She had just started moving when she stopped again.

Amid the bustling crowd stood a small child, looking lost.

The child was probably here to enjoy the Harvest Festival, but they looked far too young to be wandering alone. Hugging a basket adorned with a cute ribbon, the child stood there, only about waist-high to an adult. The wide, frightened eyes darted around, and the lips were pressed into a pale line.

Liv scanned the crowd, searching for anyone who might be with the child, but no one stood out.

“Oh dear…”

Though she really should return to their lodging and find Roman to help her search for Daemon, she couldn’t ignore a child on the verge of tears.

“Are you alright?”

She couldn’t bring herself to turn away from the child who looked ready to cry at any moment.

Seeing the child look up at her in surprise, Liv was grateful she’d removed her mask before approaching. Surely, her face would be less intimidating than a masked one. And fortunately, the child warmed up to her more easily than she’d expected.

“What’s your name?”

“I’m Noah!” answered the child in a determined voice.

“I see, Noah. I’m Liv.”

“Yes, Angel!”

Hoping to correct the title, Liv had tried to introduce herself, but it was a spectacular failure. Seeing the child beaming up at her, Liv eventually smiled back. While the name “Angel” might be embarrassing if overheard, she couldn’t help but accept it.

At least being called an angel suggested that her appearance was kind enough. Finding comfort in that, Liv led Noah to a quieter corner.

“So, Noah, do you live in this city?”

“I came here by train with my mom.”

Oh, so they lived quite far away—far enough to need a train ride.

Liv sighed softly, easily understanding Noah’s words.

“It might be difficult for me to take you all the way home, so let’s get some help.”

Liv decided to find a patrolling officer first. Given it was festival time, there should be officers nearby—it wouldn’t require going all the way to the police station.

 Was it too naive to think finding an officer would help?

“It happens all the time.”

The officer seemed indifferent to Liv’s explanation that she had found a lost child. Instead, he looked rather uninterested, as if he had already handled numerous similar cases that day.

“You may not be aware of this, being a lady, but on days like this, there are many parents who abandon their children.”

“How can you be so sure? I told you the child is lost, not abandoned.”

The officer sighed, frustrated by Liv’s immediate rebuttal, but didn’t ignore her.

“Look at the kid’s shoes. Do those look like shoes meant for a child out having fun?”

Liv looked down at Noah’s shoes, which she hadn’t paid much attention to amidst the chaos. They were clearly worn and tattered, hinting at Noah’s circumstances.

But shoes alone couldn’t tell the whole story. Shoes wore out easily, especially for kids. However, when she also noticed the short, frayed pants and faded sleeves, Liv pursed her lips tightly. It was evident that Noah’s clothing was not suitable for a child his age.

His cheeks seemed a bit sunken too. Judging by how the ill-fitting clothes weren’t too tight, it was likely that he was undernourished overall.

“Unfortunately, there’s not much we can do. During the Harvest Festival, hundreds of people come and go from the city every day, so catching parents who came here just to abandon a child is nearly impossible.”

She was glad she had kept Noah away from hearing this conversation. Regardless of whether it was true, it would be too cruel for Noah to hear such words.

Liv looked at Noah, who stood watching them from a distance, with a troubled expression, and spoke calmly again.

“Perhaps their situation isn’t good, and they haven’t been able to provide properly. I want to help find his parents. Isn’t there anything that can be done?”

“Oh…”

The officer scratched his head, looking conflicted, then clicked his tongue before responding, “There’s been no report of a missing child today, so there’s not much information I can give you. However, if the child came here by train, it means he’s not a local, so I can contact the inns around the city to ask if his parents are staying there.”

Even that was a big help. Liv had been worried she might have to go to every inn, holding Noah’s hand, so she nodded gratefully.

“Thank you so much.”

The officer avoided her gaze and cleared his throat, seemingly flustered by Liv’s bright smile.

“Then please wait here for a moment.”

“Alright.”

Liv decided to stay at the makeshift patrol station with Noah while they tried to contact the inns. Though she was a bit worried about Daemon, who might be wandering around looking for her, it didn’t change her decision.

Daaemon was an adult, and Noah was a child—surely, Daaemon would understand.

No, he had to understand.

…Right?

 



 

He was lost.

Daaemon stopped calmly and looked around. It was clear that the place he found himself in now was not the original plaza where he was supposed to wait for Liv.

He had only moved slightly to avoid the rowdy crowd, who seemed to be laughing and shouting like madmen. While wandering, he had bought a bag of candies from a candy seller, intending to relive an old memory, and returned to find himself in a different place.

He hadn’t moved much, so how had the location changed?

Daaemon crossed his arms, trying to understand the baffling situation. The most likely culprit was the damned crowd. Even now, waves of people were brushing against his shoulders as they passed by.

Caught up in this human wave, he must have wandered through several alleys without even realizing it. To make things worse, every street had been decorated similarly for the Harvest Festival, making it difficult to tell one alley from another.

“Tsk.”

If he returned to the plaza now, would Liv still be waiting?

He didn’t know how much time had passed, but it was long enough for Liv to notice he was missing. Knowing her, she had probably realized he had been swept away by the crowd and had considered her options.

She could either wait at the plaza or return to their lodging.

Judging by the atmosphere, the crowd wouldn’t thin out even by evening, so staying in the plaza indefinitely wasn’t wise. Returning to the lodging seemed like the more sensible choice. Liv was likely to have chosen that option.

Yet, despite reasoning this out, Daaemon found himself naturally heading back towards the plaza—or rather, in the direction he guessed the plaza was.

He doubted that Liv, being the smart woman she was, would wait for him like a child, but seeing the plaza empty with his own eyes would at least put him at ease. And if, by chance, he did find Liv waiting for him, it would make him genuinely happy.

He wasn’t worried about not recognizing her because of the mask. He had made a special mark on her mask that only he could identify. At the time, he hadn’t thought much of it; it was simply because he didn’t want her to wear a mask identical to everyone else’s.

Who knew it would come in handy like this?

Daaemon strode confidently. Naturally, he didn’t ask anyone for directions to the plaza. Finding it on his own should have been easy enough. This wasn’t a massive city like the capital, after all—just a small provincial town.

And so, Daaemon got even more thoroughly lost.

It was the consequence of underestimating the monotonous appearance of the buildings and the streets packed with people half out of their minds.

 



 

“There’s no one looking for a missing child.”

“That can’t be true.”

“I’m sorry, but there’s nothing more we can do.”

The news they received after waiting was the worst possible outcome.

Seeing the officer’s apologetic face, Liv couldn’t press him further. It was already generous of him to take the time to investigate, especially with the crowds keeping him busy. There was nothing more she could ask of him—nor did it seem like there was anything more he could do.

“Um… just in case a report comes in later, could you leave a contact number where we can reach you?”

Liv gratefully accepted the officer’s kind suggestion and wrote down the contact information for her lodging. However, she wasn’t confident that she would receive any contact.

It didn’t feel like a good sign that, despite having spent quite some time with Noah since meeting him in the plaza, no missing child report had come in.

Liv glanced at Noah. Seeing something in her expression, the officer lowered his voice and whispered softly.

“If you’d like, you can leave the child here. If his parents come looking, we can hand him over immediately. It might be better to leave him with us.”

“And if they don’t come looking?”

“Well, then…”

The officer glanced at Noah. “Children like him usually end up in an orphanage. He’d probably be placed there temporarily. Given his age, where he can walk and communicate, he likely wouldn’t stay long.”

“Temporarily?”

“There are limits to how many children the orphanages can take in. As I mentioned, many parents abandon their children during the festival.”

Liv fell silent, biting her lip.

After a moment, she spoke calmly, “I’ll take care of him for now. Please contact me if there’s any news of a missing child.”

“It’s quite a burden…”

The officer sighed at her insistence, but Liv smiled, undeterred.

“Thank you for your help.”

After thanking the officer, who looked like he had more to say, Liv took Noah and left the patrol station. However, she didn’t get far before she had to stop. She glanced at Noah.

She had confidently declared that she would take care of him, unable to leave him alone. But now that she was outside, doubts crept in. She hadn’t even asked Noah what he wanted, which bothered her.

“Noah, it might take a bit more time to find your parents.”

Would it be better for Noah to wait at the patrol station instead?

But what if no one ever came for him, and he ended up in an orphanage, just as the officer said?

“Temporary placement” just meant they’d find an excuse to send him away. While some children in orphanages found kind adoptive parents, many did not. Some were even sold off as a means of making money—used for begging or worse.

The younger a child, the easier it was to exploit people’s sympathy. Liv knew this, and she also knew that those children often had gangs behind them, making it hard for ordinary people to help them.

If she wanted to ensure Noah didn’t end up like that, she had to help him now.

“…If you’d rather wait at the patrol station, you can. But if you’re okay with it, I’d like to stay with you for a while longer. Is that alright?”

Noah looked up at her worried face, clutching his basket of candies tightly, and answered, “Yes.”

“Are you sure?”

“Yes!”

There wasn’t a trace of worry in his innocent reply. Liv smiled as she gently patted Noah’s head.

“Are you hungry? Did you have lunch?”

“I had bread in the morning.”

 It was lunchtime, yet Noah’s answer referred to breakfast.

Without hesitation, Liv took Noah’s hand. During a festival, there was no shortage of food in the streets, so finding something to fill the child’s stomach wouldn’t be difficult. Most of the shops were packed with customers, but fortunately, Liv found a restaurant in a nearby alley where they could sit. The menu was simple—soup and soft meats—perfect for a child to eat.

As they settled at an outdoor table, Liv placed a napkin on Noah’s lap and asked, “Noah, what are your parents like?”

“Mom.”

“Yes, can you tell me about your mom?”

“Mom is…”

Noah frowned, fiddling with the candy basket and pursing his lips.

“You have to listen to Mom. If you don’t, the scary man will come for you.”

Liv nodded with a gentle expression. Noah’s response was oddly off-target, but thanks to their earlier conversations, Liv could easily understand his meaning.

So, in other words, his mom was strict.

Feeling satisfied that she had understood Noah, Liv smiled. It seemed she could now naturally lead the conversation without stumbling over what he said.

“I see. And what about your dad?”

“Mom threw him away.”

Liv’s determination to keep the conversation flowing smoothly was derailed in less than a minute.

Liv, who had missed her timing to respond, stared at Noah in shock. Noah, however, seemed oblivious to what was wrong.

It was possible… for a mom to leave the dad. Well, if a couple didn’t get along, they could split up, couldn’t they? He just expressed it a bit harshly.

While Liv was trying to rationalize Noah’s words, Noah beamed and added, “So now I’m meeting Dad number three!”

A third dad… That’s possible too. It’s not always easy to find the right person on the first try, so it wasn’t strange if there were a few failed marriages.

“But you know what’s amazing? Mom is number two.”

Number two… Wait, what?

“Mom number two said that if I don’t listen, Mom number three will come. That’s why I have to be good.”

“Let’s stop talking about your mom.”

Liv calmly stopped Noah from continuing. Fortunately, the food arrived just in time, and Noah’s attention quickly shifted to the warm soup. Moving the dishes around to prevent Noah from burning himself, Liv suppressed a sigh. The more she spoke with Noah, the more hopeless the situation seemed.

It felt increasingly likely that the officer’s words were true. What would she do if that really turned out to be the case?

Should she try to find a decent and proper orphanage for Noah now? But Noah was too small and young to be sent to an orphanage. Even if he could walk and communicate on his own, that was all he could do.

No, it hadn’t even been a full day yet. Wasn’t it too soon to conclude that Noah’s mother had abandoned him?

As she wrestled with her conflicting thoughts, Liv found herself momentarily setting aside her worries about Daemon, who might still be wandering the streets.

 



 

By the time Daaemon finally reached the plaza after wandering through an unfamiliar alley, the sun was already setting behind the rooftops.

He had walked through the crowded streets for longer than expected, which left his clothes looking rather disheveled. Anyone who knew how meticulous and fastidious Daaemon usually was would be shocked to see him in such a state.

Nevertheless, Daemon’s mental state remained surprisingly intact. Of course, he found nothing about his situation pleasing—the rude people bumping into his shoulders, the unknown stench lingering in the air, the incomprehensible mix of street noises—none of it.

But the fact that he was wearing a mask, and thus drawing fewer stares than usual, made it somewhat more bearable. Compared to all the eyes that usually followed him whenever he stepped out onto the streets of Buerno, this felt like true freedom.

Listening to Liv had indeed been the right choice.

Whose lover could she possibly be? She’s so intelligent and wise. If luck truly exists in this world, he must have used it all up by having someone so perfect, both inside and out, as his lover.

But it wasn’t just this that kept him steady. It was the thought of Liv, who must also be wearing her mask. She was a woman who caught everyone’s eye wherever she went, and if she had walked the streets today without her mask, amidst these drunken revelers, she would surely have been accosted within ten steps.

Knowing she was wearing a mask was a great comfort to Daaemon in her absence.

“As expected, she’s not here.”

As he had guessed, Liv was nowhere to be seen. She must have headed back to their lodging.

Daaemon finally turned to head back. Earlier, he’d struggled while wandering unfamiliar paths, but now that he’d been to the plaza once, he could find his way back directly.

Just as he started walking in what he was sure was the correct direction, Daaemon stopped abruptly, glancing to the side.

At the end of his gaze was an officer on patrol, holding a mask. Something about that mask drew Daemon’s attention.

It looked exactly like Liv’s mask. Of course, it was a common design, so it wasn’t surprising.

Understanding this, Daaemon was about to look away when his lips pressed into a firm line. Narrowing his eyes, he examined the mask in the officer’s hand more closely, then let out a dry laugh.

He must have been separated from Liv for too long if he was starting to see things.

“Hey.”

With his long strides, Daaemon closed the distance between himself and the officer instantly, his gaze cool as he looked down. Up close, it became even clearer. This was indeed Liv’s mask.

The officer, whose path had been blocked without warning, responded irritably without properly looking at Daemon.

“My shift’s over, so find another officer.”

“Where’s the owner of that mask?”

“What?”

“Where is the owner? Why is some random idiot holding that mask?”

The officer frowned at Daemon’s provocative words, glancing between the mask in his hand and Daemon. He then hardened his expression threateningly.

“It’s not anyone you know, so move along.”

“That’s impossible.”

He wouldn’t mistake the mask he had placed on Liv’s face that morning.

Daemon’s lips curled crookedly. The mask covered his expression, so the officer couldn’t see the change as he spoke in a threatening tone.

“So what if it is? I was about to return it anyway, so back off.”

As an officer, he seemed confident in his physical abilities, as he made a show of his broad arms while tucking the mask away.

“Or do you want to see how rough things can get?”

“Rough, huh?”

Daemon, who had been staring at the mask, finally looked up at the officer, a faint sneer in his blue eyes.

“Sounds good.”

Just what he had hoped for.

 



 

Liv stared at the man sitting in front of her.

“…I thought you might pick a fight, but with an officer…”

She hadn’t meant to voice her thoughts aloud, and when she realized she had, she hastily closed her mouth.

“I only called for Roman.” Daaemon frowned as he watched Liv, who stood speechless.

“I insisted on coming. How could I send only Sir Roman when you were here…”

Liv glanced around. A few older men in uniform looked flustered in front of Sir Roman, who stood expressionless. Behind them were a group of people glancing nervously in her direction…

“The police station, really.”

Daemon, at the police station!

To Liv, who was used to seeing Daemon, whose arrogance could intimidate even the police chief in Buerno, sitting here in a place meant for criminals was nothing short of shocking.

“Is this your first time visiting the police station?”

“I’m surprised that things escalated to the point where you had to come to the police station.”

Unable to wander the streets any longer, Liv had returned to their lodging with Noah. By then, it was nearly nightfall, and as expected, Daaemon wasn’t there.

Noah, who had looked exhausted since they left the restaurant, fell asleep almost instantly after Liv offered him a bed. Just as she was turning her attention to Daemon, a message arrived at the lodging. It was from Daaemon to Sir Roman: he was at the police station and needed to verify his identity, so they should prepare accordingly.

“Prepare accordingly” was Daemon’s way of saying to ensure everyone who had inconvenienced him faced appropriate consequences.

If it had been a minor altercation, it could have been handled at a nearby patrol station—but the police station?

Hearing the message with Sir Roman, Liv had hurriedly put on her coat. On the way to the police station, she couldn’t help but feel a pang of guilt. She should have gone to look for Daaemon sooner.

It was clear he had gotten into some major trouble.

Hopefully, he wasn’t hurt anywhere.

 When Liv arrived, worried about what she might find, she was greeted by Daaemon sitting with his legs crossed, looking completely unbothered. Behind him, an officer whose face was so swollen it was almost unrecognizable was gesturing angrily. Roman approached, whispered a few words, and the officer quickly backed down.

“Honestly, I’m amazed you’re here at the police station so willingly.”

“Well…”

Daaemon tilted his head slightly. The officer, who had been hunched in his chair, flinched when he caught Daemon’s gaze.

“Targeting a vital point is cleaner than a bothersome fistfight.”

It looked like there had already been some troublesome fighting, though. Or rather, it seemed more like Daaemon had dealt the blows unilaterally.

Following Daemon’s gaze, Liv turned her head. When the officer, his face a patchwork of bruises, spotted her, his eyes widened. He looked at her with fervent desperation, clearly wanting to say something but unable to approach, scared of Daemon.

Wait a second—something about his face looked familiar.

Just as Liv tilted her head, trying to remember, Daaemon suddenly pulled her hand, causing her to fall onto his lap. Twisting his body, he blocked her view of the officer entirely.

In that instant, every gaze in the police station turned towards them. Though those who met Daemon’s fierce glare quickly averted their eyes, it was enough to make Liv feel utterly embarrassed.

“…Just say it instead.”

“Say what?”

“Even children don’t get jealous like this.”

When Liv pointed out his childish behavior, Daaemon responded with a cynical smile.

“Jealous? Me? Over that guy? Impossible. I just wanted to hold my lover on my lap, that’s all.”

What could she do if he insisted on that? After trying to squirm off his lap a few times, Liv realized that his arm wrapped around her waist was quite firm. It seemed she would have to stay in this awkward position until all issues at the police station were resolved.

Well, knowing Daemon’s separation anxiety, this level of fuss was quite mild.

Liv resigned herself and asked the question that had been on her mind all this time.

“What happened that led to an altercation with an officer?”

On the way here, she had been shocked to learn whom Daaemon had gotten into a fight with. Liv had imagined he might have clashed with a passerby—just someone brushing against his shoulder—but it seemed her imagination had been rather lacking.

At Liv’s question, Daaemon frowned deeply and answered seriously, “That man isn’t just an officer—he’s a deranged stalker. It’s a serious problem when someone like him is responsible for the city’s safety. I went through the trouble of coming here for the city’s sake. The police chief should be thanking me.”

Liv listened quietly, then looked at him, puzzled.

“A stalker?”

This was surely their first meeting, so how could Daaemon know the officer was a stalker? Had he witnessed the officer secretly following someone and caught him in the act?

…But Daaemon wasn’t the type to be kind and just, helping out with other people’s stalking issues.

As Liv’s face showed her confusion, Daaemon answered proudly, his voice laced with irritation.

“Yes, your stalker.”

“…Whose stalker?”

“That guy knew your lodging address and contact information. He even stole your mask, using the excuse of returning it to approach you. How did you even lose your mask?”

Only after hearing this did Liv realize why the officer’s bruised face looked so familiar. He was the very same officer from the temporary patrol station she had approached for help with Noah.

“When I questioned him, he spouted nonsense, claiming you left it on purpose. He even went so far as to impersonate an acquaintance, saying he knew you.”

Daaemon brazenly concluded that his actions were justified because he’d stopped a dangerous individual before he could cause harm. Judging by Roman’s expression as he spoke to the officer in Daemon’s place, they might just succeed in getting the police chief to issue a commendation.

Was it really okay to tell Daaemon the truth, given how convinced he was that he had acted heroically?

Feeling overwhelmed, Liv hesitated before cautiously speaking up.

“He really does know me. I think he misunderstood when I accidentally dropped the mask.”

Daaemon tilted his head slightly, his narrowed eyes glinting with a cold light.

“So you’re saying his advances were genuine?”

“Advances? No! It wasn’t like that. I just briefly asked for his help in the plaza!”

When Liv quickly corrected him, Daaemon nodded indifferently.

“Of course, you wouldn’t entertain advances from someone like that with me by your side.”

“…Ha.”

Just a few sentences in, and she already felt drained. How was she going to explain about Noah, who was currently sleeping peacefully at her lodging?

Liv, her head pounding, eventually decided it didn’t matter. Daaemon had always been this kind of man, and she had chosen him despite it all. There was no use getting worked up over it now. She knew from the beginning that he was merciless to everything except her…

If she gently coaxed him with a look, he’d reluctantly agree.

Liv knew this well. Once again, he would give in to her.

 



 

The sound of a crying child could be heard outside the lodging.

Recognizing the source of the crying, Liv hurried to enter, but Daaemon beat her to it, striding in first. The loud wailing that had echoed from inside abruptly stopped. It seemed they were startled.

But that didn’t last long. A sharper, even louder wail erupted almost immediately. No matter how she looked at it, Daemon’s presence was making the crying worse.

It had only been five minutes since she had asked Daaemon not to startle or threaten the child. She had emphasized it repeatedly on the carriage ride back, and he had said he understood. But from the start, everything had gone wrong.

“Waaaaah!”

Liv rushed into the room as the child wailed as if their breath might give out at any moment.

The room was a mess. Noah, who seemed to have been woken from sleep, sat in the middle of the bed, surrounded by several large men who were sweating nervously. Blankets that Noah had likely kicked away were strewn across the floor, and small ornaments that had been on the bedside table lay scattered.

Amidst all this, Noah continued crying, his face flushed red. It looked like he’d been crying for quite some time—his eyelids were puffy.

The men, who had been glancing nervously at Daemon, turned to Liv as she entered, their expressions apologetic.

“We tried to calm him down, but since it’s an unfamiliar place, he wouldn’t settle…”

It wasn’t so much the unfamiliar place, Liv thought, as it was these large men surrounding the bed that was the problem.

It had been a mistake to leave Noah with Roman’s men in her rush. She should have asked the lodging staff for a female attendant’s help.

“Tsk. Can’t even manage a child…”

Clicking his tongue in frustration, Daaemon approached the bed. Noah, his eyes brimming with tears, recoiled further and wailed even louder.

“Waaaah! I don’t like this bad man! Don’t take me away!”

Daemon, now standing by the bed like the other men, wore an irritated expression.

“They say children like beautiful people.”

So was he questioning why Noah wasn’t stopping his tears at the sight of his handsome face?

Daaemon was indeed attractive, but his cold, sharp features, full of irritation, likely looked quite threatening to a child.

“I’ll calm him down. Please step outside.”

Seeing that Noah’s cries were only intensifying, Liv intervened. The men surrounding the bed withdrew immediately, but Daaemon showed no intention of leaving.

Liv spoke firmly to Daemon, who stared at Noah with disdain, “Daemon, I don’t think you’re helping right now.”

“Ha!”

The Marquis Dietrion, an elite retired officer who had never once heard he wasn’t helpful, scoffed. But he could hardly ignore the fact that Noah, who had almost stopped crying, began wailing harder every time he saw him.

Reluctantly, Daaemon stepped back, still glaring disapprovingly at Noah. Only then did Noah, face flushed, manage to spot Liv.

“Angel… This bad man came to take me away!”

“Noah, calm down. It’s not like that.”

Having learned earlier just how terrifying “bad man” was to Noah, Liv quickly reassured him.

And as she did, she thought to herself.

Daaemon being called a “bad man” actually suited him quite well, surprisingly.

 Noah quickly calmed down in Liv’s embrace.

After putting the red-nosed Noah back to sleep, Liv left the bedroom, where Daaemon was waiting for her in the sitting room outside. Roman and his subordinates, who had received orders from Daemon, had already vacated the area.

“If you wanted to find the child’s parents, you should have told me. You probably wasted time dealing with that incompetent officer.”

Of course, Liv knew that if she had told Daemon, things would have been handled much faster and more effectively than with the officer. But ultimately, it would have been Daemon’s subordinates carrying out the work, and Liv didn’t want to burden those already weighed down by their demanding master.

“I’ll have it sorted within a day.”

Daaemon declared confidently. And Liv could easily imagine him giving the order to his subordinates: “Find that child’s parents immediately and bring them here. You have one day!”

Liv made a mental note to arrange extra bonuses for Roman and his men, who had come all the way out here to escort their master’s date without even getting a chance to rest. Otherwise, even someone as stoic as Roman might one day decide he’d had enough and quit without warning.

“Thank you, Daemon.”

“It’s not you who should be thanking me—it’s that child.”

“He’s too young to understand such things.”

“Do you really think he doesn’t understand?”

Liv pursed her lips in response to Daemon’s question. Noah was still very young, certainly not old enough to grasp adult motives, greed, or ugly selfishness.

But that didn’t mean he was foolish.

“Children are cunning. Especially when they’re young and vulnerable, they instinctively seek out the safest refuge.”

The proof was that Noah clung only to Liv out of all the people in the city. He must have instinctively known that she would never abandon him.

But was that a bad thing? Noah was far too young to survive on his own.

“If you keep acting so coldly, he’ll keep calling you ‘that bad man.'”

“What do you want to do, then?”

Daaemon lit a cigar, murmuring with a hint of sarcasm.

“You went through all the trouble of coming here, only to find the parents who abandoned the child and hand him back over?”

“They might not have…”

The faint hope that they might not have abandoned Noah never made it past her lips. Seeing her crestfallen expression, Daaemon gently stroked her cheek.

“Miss Rodaise, righteous and kind. You have the power to make anything happen—it’s not even that difficult. All you have to do is command your man.”

His low voice carried a cool, cynical tone, but there was something oddly seductive about it, like the way his large hand naturally moved to massage the back of Liv’s neck.

“I will gladly serve you.”

“It’s not an order.”

“Fine. Whether it’s an order or a request, it makes no difference.”

Daaemon smirked, scoffing at the idea that the phrasing mattered.

Indeed, what difference did it make what words she used? The fact that he would do anything she asked remained unchanged.

“No one would believe that you are the great Marquis Dietrion at this rate.”

“That, too, is of no importance.”

Liv leaned naturally into Daemon, her body practically in his arms. When she looked up at him from that position, Daaemon gave a small smile, his eyes softening.

“Just use me as you wish. But let me remind you—a wise superior always rewards and punishes appropriately.”

“I said it’s not an order. Ugh. What kind of reward do you want?”

Daemon, who had been murmuring in Liv’s ear, moved his lips to her neck and slowly began to speak.

“Well, first of all…”

Creak.

“Angel?”

“Oh, Noah! You’re awake!”

Pop!

Liv wriggled out of Daemon’s arms faster than she ever had before and hurried over to the bedroom.

Daaemon stood there with an incredulous look, his arm still frozen mid-air. Liv, seemingly unaware of his gaze, was busy comforting Noah, who peeked out from behind the door.

Feeling the warmth he’d just had in his arms suddenly vanish, Daemon’s already sour mood took a turn for the worse.

“…First of all, we need to decide what to do with that child.”

Grumbling to himself, Daaemon bit into the cigar he’d been holding. Meanwhile, Noah, who had fully emerged into the sitting room, peeked at Daaemon from behind Liv’s skirt.

“Angel, are you friends with that bad man?”

“He’s not a bad man—he’s the one I love. He’ll be my husband soon.”

Liv gave Daaemon a stern look as she spoke—a look that clearly said not to smoke in front of the child. Daaemon could have ignored it, but he didn’t. Not because he particularly enjoyed being introduced as her future husband, though it was true. After all, they had set the date for their wedding, and this was one of the last dates they’d have as lovers.

“Why did you wake up? Were you scared to sleep alone?”

“I wanted to give this to you, Angel. I couldn’t let anyone else take it, so I’m giving it to you now.”

Noah shyly offered something he’d been holding close to his chest—a basket of candy.

“I was going to eat it with my mom, but I’ll give it to you first, Angel.”

With that, Noah took the biggest, prettiest candy from the basket and handed it to Liv.

Liv smiled as she accepted the candy, then glanced at Daemon.

“Just me?”

Would he be upset about not getting any candy? Daaemon folded his arms, watching Liv fuss over him. He would have refused it anyway, but since she was looking out for him, he decided to see how Noah would react.

Noah’s gaze shifted from Liv to Daemon. Standing there, pink sleep marks still visible on his cheeks, Noah blinked and then reached into the basket.

Holding two candies in his small hand, Noah offered them to Liv instead of approaching Daemon.

“These are for the baby.”

Liv looked down at the two candies placed in her palm, not quite understanding.

Daaemon scowled and interjected, “The baby?”

Noah flinched, his shoulders shaking under Daemon’s intimidating voice. But he didn’t seem inclined to give up his candy, holding the basket close to his chest. After rolling his eyes nervously for a while, Noah made a peace sign with his fingers.

Daemon’s eyebrows shot up at the gesture.

“I gave you two.”

Liv still didn’t quite understand and stared blankly at Noah, while Daaemon casually tossed aside the cigar he’d planned to smoke.

“Alright. I’ll invest in you.”

“What?”

Surprised by his sudden declaration, Liv asked in confusion.

“You’re young, but you show promise. That kind of insight isn’t easy to come by at your age.”

“…Insight?”

It felt like she’d misheard something. Liv stared at Daemon, incredulous. Surprisingly, there wasn’t a hint of humor on his face.

Daemon, still looking down at Noah with a haughty expression, raised one corner of his mouth in a smirk.

“If I support him, you won’t have to worry about this child anymore, right?”

“Well…”

That was true.

Liv looked bewildered, as if Daaemon had struck some sort of agreement with a child twenty-five years younger than him without her realizing. Yet Daaemon remained completely unfazed, mentioning that he’d ask Adolf to prepare a sponsorship contract.

A sponsorship contract, of all things?

Still feeling uneasy, Liv led Noah back to bed. The child, who had secured Marquis Dietrion’s sponsorship with just two pieces of candy, had no idea what a great achievement he had accomplished as he was led back to bed by Liv.

 

A few days later, after the harvest festival date, a new seat was added to the carriage taking Daaemon and Liv back home. It belonged to Noah Leblanc, the only protégé of the Marquis Dietrion.

And on the day Noah had lived at the Langess mansion for a year, the Marquis and Marchioness Dietrion welcomed their beautiful twin daughters into the world.

It was a joyful coincidence brought about by two pieces of candy.

…Or perhaps it was the result of an innocent insight?

 Liv had fallen from a horse.

It happened just three months before their wedding.

 



 

Bang!

“Where is Liv?!”

Upon hearing the news, Daaemon canceled all external engagements and rushed back to the Langess mansion. Thierry, who had arrived earlier and was organizing her medical bag, stood up. Philip, who had been standing nearby with a worried expression, spoke in a heavy voice.

“You’re here.”

“How is she?”

“Aside from her arm being injured, she has no major external injuries. She instinctively shielded her head when she fell, which is why it wasn’t worse. Frankly, it’s a miracle it ended like this.”

“It’s not a miracle—Liv is smart and protected herself,” Daaemon retorted sharply, his eyes sweeping the room with a fierce gaze.

“Where is the attendant?”

“…There was no one with her at the time of the fall.”

Daemon’s expression turned cold at those words. His sharp gaze bore into Philip.

“No one was with her?”

“She sometimes enjoys light walks on her own…”

Liv had never been accustomed to being waited on by others, and she often liked wandering freely by herself. The vast private grounds surrounding the Langess mansion were perfect for such leisurely activities—including horseback riding.

However, that explanation did nothing to calm Daemon’s anger.

“I can’t believe the staff at my mansion are working so carelessly. Unbelievable.”

“I apologize.”

Instead of making excuses, Philip bowed his head. Thierry then intervened.

“Marquis, please lower your voice for the patient’s sake.”

Daemon, who had been frowning, turned his gaze toward the bed. Except for the bandage wrapped around her arm, Liv appeared to be peacefully asleep.

Falling from a horse is a dangerous accident that can easily be fatal. Considering that she only injured her arm, they were incredibly fortunate.

Liv had never been a skilled rider, and she likely knew her limits and rode slowly. Judging by where she fell—a spot with lots of shrubbery—it seemed the foliage had softened her landing.

Daaemon turned his gaze back to Thierry. “Are you sure she’s alright?”

“Yes, I’ve checked all her external injuries. We’ll conduct further tests once she wakes up…”

Thierry was explaining calmly when they suddenly heard a soft groan.

In an instant, Daaemon rushed to the bedside. Liv, who had been lying still with her eyes closed, furrowed her brow slightly.

Daaemon gently stroked her forehead.

“Liv.”

As if responding to his voice, her eyelids fluttered. Moments later, with a soft sigh, her green eyes slowly opened.

She blinked slowly, her gaze unfocused, staring blankly at nothing. Gradually, as she regained her senses, she began to look around.

Light returned to her eyes as she processed her surroundings. With a faint look of confusion, Liv tried to sit up but immediately winced in pain, her brows knitting together.

“Wait, don’t move your arm.”

Daaemon quickly comforted her.

“Where…”

“Can you see me? Are you hurt anywhere else?”

Daaemon leaned forward, scrutinizing her face closely. But when their eyes met, he froze. Liv subtly pulled her head back, avoiding his touch.

Daemon, staring intently into her clear, transparent eyes, suddenly felt an ominous premonition.

In the chilled silence, Liv cautiously parted her lips.

“I’m sorry, but who are you?”

Philip looked at Liv with a shocked expression, and Thierry turned pale in disbelief.

Liv looked around at the visibly startled people, her brow furrowed in confusion.

“Where is this…”

Daaemon slowly straightened up. His face, now devoid of any emotion, looked cold. The atmosphere in the room grew even frostier.

“I take back what I said about it being a miracle. It seems she’s not alright after all.”

For the first time in her life, Thierry revised her diagnosis.

 



 

Standing under the bright sunlight pouring in through the large window, Liv stared blankly ahead—toward the entrance of the mansion.

From time to time, she gently touched the bandages on her arm, her expression distant. Then, all of a sudden, her face brightened. Moments later, the door to the sitting room burst open, and someone rushed in.

“Sister!”

With a pale face, Corida ran toward Liv. She was about to throw herself into Liv’s arms but froze when she saw her bandaged arm.

Liv was equally startled. She used her uninjured arm to cup Corida’s cheek, scolding her with a worried expression.

“Corida, you shouldn’t run like that! What if you collapse?”

Corida’s eyes widened at Liv’s gentle touch, as if handling fragile glass. Liv, unaware of Corida’s changing expression, anxiously examined her complexion and body. Feeling a bit embarrassed by the fuss, Corida hesitantly removed Liv’s hand.

“So it’s true that you lost your memory. Sister, I’m fine now. I’m healthy.”

“What?”

“A new medicine was developed. My condition has improved significantly—I’m almost like a normal person now. I’m healthy enough to live in a dormitory.”

“A dormitory? My goodness, how could you stay in a dormitory…!”

“Don’t you remember attending my entrance ceremony? You watched me move into the dormitory.”

Liv faltered, struggling to respond as she met Corida’s worried gaze.

“I… um…”

Confusion clouded her face, and Corida, watching her, let out a sigh.

“I heard you’ve lost a few years of memories.”

“It seems so,” Liv nodded, accepting the truth.

Corida set her jaw with determination. “Sister, I’m on your side, no matter what. Do whatever you want. If you want to leave here right away, do so. I’ll get you a ticket for the farthest train.”

Liv tilted her head slightly, observing Corida with a puzzled expression.

“Did I dislike this place that much?”

“Huh? …No, I don’t think so.”

“Then why are you saying that?”

“Well…”

Corida, still holding her fists, blinked and avoided Liv’s gaze, awkwardly clearing her throat to cover her discomfort.

Liv, not missing Corida’s reaction, narrowed her eyes. Her tone was firm as she questioned Corida.

“Corida, did something happen between the owner of this mansion and me? Do you know?”

“Well, um…”

Corida hesitated, stepping back cautiously, pretending not to hear. Just as Liv was about to press her further, a cold voice came from the doorway.

“Shouldn’t you be asking the person involved?”

Liv and Corida both turned their heads at the same time.

Standing tall with a strong build, Daaemon blocked the doorway, leaning on a cane. He frowned at Corida before turning his gaze to Liv.

“Why are you asking someone else about what happened between us?”

His voice was so cold that Corida involuntarily flinched. But the person he was addressing remained calm and collected, as if she felt no fear.

“She’s not someone else. She’s my only family.”

“Your family…”

Daemon, who had begun to speak quickly, clenched his teeth, pausing. He took a deep breath and continued in a restrained voice.

“You may not remember, but we are engaged. That makes me your family as well.”

Liv looked at him with a wary expression, and suddenly seemed to remember something, her eyes blinking rapidly before she lowered her gaze.

“I can’t quite grasp that part yet. I sincerely apologize for unintentionally being rude…”

“You are the only one allowed to be rude to me.”

Daaemon cut her off, gripping the handle of his cane tightly. His face grew increasingly rigid, reflecting his displeasure at the palpable distance between them.

“No matter what you do, there’s no need to apologize.”

“Alright, I will try to understand.”

Regrettably, this was the best response Liv could offer.

 “Ha.”

Daaemon finally let out a sigh. He roughly ran his hand through his bangs, his frustration evident as he spoke in a restrained tone.

“Just talk freely.”

With that, he turned on his heel and disappeared. Liv watched him leave, a look of bewilderment on her face, before turning to Corida.

“Corida, was I really engaged to him?”

“Yes.”

“How could that even be possible?”

She looked utterly unable to comprehend it.

Corida, watching Liv with an odd expression, awkwardly smiled and murmured, “Well, sister, I always thought you were far too good for him. But now… he does look a bit pitiful.”

Corida didn’t specify whom she meant, but it was obvious. It was also an answer to Liv’s repeated questions.

Yes, Liv had indeed been in love with that impossibly beautiful man and had even been on the verge of marrying him. It still felt completely incomprehensible from beginning to end.

“Why would he…”

“Sister, do you not remember him at all? Did you forget even his name?”

Liv looked troubled at Corida’s question.

Now that she thought about it, from the moment she first opened her eyes and saw that stranger and the unfamiliar surroundings, she hadn’t even managed to ask his name. He probably hadn’t had the chance to introduce himself either. After all, to him, his lover, who had been sweetly greeting him just that morning, had suddenly woken up and treated him like a stranger.

“All I heard was that he is my fiancé and future husband.”

Corida clicked her tongue in understanding, crossing her arms as she spoke calmly, “He’s Marquis Daaemon Dietrion.”

“What?”

Liv looked at Corida in disbelief, and Corida continued in a firm voice, “And you are soon to be the Marchioness Dietrion.”

…She was supposed to be what?

For a moment, Liv was utterly speechless.

 



 

Daemon, who had always hated even leaving the mansion for work, hadn’t left the Langess mansion at all since Liv’s fall from the horse.

Though he couldn’t bring himself to openly watch over Liv, he kept a constant distance—close enough to respond instantly if anything happened. As a result, his aides had to come and go from the Langess mansion for work reports.

It had become common knowledge among Daemon’s aides that he was practically acting as Liv’s personal servant, always standing by. Naturally, they also became aware of Liv’s condition.

“Shouldn’t you postpone the wedding?”

Roman, who couldn’t stand it anymore, cautiously suggested. Charles, who was also present for the report, jumped in shock and scolded him.

“Are you out of your mind?”

They had all witnessed what Daaemon had been like after temporarily losing Liv. Though the circumstances were different this time, the emotional toll on Daaemon was similar. Charles knew how deeply the previous incident had affected Daemon.

Charles shot Roman a scolding glance. But it seemed Daaemon hadn’t heard a word of their exchange, as he continued staring through the trees.

From where he stood, he could see Liv slowly walking through the garden.

After spending a week in conversation with her sister, Corida, Liv had finally begun to explore the mansion, as if her curiosity about the place had been piqued. She moved cautiously, looking around.

During that week, Daaemon had deliberately avoided speaking to her. It wasn’t just the hurt from seeing her discomfort every time she saw him—he feared she might decide to leave the mansion entirely, unable to bear the pressure.

Since he didn’t approach her, Liv didn’t approach him either. She seemed almost indifferent to his presence, as though she’d forgotten he existed.

Charles could see that Daemon’s patience was nearing its limit. The fact that Daaemon was receiving reports outside the mansion, in the path leading to the garden, was evidence of that.

And Daaemon wasn’t even pretending to be interested in the report—it was clear he was simply waiting for Liv to appear, glancing repeatedly at the garden’s entrance.

When Liv finally approached, close enough to notice Daemon, he clasped his hands behind his back, pretending to be casually engrossed in Roman and Charles.

Charles nudged Roman, who looked bewildered. Acting natural, Charles held out a document.

“It’s news from the capital.”

“But I already reported that… Ugh.”

Charles jabbed his elbow harder into Roman’s side, flashing a dependable smile at Daemon. Daaemon glanced at Charles, nodded, and took the document, his face showing a hint of satisfaction. Charles’ eyes lit up with a sense of accomplishment—surely he’d earn a bonus this month!

“Ah, Liv.”

Daemon, pretending to have just noticed Liv, called out to her.

Liv, who had seemed intent on passing by quietly, hesitated when she met his gaze. She bowed her head politely in greeting. Though her manner was clearly formal and distant, Daaemon maintained a composed expression.

“How are you feeling?”

“I’m alright. Thank you for your concern.”

“It’s not something to be thankful for—I’m just checking on my lover’s wellbeing. If anything, you should blame me for failing to prevent the accident.”

“Oh.”

His words, meant to convey a desire for a less formal interaction—even frustration that she wasn’t more comfortable around him—were lost on Liv, who simply gave an awkward half-smile and stayed silent.

Watching the exchange, Charles and Roman could barely contain their discomfort. They wanted nothing more than to leave immediately. Thankfully, Daaemon soon gave them a glare that clearly meant “get out,” and they gratefully turned to leave.

“Please, take your time to talk. We’ll be off!”

Before Liv could protest, the two men hurriedly fled, practically running.

Liv watched them disappear, then lowered her gaze, clasping her hands together in front of her. She hesitated for a moment before slowly beginning to speak.

“I, um, spoke with Corida briefly. You are Marquis…”

“Daemon.”

Daaemon cut her off, his voice carrying a hint of irritation. Liv, who had been looking down, quickly lifted her head to look at him.

“Pardon?”

“You should call me Daemon.”

“…Me?”

Her incredulous response made it clear she couldn’t believe it, and that twisted something inside Daemon. He put extra emphasis into his voice as he continued.

“Yes. You are the only woman to whom I have given that privilege. You are my first and last lover, and soon you’ll be my one and only family.”

Liv seemed to understand his intention behind emphasizing each word. After a moment of contemplation, her expression slightly conflicted, she spoke calmly.

“I have heard that, but still—I don’t quite understand. How could—I mean, how did we come to be like this?”

“What do you remember?”

“…It feels like I just arrived in Buerno yesterday.”

Liv frowned slightly, as if muttering to herself.

“So, you’ve lost all memory of the past few years.”

Daaemon pressed his fingers against his furrowed brow.

If she believed she had just arrived in Buerno, that meant she had no memory of her time tutoring for Lady Pendance. More importantly, it was before she had any connection to the artist—before her involvement in any nude paintings or the incidents that followed.

“Explaining everything will take some time.”

Could “some time” even begin to cover it?

For the first time, Daaemon truly grasped the meaning of the word “overwhelming.” The thought of having to start from their very first meeting and recount everything honestly weighed heavily on his heart.

Unable to bear Liv’s innocent gaze, as if she were seeing everything for the first time, Daaemon looked away and spoke gruffly, “If you push yourself too hard to remember, you’ll just end up exhausted. Focus on recovering for now.”

“But…”

Liv seemed ready to argue, but Daaemon quickly changed the subject.

“It’s true that we’re supposed to get married. No matter where you go in Buerno, you’re treated as the Marchioness. Everything is ready for the wedding—your dress is finished, the jewels have been chosen, and the invitations have all been sent. There’s no backing out now.”

His detailed explanation about their upcoming wedding sounded almost desperate.

Liv listened quietly, tilting her head slightly.

“But… will we be able to go through with the wedding?”

 Daemon’s face grew serious at her questioning words.

“What do you mean?”

“Well, I’ve lost my memory, haven’t I? I might make a mistake in front of others… Everything feels so unfamiliar and overwhelming. Especially with you, Marquis…”

“Daemon.”

“Oh, yes. With you, Daemon… our relationship is just so surprising to me.”

Liv corrected herself awkwardly under Daemon’s prompt, carefully watching his reaction.

“Is that meant in a negative way?”

“Not really. It’s not something I could easily describe as positive or negative. It’s just surprising, that’s all. To think we are lovers… You probably know, but I’ve always had to work to make ends meet, so I couldn’t possibly attend gatherings where I might meet someone like you.”

Her question made sense. Considering Daemon’s status, it was unlikely that their paths would ever cross. And yet, somehow, this man, who seemed beyond her reach, was now her betrothed. It was all too incredible.

While it might feel like good fortune, Liv’s rational approach to understanding their connection—instead of simply accepting it—left Daaemon feeling unexpectedly disheartened.

“You…”

Daaemon paused, wetting his lips as he chose his words. It was better for him to explain things himself rather than let her imagination run wild.

“You were teaching the young lady of the Pendance family. I met you while visiting the baron’s residence on personal business.”

“I see… The baron’s residence…”

Liv nodded, her expression showing understanding.

“So our relationship began after we met at the baron’s residence?”

“…More or less.”

It wasn’t entirely wrong, though it left out much of what had happened in between. Daemon, uncharacteristically vague, looked away. However, Liv didn’t seem inclined to let the matter rest.

“What made you take notice of a mere tutor?”

Hearing her belittle herself like that made Daaemon frown.

“What about you was lacking?”

“You’re handsome, of noble rank, and you seem to be wealthy. I’m sure many women must have wanted to be with you.”

It was meant as a compliment, but it didn’t make Daaemon smile. The qualities she listed didn’t seem to sway her at all, even after losing her memory. Worse still, she hadn’t even considered that he might have fallen for her at first sight.

Unaware of Daemon’s dissatisfaction, Liv seemed deep in thought before voicing a careful guess.

“Did I somehow deceive you or do something improper?”

“You, deceive me?”

Where would her imagination take her if he didn’t intervene?

Daaemon almost laughed out loud at the absurdity of her suggestion. However, seeing her genuinely serious expression, even the urge to laugh faded. Unable to hide his incredulity, he responded in an exasperated tone.

“Do I look like someone who would easily fall for trickery?”

Liv gave Daaemon an appraising glance. His commanding presence made it abundantly clear that he was not someone who could be taken lightly.

She shook her head in acknowledgment, conceding that her thoughts had been a bit far-fetched.

“Of course not.”

“I understand that all of this is unfamiliar to you,” Daaemon sighed deeply, meeting her gaze. “But the one thing I can tell you for certain is—I’m not good at interacting with others. I’ve never kept anyone else close to me. You—you are the only one who holds everything of mine. This leash, I gave it to you myself. There’s no question; it belongs to you…”

Liv still regarded him with unfamiliar eyes. Even so, Daaemon couldn’t help but continue.

“And that will never change, no matter what.”

Even if Liv had lost her memory, she was still the only one for him.

 



 

Mental health wasn’t Thierry’s main field of expertise, so she decided to gather some materials and head to a nearby town to consult on the matter. Since Liv’s arm needed time to heal anyway, Daaemon allowed Thierry to be away for a few days.

Before leaving, Thierry advised Liv to avoid trying to force her memories back and to proceed cautiously. It was an injury that couldn’t be physically touched or seen, so she had to be particularly careful.

Corida, too, gave Liv a brief summary of important matters but otherwise decided to watch the situation unfold. It happened to be school break, so Corida stayed by her side, trying to keep Liv’s mind at ease.

Liv agreed with Thierry’s suggestion to take things slowly, but that didn’t mean she wasn’t questioning the situation.

In fact, the more time passed, the more her doubts grew.

“I think… I must have done something to him.”

Liv spoke suddenly while gazing absentmindedly out the window.

Corida, who was reading in the same room, looked up with a puzzled expression. Though Liv’s eyes were still fixed on the view outside, her gaze wandered aimlessly.

“How could such a fine-looking man be so devoted to me unless I did something wrong to him?”

Corida, who had been listening silently, let out an exasperated sigh.

“Sister, just accept it. Amazingly enough, this is your life now.”

“Still… something about it doesn’t sit right with me.”

“What doesn’t?”

“It feels like I’ve led someone who was doing perfectly well down the wrong path.”

Corida couldn’t believe what she was hearing.

“…How could you even think that?”

But Liv didn’t seem to hear Corida’s muttering, her face showing only concern.

“How did it come to this? What could I have done?”

She had it all wrong. In fact, it was quite the opposite.

Watching Liv with an incredulous look, Corida clicked her tongue, shaking her head. Clearly, Liv must be feeling well enough to have such irrational thoughts. Glancing briefly at Liv’s arm, which was healing nicely, Corida turned her attention back to her book. From her vantage point, watching their dramatic romance unfold up close was of little benefit. Better to just study for next semester.

Regardless of Corida’s reaction, Liv was quite serious.

The memory of Daemon’s expression during their recent conversation outside the mansion lingered in her mind.

 

“You are the only woman to whom I have given that privilege. You are my first and last lover, and soon you’ll be my one and only family.”

 

The words made her heart drop.

Honestly, how could she not be moved when such a stunningly handsome man confessed so passionately? Liv had long stopped expecting romantic relationships, having focused solely on supporting herself and earning money for Corida’s medical expenses. But it wasn’t as if she never wished for love.

She had always wanted someone to lean on, someone to protect her, but she believed it was unrealistic and had thus never shown it.

So she should be happy with her current circumstances…

But why did his heartfelt confession feel so unsettling? No—it wasn’t his words that felt unstable, but the man himself.

And maybe it was just her imagination, but Daaemon seemed reluctant to speak clearly about their relationship. It didn’t seem like his reluctance was just because of Thierry’s advice to tread carefully.

That lingering ambiguity left an uncomfortable mark on her heart.

 

“If you want to leave here right away, do so.”

 

Now that she thought about it, Corida had said something like that early on. It was an odd thing to say to someone who had just lost their memory.

Her thoughts were increasingly leaning toward the idea that there was something being hidden from her.

Knock, knock.

A knock interrupted her thoughts. Daaemon stood at the door when Corida opened it.

Daaemon cleared his throat under the curious gazes of both women. Then, in a formal tone, he asked, “Would you like to go out for some fresh air together?”

Corida looked at Daaemon and Liv in turn before covering her mouth and stepping back, clearly signaling her intention to leave them alone. After a moment’s hesitation, Liv nodded.

Nothing would be solved by just overthinking. She decided she’d spend more time with Daemon—perhaps doing so would help her regain her lost memories.

 



 

It was Philip who had suggested they go on a date.

 

“You can’t just sit back and wait forever. Dr. Gertrude didn’t say you shouldn’t date, did she? If you spend time together naturally, she might remember the familiarity you once shared.”

 

Daemon, who had been helplessly hovering around Liv, immediately agreed. He also made subtle arrangements to create an environment that might trigger her memories.

The boat they were riding was one such arrangement.

“The lake is so vast.”

Daaemon watched Liv closely as she marveled at the scene, but it was clear that she remembered nothing.

It seemed all his efforts to borrow this boat from the Pendance family had been in vain.

 “To think that a day would come when I could spend such a leisurely time like this.”

Liv looked at the flower-decorated boat with a sense of wonder, her gaze turning to the serene scenery of the lake. Her eyes, gazing endlessly at the scene, were filled with an unfamiliar unease at the sudden leisure given to her. So much so that even Daemon, who watched her, began to feel uncomfortable seeing her act as if she didn’t deserve such treatment.

Eventually, unable to bear it any longer, Daaemon spoke first.

“You proposed to me here.”

At those words, Liv, who had been looking around, turned to Daaemon in surprise.

“Really?”

Her expression, filled with disbelief, gradually turned into one of deep thought. Soon, she furrowed her brows slightly.

“I’m sorry.”

“For what?”

“For not remembering. A proposal must be such a precious memory.”

Her face, filled with sincere regret as she apologized, left Daaemon at a loss for words momentarily. He finally parted his lips to speak.

“…No one could have made a more wonderful proposal than you.”

It was an indirect affirmation of her words. After all, it wasn’t incorrect.

Who else could have prepared such a perfect setting, offering gifts made specifically for him, and proposed with words that hit his heart precisely?

Daaemon still clearly remembered that day—the scent of lilies surrounding them, the weight of the picture frame, and Liv’s innocent smile as she gave him those gifts.

It was, indeed, as Liv had said—a “precious memory.”

Daaemon looked at the woman before him. She was the one who had proposed to him, but now she was different. The woman before him didn’t remember the “precious memory” they had created together; she sat awkwardly, as if listening to someone else’s story.

This realization caused Daaemon to feel somewhat disheartened.

“I must have really liked you, Daemon,” Liv said gently, seeming to sense his feelings. “To have proposed first, I must have been quite fond of you.”

Liv spoke in a kind tone, seemingly aware of the loss Daaemon felt from the time they had spent together. However, she did not try to force herself to act like the lover she could not remember, knowing that would be an even greater affront to him.

“In truth, I’ve never been familiar with romantic relationships. It’s so strange that I was able to approach someone so assertively.”

Liv mumbled as if to herself, gently touching the flowers that decorated the boat with her fingertips.

“I can’t even imagine how much I must have clung to you.”

“It was me who clung to you.”

Daaemon corrected her immediately.

“I was the one begging—I said I’d die without you.”

It was purely an objective fact, and there wasn’t an ounce of shame or embarrassment in his correction. However, Liv looked at him as if she suspected he was exaggerating a bit.

“How kind of you. You’re saying that just so I won’t feel bad.”

“It’s the truth.”

“Alright, I’ll believe you.”

While Daaemon was utterly sincere, Liv chuckled as if she had just heard a joke.

Realizing that the laughter was involuntary, Liv hurriedly covered her mouth and turned her head away, but her eyes still formed a soft curve. Daaemon stared at her warm green eyes, as if captivated.

“Ahem, I’m sorry. I wasn’t laughing at you—I just felt good, that’s all.”

Her gentle voice was full of concern that she might have offended him.

Suddenly, Daaemon found himself wondering if this was the carefree smile he might have seen if they had started their relationship more “properly.”

If not for the hardships—if she hadn’t ended up as a nude model, caught the attention of a wicked man, been treated like a pretty statue, then fled in desperation only to be caught and forced into endless struggles—perhaps she could have been as peaceful as she seemed now, without those bad memories.

And so, a question naturally followed.

Did he really need to see her memory return?

“Do you think my memory will come back?”

As if reading his thoughts, Liv suddenly spoke.

“I’m curious. About the time we spent together. About how someone like me ended up in a relationship with someone like you, Daemon. Right now, all I can think is that it’s too much for me.”

“I’m the one who’s unworthy.”

“Thank you for saying that.”

Their quiet date on the calm lake seemed to have softened her guardedness. Liv spoke more comfortably than she had before.

“Actually, I thought you didn’t want to tell me anything. I mean, about our relationship or our past.”

Daemon’s eyebrows rose slightly. He took a quiet breath, replying in a blunt voice, “Why would I… have a reason to do that?”

“That’s what I’m saying. I don’t know why I thought that. Maybe I’ve just been on edge since I suddenly lost my memory.”

Liv shook her head, smiling as if the thought was ridiculous.

“Dr. Gertrude said she’d return with the related research, so I’ll be able to regain my memory soon enough. It’s all strange, but I’m trying not to rush things.”

What was this feeling?

For the first time in a long while, Daaemon couldn’t define the emotions swirling within him. Suppressing his confused feelings, he found himself with a lump in his throat and had to look away from Liv as he spoke.

“Yes, you’ll regain your memory soon enough.”

 



 

The atmosphere of their date turned out better than expected.

Liv seemed to have opened her heart a little and was starting to see Daaemon in a positive light. She even thought of him as a kind and considerate man—perhaps a bit blunt in expressing himself, but with warmth beneath the surface.

Strangely, it was Daaemon who began to change.

He no longer hovered around Liv all the time. However, he still wouldn’t leave the mansion, and it seemed he spent more time thinking about her now than when he was by her side.

The same was true now as he sat in the study. Though he had an open book before him, it had long since become a mere decoration. Even the cigar that had become a habit for him lay discarded to the side.

“Is it really right for her to regain her memory?”

Resting his chin on one hand, Daaemon tapped his finger anxiously on the armrest. Philip, who stood by his side, looked at him curiously at the murmured words.

“Pardon?”

“All those useless memories are gone now—why bring them back…”

It didn’t seem like he expected an answer. Watching him with a worried gaze, Philip called out cautiously.

“Master.”

“Hah.”

Daaemon sighed deeply, pressing his temples with his fingers before glancing at Philip.

“Where is Liv?”

“Madam is touring the mansion. She mentioned visiting the east wing today.”

The Langess mansion was vast, and there were still many areas Liv had not explored.

Since her trip to the lake, she seemed to have decided to embrace her current circumstances. She had taken an active interest in exploring every corner of the mansion. With the staff being consistently kind and cooperative, Liv’s exploration was going smoothly.

Even before she lost her memory, Liv had maintained a harmonious relationship with the mansion’s staff. Everyone respected and followed her, as she was in no way lacking as the mistress of the house.

“The east wing, where Liv’s studio is.”

The fingers that had paused on the armrest resumed their anxious tapping.

The studio at the Langess mansion wasn’t a place she visited often, as the larger external studio was much better equipped for painting. Compared to that, the mansion’s studio was just somewhere she would occasionally visit to doodle when she was bored.

So, there was little chance that visiting it would suddenly bring her memories back.

Realizing that Liv’s studio wasn’t likely to play a significant role in helping her recover her memory made Daemon’s mind restless again. This undefined emotion had become so bothersome that he frowned deeply.

While subconsciously touching his lips, unable to shake off this feeling, an idea suddenly crossed his mind.

“She hasn’t gone to the basement yet, has she?”

“No, since you didn’t say anything, so I haven’t suggested it.”

As soon as Philip’s calm response reached him, Daaemon sprang to his feet.

“Prepare a cover.”

Pushing the unread book aside, he hurriedly left the study, not forgetting to instruct Philip along the way.

“Something to use as a cover, as much as possible.”

 The Langess mansion was truly an expansive place. It was so grand that calling it a castle would not be an exaggeration. This vast stone building was meticulously maintained in every corner. Every small window frame and spiral staircase railing was spotless, and each room was adorned with elegant sculptures and paintings that pleased the eye.

Corida had mentioned that Daaemon was a sophisticated collector, and indeed, her words were no exaggeration. Even to Liv, who had no particular knowledge of art, it was evident that not a single small painting was placed carelessly.

Moreover, the staff working there were impeccably trained—their speech was faultless. Liv, who had worked as a live-in governess for noble families before, had never encountered servants as well-trained as those at the Langess mansion.

The way they respectfully bowed and called her “Madam” whenever they saw her made her feel like she was walking on clouds—unreal.

“I really painted here…”

“Yes, Madam.”

The studio, to which her personal maid had guided her, was excessively luxurious for an art studio. Even the wallpaper appeared expensive at first glance. It was so lavish that she felt guilty even imagining paint splattering on it.

Liv slowly surveyed the room, her gaze landing on the neatly arranged art supplies.

Huh?

She stared at the brushes, meticulously organized by size, before looking back at the maid.

“These are brushes, right?”

“Yes, Madam.”

“…Brushes inlaid with jewels?”

“I understand that they were custom-made for you by the Master.”

Why in the world were there jewels on the brush handles?

Liv stared at the sparkling handles for a moment, then turned her gaze away. She was curious if those shining stones were real diamonds, but she had a feeling she’d be even more unsettled if she found out. Instead, she looked at the large shelves next to them.

“…Why are there so many pigments?”

“They were provided to ensure you had any color you desired. The ones below were specially mixed.”

“And those canvases…”

“Organized by size.”

“Ah. And next to them are easels.”

She thought an easel was just something to hold up a canvas. But there were three-legged easels, four-legged easels, wooden ones, metal ones, square easels, and triangular ones…

Did it really make sense to have so many different types?

Liv felt a bit overwhelmed. From what she’d heard, painting had been a “light” hobby she’d enjoyed before losing her memory. It wasn’t even something she had been doing for a long time.

Corida wouldn’t have lied, so this lavish setup for a newly acquired hobby seemed way over the top. Even professionals probably wouldn’t paint in such an extravagant environment.

Liv couldn’t imagine that she herself had requested all of this. Even though she had lost her memory, she knew enough about her own behavior patterns to be sure—she was not the type to go overboard for a casual hobby. Which meant that this studio was put together under Daemon’s orders.

She had heard him say it multiple times, but seeing the ridiculous gifts he had showered her with made her feel something new.

Was he really so desperate for her?

Had she really done nothing wrong to make him feel that way?

“Angel?”

Lost in her thoughts while staring at the studio, Liv was startled by a sudden call. She turned to find a young boy, neatly dressed, looking up at her with sparkling eyes.

“You are…”

Liv hadn’t heard of Daaemon having any other family, so she hesitated, simply watching the boy.

The boy’s eyes, which had been filled with excitement, soon clouded with confusion. It seemed that he had remembered Liv’s current condition, and his face quickly turned gloomy.

“This is Noah,” the maid beside her explained quickly. “He recently came under the Master’s patronage and is staying here temporarily.”

Listening to the maid, Liv slowly nodded and moved her lips.

“Noah.”

The name felt somewhat familiar in her mouth, but it didn’t bring back any particular memories.

Seeing that Liv didn’t recognize him, Noah looked somewhat disappointed. But he quickly seemed to regain his composure, and spoke in a deliberately mature tone.

“I heard you were unwell. I hope you recover soon.”

“Oh, thank you.”

Liv smiled involuntarily. The sight of Noah acting so mature for his age was both endearing and slightly pitiful.

It seemed Liv wasn’t the only one with this impression, as the maid watching from the side also smiled softly. She leaned toward Liv, whispering quietly enough that Noah wouldn’t hear.

“You were the one who helped Noah when he was abandoned by his parents during the festival, Madam. The Master decided to support him after recognizing his talent.”

“He did something good.”

“If it weren’t for you, Madam, Noah wouldn’t be staying here.”

“That’s not true. Ultimately, it was Daaemon who chose to sponsor him.”

Noah looked up curiously at the two women whispering, and Liv carefully patted his head. Noah, seemingly familiar with her touch, calmly leaned into her hand.

If Noah had been abandoned by his parents, he must have grown up in a poor environment. Even so, looking down at Noah’s chubby cheeks, which were round and plump, Liv could tell that he was well-fed and looked after now. It was clear that this was more than just financial support—Noah was being genuinely cared for.

Liv, gazing down at the boy who barely came up to her waist, muttered to herself, “Perhaps he isn’t such a bad person after all.”

“Is that ‘bad person’ supposed to be referring to me?”

A blunt voice suddenly cut in. Liv looked up, startled, to see Daaemon approaching with Philip in tow.

Liv wasn’t exactly speaking ill of him, but she still felt embarrassed and hesitated. In that brief moment, Daaemon gestured toward the maid and Noah, and Philip smoothly led the two away.

Noah seemed like he wanted to talk more with Liv, but whatever Philip whispered to him worked, and the boy soon smiled brightly and said goodbye.

Daaemon glanced at Philip, who was walking away with the boy, then turned his gaze to Liv.

“I wasn’t saying anything bad about you.”

“I know you aren’t the type to do such things.”

He replied easily, his gaze shifting to the inside of the studio that Liv had been examining.

“What do you think of your hobby?”

“One thing’s for sure.”

Liv looked into the studio, following his gaze. Standing straight, with her hands neatly clasped, she took in all the unusual details that had caught her attention earlier—all the absurd, extravagant items.

“Someone is very eager to please me.”

At her words, Daaemon let out a small laugh. He was clearly well aware of how over-the-top the scene before them appeared.

“From ‘bad person’ to ‘someone eager to please you.'”

“Did my words offend you?”

“No. I was just surprised at how accurate you are.”

He certainly didn’t seem offended. In fact, he looked somewhat amused. His faint smile left his expression completely unguarded.

Liv found herself staring at him blankly. His sharp jawline, tightly shut lips, high-bridged nose, piercing blue eyes, and platinum hair slightly tousled over his forehead…

No statue in the world could match this man in real life. Just seeing his face filled her with pure awe.

It was because of that face that Liv had found it hard to accept reality.

The healthy Corida, a peaceful and abundant life, and an extraordinary fiancé who adored her…

“Honestly, this moment right now is the life I always dreamed of.”

Still mesmerized by Daemon, Liv slowly continued, “If I said it feels like God has given me a gift, would that be too childish a thought?”

Daaemon shifted his gaze from the studio to Liv. “If it makes you happy, it doesn’t matter. Believe it’s a gift from God if you want to.”

“But all of this is really a gift from you, Daemon.”

Somehow feeling shy under his gaze, Liv lowered her eyes. A blush spread across her cheeks, and a bashful smile appeared.

“Then, you’re my god, Daemon.”

Daemon’s gaze wavered. He stared down at Liv for a long while, then cautiously cupped her face.

Liv did not avoid him as he leaned in closer.

As their lips met, warmth spread between them—a familiar heat that felt instinctive.

 If Liv appeared in a dream, it couldn’t possibly be a nightmare.

Even if it were a dream where Liv despised him, how could that ever be called a nightmare?

 

“There’s no need for you to be my god, Marquis.”

 

One day, those cold words echoed clearly in his mind, stirring the anxiety Daaemon had barely managed to suppress, rekindling it like a smoldering ember.

In the dark of the night, Daaemon woke after only a few hours of sleep. The dark bedroom was silent, and the vast bed was cold. In that emptiness, he tried to piece together his emotions, which felt as though they had been shredded by Liv’s indifferent gaze.

It wasn’t easy to calm himself alone. He had never been able to sleep deeply without Liv by his side, and as the days of sleeping separately dragged on, his sleep grew shorter and shorter. And then, a dream like this.

Daaemon ran a hand through his sweat-dampened hair, closing and opening his eyes again.

Liv had said she didn’t need a god. She had told him not to become one.

But Liv, who had lost her memory… no, but once she regained her memory… Would she even regain it at all?

“Do I really…”

Do I really need to make her remember? Those memories filled with pain and negative emotions?

The question that had crossed his mind earlier in the day returned, now more forcefully.

Daaemon took a deep breath and got out of bed. Out of habit, he reached for a bottle of liquor, his thoughts colliding endlessly in his head. He couldn’t tell what was right.

…No, this wasn’t really a question of right or wrong.

 

“All of this is really a gift from you, Daemon.”

 

He took a gulp of the strong liquor, a hollow laugh escaping his lips.

 

“Then, you’re my god, Daemon.”

 

It was nothing more than his ugly desire—wanting to keep facing the trusting, bright-eyed Liv who smiled at him without a hint of doubt.

 



 

Daaemon and Liv went on several more dates.

Daaemon remained consistently courteous, always behaving like a gentleman. Even when he kissed her, he did so with the utmost respect for her wishes. Of course, when Liv shyly initiated a kiss for the first time, he couldn’t help but show some impatience, but whenever she seemed to pull back, he immediately suppressed his desires and stepped away.

In that manner, they maintained a gentle level of intimacy, visiting the greenhouse and arboretum at Berryworth Mansion and even taking a tour of a small studio house where Liv received her painting lessons. Liv’s fondness for Daaemon grew by the day.

Though her memories still seemed distant, her arm was healing well, and her heart felt at peace. In fact, Liv’s recovery went so smoothly that even Corida began going out more frequently, seeing how much calmer Liv had become.

The Langess mansion might have been large, but it seemed boring to Corida, as she spent nearly every day out and about.

Apparently, she was meeting friends. Liv later found out that one of those friends was Milion, the only daughter of Baron Pendance, whom Liv had once taught. Milion had sent a letter full of concern after hearing from Corida about Liv’s injury.

It seemed Corida hadn’t mentioned the memory loss, as Milion’s letter was full of warmth, as if nothing had changed.

 

“You were teaching the young lady of the Pendance family. I met you while visiting the baron’s residence on personal business.”

 

Baron Pendance’s residence was where Liv first met Daemon.

So, had Milion seen their first meeting? What did the two of them look like to that girl back then? And what did they look like now?

Liv was genuinely curious. So, when Milion said she wanted to see Liv again, Liv agreed. It wasn’t a particularly difficult meeting—she would simply accompany Corida when she went out.

It seemed best not to mention her memory loss, but it wouldn’t be hard to reminisce about the past with just a few shared memories.

Daaemon hadn’t asked many questions when he heard she was going out with Corida. Though he did ask what time they’d be back, it seemed strangely serious, but Liv didn’t think much of it. Considering her injury and memory loss, she thought it natural for him to worry, even if she was with her sister.

And so, they met at one of Buerno’s finest coffee houses, which had private rooms for comfortable conversations.

“Teacher! How have you become even more beautiful!”

Milion’s exaggerated words left Liv looking embarrassed. However, Milion didn’t seem to care at all and began chatting even before taking her seat.

To be honest, Liv had felt a bit guilty for deciding not to tell Milion about her memory loss. She worried that it might become obvious in her words or actions.

But, to her surprise, Milion kept up a steady stream of chatter, requiring little input from Liv. Moreover, Corida’s naturally cheerful personality meant that the two of them hit it off quickly, soon forgetting Liv was even there.

“It’s a pity we don’t see each other often since you went off to Adelinde. No one else can even hold a conversation with me for three hours straight.”

Milion sighed in frustration. Unlike Liv, Corida let out a loud sigh, looking genuinely confused.

“Why not?”

“Exactly! Why not? I mean, even talking about the novel I read last night isn’t enough time—why is Adelinde so far away?”

“You’re right, it’s too far.”

Corida nodded in agreement. As Liv quietly listened to their conversation, she tilted her head slightly.

Adelinde. The area where Corida’s boarding school was located.

When she first heard that Corida was attending boarding school, Liv had looked up its location. To her, it seemed far too distant from Buerno. However, since Corida was on a scholarship and had a sponsor, she assumed there must have been a reason for the arrangement.

Still, thinking about it again, it seemed strange.

Why would she have chosen to send Corida to a school so far away, especially while preparing for her wedding here in Buerno? No matter how healthy Corida had become…

‘It’s not the kind of choice I would have made.’

Liv was in the midst of this thought when Milion spoke up again, her lips pursed.

“But I understand. If I had faced that kind of unfounded slander, I wouldn’t have wanted to stay in the area even for an hour.”

“Oh, um. That…”

Corida, who had been listening quietly, seemed flustered and tried to interject, but Milion, oblivious to Corida’s reaction, continued casually.

“Who would have guessed that Lady Malte of the famous Malte Duchy family would turn out to be the type to spread such malicious rumors and act so underhandedly.”

“Uh, well…”

Corida tried to say something again, but Milion, as if unaware, went on.

“Still, I’m glad everything got sorted out so quickly, aren’t you? And thanks to that, Teacher, you’ve been able to come back like this.”

Milion suddenly turned to Liv, addressing her directly. Liv responded with a vague expression.

“Yes.”

“In that sense, thank you so much for meeting me again. My mother is really regretful, too. I still have so much to learn from you, Teacher. If I’d known this chance would be gone forever, I would’ve begged you to stay as soon as I heard our contract was ending.”

It seemed that this was what Milion had wanted to say all along. Her usually lively demeanor seemed subdued, and she looked like she’d been mulling over this for quite some time, waiting for the right moment to say it. Liv, having no memory of these events, simply smiled gently in response.

Interpreting Liv’s smile as a positive response, Milion’s face brightened slightly. She regained her usual energy, her eyes sparkling as she changed the subject.

“Oh, by the way, the self-portrait you painted in my mansion’s studio—where did you hang it? Was the Marquis completely amazed by it?”

“A self-portrait?”

“Yes, your self-portrait!”

Liv let out a low sigh. She had been exploring the Langess mansion, the Berryworth mansion, and several other properties recently.

But she hadn’t seen any self-portraits.

“Oh, oh my! Look at the time! Goodness! My brother-in-law will be worried!”

“Wow, calling the Marquis ‘brother-in-law’… Corida, you’re amazing…”

“Hahaha…”

Corida hurriedly began to gather her things. Milion lamented that it had only been three hours, but seemed to leave without much fuss, aware of Liv’s still bandaged arm.

Liv remained composed until she parted ways with Milion, maintaining a calm demeanor without a single hint of disturbance. She saw Milion off with a faint smile and then boarded the carriage, Corida following behind hesitantly.

Once they got into the carriage and the door closed, the sound of hooves began as the carriage moved slowly. At that moment, Liv finally spoke.

“Corida. I want to hear in detail about the time we went to Adelinde.”

Corida, who had been glancing around to gauge the mood, shrugged her shoulders heavily.

“Well, I don’t really know the full story myself, Sister.”

“There must have been a reason to send you to that faraway girls’ school, especially when you were unwell. Isn’t that so?”

Liv’s gaze, as she looked at Corida, was endlessly gentle, causing Corida to relax unwittingly.

“Um… Yes…”

Corida blinked and swallowed dryly.

“Can you explain the situation?”

“Uh, but Sister… Dr. Gertrude said…”

“Corida.”

Liv gazed intently at Corida. Her calm gaze showed no hint of harshness, but for some reason, Corida felt uncomfortable in her seat.

Well, when you’re in a relationship, you fight, you almost break up, but then you get back together because you like each other again… It was probably like that back then too. So, surely, telling her wouldn’t cause a big problem.

…Right?

 Daaemon learned about Liv’s meeting with Milion a little late.

“…Ha, Pendance.”

Liv’s memory loss was strictly confidential and had not been disclosed to anyone outside. There was no need to stir up gossip right before their wedding, and revealing such information could easily be exploited negatively.

In Buerno, there were no longer people who dared gossip about Liv. Anyone remotely connected to any scandal had already been identified and removed.

Among those Daaemon couldn’t remove was the Pendance family. Not because they were a prominent noble family in Buerno, but because of Milion Pendance, their only daughter and Liv’s student. The simple fact that Liv cared for Milion had allowed them to remain in Buerno until now.

Milion’s cheerful nature had spread good stories about Liv far and wide, which Daaemon found quite useful. However, in the current situation…

“Madam has returned.”

At the servant’s report, Daaemon grabbed his cane and stood up abruptly.

 



 

“Uh, um, I’m tired, so I’ll just go now.”

Corida, who got off the carriage first, slunk away as soon as she saw Daemon. That unnatural movement allowed Daaemon to sense that they had talked about something during their outing—something that hadn’t been discussed before.

Liv, however, showed no noticeable change. Calmly alighting from the carriage, she paused briefly upon seeing Daaemon waiting for her at the front entrance, before bowing slightly, without any apparent reaction.

“I wasn’t late compared to the time I told you earlier. Were you waiting for me?”

Perhaps today’s outing hadn’t caused any problems.

Daemon, who had just moments before sensed something amiss from Corida’s behavior, couldn’t help but be reassured by Liv’s serene expression. Or maybe he simply wanted to believe that everything was fine.

Daaemon was feeling guilty and uneasy. If he made too much of an issue now, he might end up creating a problem that wasn’t even there.

After hesitating for a moment, Daaemon spoke in a calm manner, “Did you have a good outing?”

“Yes.”

“I heard you met Lady Pendance today.”

At his words, Liv’s lips curved slightly.

“You’re well-informed. I just got off the carriage.”

Was it just his imagination, or was there something hidden beneath her gentle words?

“That’s…”

Or maybe he was overreacting.

“Your safety is always my top priority.”

His emotions fluctuated with every word, and his thoughts grew increasingly complex.

Yet Liv’s voice remained calm and steady. “Miss Milion is far too innocent a young girl to be any kind of threat.”

Her voice was impossible to read. Daaemon felt more clueless than ever.

There were too many things preoccupying his mind, and he couldn’t trust his own judgment.

“You… lost your memory. Dr. Gertrude said we should approach the matter carefully.”

He tried to sound nonchalant, but a trace of anxiety slipped through. Whether Liv noticed or not, she responded lightly.

“It wasn’t exactly a meeting to discuss old memories. Though, I did hope a few things might naturally come up.”

She turned, as if to head inside the mansion, but then suddenly stopped and looked back at Daemon. Standing upright, she fixed her gaze on him, her eyes seeming particularly steadfast.

“It seems like you’re worried I might have heard something.”

Caught off guard, Daaemon pressed his lips together tightly. Finally, he managed to respond.

“…Honestly, I’m not a good person.”

“Oh.”

Liv, who had been staring at him with a strange expression, slowly lowered her gaze. As her faint smile disappeared, her lips pressed together in a straight line, exuding a cold aura.

She stood still, without asking further questions, and then moved as if to leave again. Daaemon instinctively reached out to stop her.

“Liv.”

He still couldn’t read any emotions from her green eyes. But at this moment, Daaemon had a strong feeling that he couldn’t just let her go like this.

He knew Liv.

He knew how kind and considerate she was, but also how rational she could be—how she could prioritize reason over emotions when necessary.

Daaemon had already accepted total defeat when it came to her, and he knew it would never change for the rest of his life. He didn’t want to provoke the anger of someone he could never win against. He didn’t even want to risk a tiny chance of it.

The memory of Liv’s calm, peaceful eyes still lingered, leaving him with some lingering attachment. However, he knew that ending this uneasy peace was the right thing to do. No matter how much he hid or avoided speaking of the past, it would not simply disappear.

Seeing Liv looking at him in confusion, Daaemon spoke with difficulty, “There’s a place in this mansion you haven’t seen.”

Even without her memories, Liv was still Liv. She had the right to know her true circumstances.

 

Today, the basement door opened unusually heavily.

With a deep, heavy sound, the somewhat dark interior slowly came into view. Liv shuddered slightly upon seeing a tall figure covered in a white sheet right in front of her.

However, she soon realized that it was just a “human figure.” There were other large and small objects similarly covered with white sheets next to it.

“This place…”

Although everything inside was hidden under white sheets, Liv could tell at a glance that this space was a large gallery.

Daaemon glanced at Liv, who was looking around with wide eyes, and then turned on the gallery lights himself. The darkness receded slightly, and the eerie atmosphere somewhat lifted.

After hesitating for a moment, Liv slowly stepped inside the gallery. She approached one of the covered figures and looked back at Daemon.

“May I take a look?”

When Daaemon nodded, Liv grabbed the sheet and pulled it off. The human figure that had been partially visible beneath the sheet was now fully revealed.

It was a nude statue. The pure white sculpture was intricately detailed, down to each strand of hair and every crease of skin, appearing almost lifelike.

Liv, stunned by the beauty of the statue, turned her attention to the next covered object. Once again, Daaemon nodded.

This process repeated several times, with multiple sheets ending up on the floor.

What emerged were undeniably valuable works of art. Liv was sure that the remaining covered items were similar.

“I took up this hobby to… solve a certain problem of mine.”

Daemon, who had been quietly watching Liv, finally spoke. Usually, he stood with a perfect, composed expression, but now he seemed to be avoiding her gaze, almost as if he was anxious.

“A hobby of collecting artwork based on a specific theme.”

That specific theme being “nudes.”

Liv listened to his words as she looked around the space. Even with a cursory glance, it was clear that the gallery was filled with numerous pieces—large and small sculptures, as well as hundreds of paintings hanging on the walls.

“Everything here is…”

“All of it,” Daaemon replied shortly, finally lowering his chin slightly.

After some hesitation, he moved past the many displayed pieces and stood in front of an area that was not immediately visible. Unusually, the entire wall was covered by curtains, suggesting it was usually kept hidden.

Even as he reached the spot, Daaemon seemed conflicted. Staring blankly at the box in front of him, he confessed in a somewhat melancholic voice.

“In truth, I lied to you.”

“About what?”

“About our first meeting.”

He pulled the heavy curtain’s cord, causing the gathered folds to part slowly to both sides.

“I didn’t fall for you the first time I visited Baron Pendance’s residence.”

The wall that had been hidden was now covered with paintings. These, too, were nudes—likely all featuring the same model.

“And our meeting wasn’t exactly romantic.”

“Ah.”

Liv let out a low exclamation. She stared blankly at the three nude paintings now revealed. Even without her memory, she somehow understood the context just from looking at the paintings.

“I understand now.”

 Daaemon watched Liv anxiously. Her eyes were fixed on the nude paintings, seemingly oblivious to his tense expression.

“I thought it was strange. You and I… we are so different in many ways. How could we have met, talked, or shared anything? I truly couldn’t understand…”

As if muttering to herself, Liv suddenly turned to Daemon.

“Why did I run away to Adelinde?”

“Run away? That’s not—”

“I heard it from Corida. Sneaking away, disguising my identity, not even packing properly, moving from place to place—that’s running away.”

Daaemon had intended to correct her, to say it wasn’t running away. But his voice faltered and his mouth closed.

The truth was, there was nothing wrong with what Liv said. At the time, even Daaemon had understood her departure as a “runaway.” Refusing to call it that was just his own stubborn pride. It was his attempt to romanticize the situation, even just a little.

But what would changing a simple word achieve at this point?

Daaemon recognized the determined look on Liv’s face. He had faced that expression several times before, each time making the wrong choice. He knew better now—he couldn’t afford another foolish decision.

“Did I really run away from you?”

“Yes.”

So, Daaemon could only respond honestly to her question.

“I didn’t respect you at all. I didn’t realize it was love and treated you like a mistress. To you, it must have been nothing short of torment. So you left—you ran away.”

Daaemon took a quiet breath, trying to explain as unemotionally as possible.

“I chased after you relentlessly and forcibly brought you back. When force didn’t work, I begged for sympathy. In the end, you couldn’t be cruel, and I thought we’d found our love for each other… But now, here we are.”

Liv listened to him calmly, without a trace of blame or reproach in her expression. The more he spoke, the more vivid those past events became—but only for Daemon. And that made it even harder for him.

It felt just like when Liv couldn’t remember his proposal. Once again, Daaemon felt himself sinking into despair.

“Perhaps forgetting everything about me, and everything that happened in Buerno, was an unconscious wish on your part.”

Daaemon was not a person who made emotional assumptions or uncertain guesses. But this time, his rising frustration overwhelmed him, and he couldn’t maintain a rational train of thought.

“Maybe you wanted to forget everything tied to this place.”

Before she met Daemon, before she worked as a nude model, before all the bad things in Buerno happened—perhaps some part of her wanted to return to that state.

Liv was a woman who could live receiving love from men much kinder and more gentle than Daemon. Sure, he might have captured her heart with his outer shell for now, but that would age and wither eventually. Even Daaemon had to admit that his temperamental, self-centered, and irritable personality made him quite an undesirable partner.

They said that a bride’s emotions could be very fickle before her wedding. What if Liv was feeling that way now?

What if her solitary horseback ride had been because she was unsure about this marriage?

His imagination spun wildly, eventually landing on the horrifying image of Liv running away from the wedding.

Grinding his teeth, Daaemon forcibly pulled himself out of the spiraling thoughts.

“Even so, I’m sorry, but I can’t let you go.”

If, by some extraordinary leniency, she asked to delay the wedding… as much as he hated it, he’d accept it. But calling it off entirely was impossible. The idea of it would suffocate him with overwhelming anxiety. Clenching his cane tightly, Daaemon tried to suppress the unease creeping up on him.

Liv, who had been watching him with a contemplative gaze, let out a soft sigh.

“Thank you for being honest with me.”

She could have easily criticized him or demanded answers for his past wrongs, but she didn’t seem inclined to do so. Her expression merely showed that she was deep in thought.

“I’m quick to let go of things. If something feels beyond my ability to handle, I think it’s more rational to give up. But despite that, I’m still here…”

Liv glanced at the nude paintings on the wall. She recognized herself as the model, yet her gaze was as if she were looking at a stranger.

“Whatever happened here, it’s because I believed I could overcome it.”

Perhaps she could already imagine the circumstances surrounding the creation of those paintings and her own state of mind at the time. After all, it wasn’t hard to deduce one’s own actions.

“There must have been a reason why I decided to marry you. I trust the person I was before losing my memory.”

Liv’s calm words were soon followed by a somewhat melancholy addition.

“However, I think I need some time to accept all of this. I don’t think I can go on any more dates with you for a while.”

“I understand.”

It was enough that she hadn’t said she wanted to leave the mansion or cancel the wedding. Daaemon nodded his head emphatically. Seeing him submit so easily, Liv sighed once again. Seeing this man—who seemed to lack nothing—completely humbled like this, she realized that his claim of having “begged for sympathy” hadn’t been an exaggeration.

With a conflicted look, Liv slowly parted her lips.

“I might regain my memory…”

She had intended to offer a clumsy reassurance, that if she remembered their love, they could return to their original state.

But suddenly, something caught Liv’s eye, and she froze in place. Past the covered artworks, in the deepest part of the basement gallery, there was one painting hanging alone. Unlike the others, it was not covered by a sheet.

Anyone could tell that it was the most important piece in the gallery. It hung proudly in the center of the broad wall, with a spotlight seemingly dedicated to it.

Daaemon followed Liv’s gaze, curious about her sudden silence.

“Ah, that painting…”

Daaemon began to explain, but Liv was already moving toward it. Her steps, at first hesitant, carried her swiftly across the floor until she stood before the painting.

The woman in the painting was smiling happily, her eyes crinkled with joy.

 

“The self-portrait you painted in my mansion’s studio—where did you hang it?”

 

The woman who had sat hunched over miserably earlier was now in the center of this grand wall, with a shy but unmistakably joyful smile.

Liv stared at the painting, as if mesmerized. Despite her unskilled hand, the happiness of the woman in the painting overflowed.

Ah, so this was the painting I made at the Pendance mansion.

 

“Your self-portrait!”

 

A self-portrait of Liv Rodaise, smiling happily.

…Painted by her own hand.

“Ugh.”

Suddenly, a sharp pain shot through her head.

“Liv?”

Liv clutched her head, her upper body folding over.

“Ah…!”

“Liv!”

Daaemon rushed to her side, supporting her. He seemed to be saying something, but the sharp pain in her head drowned out his voice.

Liv curled in on herself further, as if trying to lessen the pain. But ultimately, she couldn’t stop the overwhelming whiteness from overtaking her vision.

“Liv!”

She thought she heard the distant sound of something shattering.

 



 

While Liv was unconscious, Thierry returned from her nearby outing. She was shocked at the situation she encountered and did not hold back her rebuke.

“I told you to approach things carefully!”

She seemed to have forgotten she was speaking to Marquis Dietrion, glaring at him fiercely. Unable to watch any longer, Philip stepped in gently.

“Dr. Gertrude, Master is also feeling remorse.”

However, Philip’s gentle intervention only seemed to add fuel to Thierry’s fire.

“What’s the point of regretting things after they’ve gone wrong?”

“He couldn’t have anticipated this outcome.”

“Do you think the marquis is still a cadet at the military academy?”

Philip frowned at Thierry’s words, which referenced the long years they had known Daemon, since his academy days.

“No one can foresee an accident before it happens.”

“You might see the marquis as a child due to your age, Philip, but coddling only leads to bad habits.”

“Why bring my age into this now?”

“Both of you, be quiet.”

The bickering pair fell silent at once. Throughout their argument, Daaemon had kept his eyes fixed on Liv. Just as he frowned and prepared to dismiss them both, a faint groan came from the bed where Liv lay.

Everyone in the room turned their gaze toward her simultaneously.

 A faint groan escaped, and her eyelids fluttered. Then slowly, her eyes opened.

“Liv.”

Daaemon placed his hand over the back of Liv’s. Her delicate fingers twitched slightly within his large palm.

Liv’s green eyes, now fully open, stared blankly at the ceiling before turning to look at Daemon. The meeting of their eyes and their interlocking fingers happened almost simultaneously.

“Ah…”

Liv let out a sigh, almost like a soft gasp.

Daemon, unable to blink, simply stared at her. He could see the familiar affection of his lover in her gaze.

“Daemon.”

The one calling his name now was his lover, soon to be his wife—the very “Liv Rodaise” who shared all his memories.

“Ha…”

Overwhelmed by an indescribable feeling, Daaemon couldn’t speak for a while. Sensing his emotions, Liv offered a faint smile.

“You must have been really startled.”

“It wasn’t just that…”

He wanted to say that it wasn’t such a simple matter, that he had been terrified of losing everything they had built. Words rose up to his throat, clamoring to come out.

But Daaemon pressed it all down, burying his fears deep within. Instead, he finally spoke the words he had meant to say after she had woken from her fall.

“…Never ride alone again.”

“But… I was practicing so I could ride with you.”

“Wherever you want to go, I’ll take you myself. Never again.”

Daaemon paused after that.

He had intended to tell her not to ride at all—that she didn’t need to bother with horseback riding. But now, what he truly wanted to say had changed entirely. Daemon’s eyes narrowed as he spoke with a restrained voice.

“Never forget me again.”

At some point in the past, she may have hated him. She may have despised and loathed him.

But it wasn’t just bad memories that existed between them. There were precious moments too—small, ordinary times and unforgettable events filled with shared memories.

Not knowing how to express this emotion, Daaemon simply gripped Liv’s hand tightly. She looked at him quietly and smiled awkwardly.

“You must have been really scared.”

Ah, so that’s what it was—fear. Finally, the tangled emotion had a name, but it wasn’t a comforting realization. With a bitter expression, Daaemon asked in a low voice.

“Do you remember what happened while your memory was gone?”

“Yes, I remember.”

Liv replied readily, letting out a small groan as she shifted her body. With Daemon’s help, she sat up and leaned against the headboard, speaking again.

“I remember everything you did for me.”

“…Did I do the right thing this time?” he asked cautiously, like a child seeking approval from a teacher.

Liv hesitated for a moment, then said with a gentle smile, “I believe that every part of our journey led us to this moment. That’s why I’m happy you were honest about our story in the end.”

Fidgeting with the soft blanket, Liv thought back to the days when she had lost her memory.

It still felt surreal—as if she were reading someone else’s story. However, she remembered Daemon’s actions and emotions vividly. When she hadn’t remembered, she hadn’t understood, but now it was as clear as if she were looking at the palm of her hand.

“Some memories are painful to recall, it’s true. But…”

Now that she had regained her memory, Liv understood why Daaemon had lied about their first meeting. It was a past that was better left unknown.

But without that past, would they be here now, facing each other like this?

“The scars may not disappear, but after enough time passes, we’ll be able to look at them and laugh, calling them the medals of our love—the evidence of our devotion.”

Not all moments could be beautiful and filled with joy. Liv smiled calmly.

“Where there was once a wound, new skin has grown.”

Daaemon listened to her words, nodding as he muttered dryly, “Yes, I was trash.”

“That’s not what I’m saying.” Liv frowned and scolded him, then suddenly added in a serious tone, “But you were… a bit like that.”

“Yes.”

Half-joking, Liv’s words were met with a serious agreement from Daemon, devoid of any humor.

“If your pain ever resurfaces, I’ll apologize as many times as it takes, like it’s the first time.”

Just constantly, whenever, as long as you need it.

“So you have to give me the chance to apologize for the rest of our lives.”

Hearing him practically force his lifelong apologies upon her, Liv looked a bit taken aback. But she soon shrugged, accepting the reality with a calm demeanor.

“I guess there’s no helping it. I’ll just have to let you—it’s like saving a life.”

“It’s a good thing you’re such a compassionate person.”

Finally, a faint smile appeared on Daemon’s face. At the same time, their intertwined fingers shifted, his large hand gently rubbing Liv’s slender wrist. His thumb pressed down on the vein inside her wrist, the touch deliberate.

But the atmosphere, which had started to grow heavy, was suddenly interrupted by an indifferent voice.

“If you’ve finished your emotional reunion, may I conduct my examination now?”

Thierry, who had been forgotten for some time, stood with her arms crossed, looking at Daaemon and Liv with a bored expression. Next to her, Philip chuckled awkwardly.

“Thank you for your hard work, Dr. Gertrude.”

“I only have to do this occasionally, but you, Philip, have to deal with this kind of environment every day. You deserve more sympathy than I do.”

“Haha.”

The two of them, as if their earlier argument had been a lie, encouraged each other. Liv, embarrassed by their teasing tone, averted her gaze. Only Daaemon seemed oblivious, staring at them arrogantly as if he didn’t understand what the problem was.

“Tsk, how clueless.”

“Marquis, you haven’t forgotten that she’s still a patient, right?”

At those words, Daaemon reluctantly stood up. But even then, he moved slowly, making it clear that he didn’t want to leave. Liv, blushing, hung her head low, and Philip sighed, mixing a chuckle into it.

It was a typical day at the Langess mansion.

 



 

After losing her memory, Liv had been staying in a separate room from Daemon, but now she had decided to return to sharing the bedroom with him.

Moving rooms within the mansion wasn’t a hassle—after all, she was just returning to her original bedroom. However, it was only right to let Corida, who had shared the room to care for her, know about the change.

“Sorry, Corida. You’ve taken such good care of me all this time… but he can’t sleep without me.”

Corida snorted at Liv’s excuse. “Really, it’s just too much. Too dramatic.”

“Thanks to you, I was able to recover quickly. Thank you.”

“Alright, alright. Just go move your stuff.”

There wasn’t much to move, but Liv still looked around the room. It had been her living space for a while, so she wanted to make sure she hadn’t forgotten anything.

“Will your arm heal before the wedding?”

“Yes, they say it’s healing quickly, so it should be fine.”

“That’s good to hear.”

“Exactly. It means we’ll have a fun story to tell for the rest of our lives.”

As Liv and Corida chatted, a large shadow suddenly appeared in the doorway. It was Daemon, unable to wait any longer and having followed them.

“What do I need to move?”

“There’s no need for help. I’m just changing where I sleep, so there’s nothing heavy to move.”

There really wasn’t anything to move. When Liv held out her empty hands to prove her point, Daaemon frowned, denying her words.

“There’s something important that needs to be moved.”

“What?”

“You.”

“Ugh!”

Corida let out an exaggerated groan upon hearing that, rubbing her arms dramatically.

“Wow, seriously. No one will ever believe this.”

Liv, looking embarrassed, cleared her throat as if to regain her composure.

“Ahem. Not in front of Corida… No, I’m not letting you carry me!”

“Why not?”

Daemon, who had been about to pick her up as if it were the most natural thing in the world, frowned at her words, tilting his head in genuine confusion.

Seeing his earnest expression, Liv said with an exasperated look, “Because my legs aren’t injured!”

“But I promised I’d personally escort you wherever you go.”

“That wasn’t a promise; it was a unilateral declaration. And even if it was, no one actually expects you to follow through, Daemon!”

Not wanting to continue their overly affectionate display in front of Corida, Liv hurriedly dashed out of the room. Daaemon looked displeased as he watched her run off.

“Tsk.”

Daaemon clicked his tongue and turned as if to follow her. But then, unexpectedly, he stopped and looked back at Corida. Corida, who had been trying to calm her churning stomach, noticed his gaze and looked at him curiously.

Corida had seen Daaemon without Liv a few times before. So, the sudden transformation—the cold, aloof expression—didn’t scare her. It was just that…

“As you can see, we’re very happy. So, it would be best to tear up that useless train ticket.”

With that command disguised as a suggestion, Daaemon left the bedroom.

Left behind in a daze, Corida finally snapped out of it and pouted in annoyance. Mumbling under her breath, she pulled out the train ticket she had hidden deep in a drawer and thought to herself:

It’s a relief I can finally tear this up, but still… my sister is waaay too good for him.

 
---

THE END. Now rollins1338, Go write how you feel about it in your repo.
t lessen the public’s fascination. The volume of letters arriving at the Langess mansion also subtly increased.

“Oh.”

While sorting through the letters that had arrived with the newspaper, Philip found a neatly sealed one and let out a quiet exclamation. The letter was addressed to Liv.

Philip’s expression turned subtly complex upon checking the sender. He could already imagine how Daemon’s face would twist upon seeing it. Of course, Liv would be delighted to receive it.

What followed was obvious. Daaemon would reluctantly suppress his emotions upon seeing Liv’s joy, likely resorting to smoking a cigar and snapping at those around him.

Philip walked calmly, deciding that it would be wise to discreetly warn the staff not to upset their master.

 



 

Half-asleep, Daaemon became aware of the emptiness beside him.

A sudden, breath-stealing shock gripped his chest. Daemon, now wide awake, hastily sat up. At the same time, bright light poured into the once-dark bedroom. He frowned, turning his gaze.

He saw her pulling the thick curtains all the way open, letting the sunlight flood in. She had yet to notice that Daaemon was awake. Her long, flowing hair cascaded naturally behind her.

Through the fluttering silk chemise she wore, her skin was faintly visible. The sunlight from outside highlighted the curves of her body even more.

Daemon, his initial shock quickly fading, quietly watched her back. Liv seemed intent on adjusting all the curtains in the room without turning around.

“Leave that to a maid.”

His voice, lower and lazier than usual from just waking up, echoed through the once-quiet room. Liv turned at the sound of his voice. Bathed in sunlight, her figure seemed to glisten.

“You don’t like the staff coming in and out of here.”

It was true. Since long ago, aside from a skilled servant cautiously entering each morning to open the curtains, there hadn’t been much fuss in his bedroom. For Daemon, who was far from having restful sleep, the bedroom was a highly sensitive space.

Moreover, since Liv had moved into the Langess mansion, access to the bedroom had become even more restricted. The servant who used to enter each morning to wake Daaemon had stopped long ago, and now the staff simply waited for him to wake on his own.

Fortunately, Liv maintained a regular schedule, which meant the staff didn’t have to wait endlessly to serve breakfast. Daaemon always followed Liv’s waking time, and the staff were grateful for her consistency. Liv seemed to understand this as well.

However, the current situation wasn’t ideal.

“Better this than waking up to find you gone.”

Liv’s eyes widened at his reply, then her brows furrowed slightly. Her lips pressed together, the corners turned down.

She was apologizing now. She knew how much comfort Daaemon derived from her presence, especially given his frequent nightmares. She also knew that her past escape attempt had left him with a deep-seated anxiety.

“Did I scare you?” Liv asked, her voice tinged with worry, as Daaemon ran a hand through his disheveled hair.

“Yes.”

Over time, Daaemon had grown adept at expressing vulnerability. But Liv still hadn’t become immune to his uncharacteristic admissions. Whenever he said something so unlike him, she always took it to heart—like now.

As Liv moved closer to the bed, seemingly to check his expression, Daaemon reached out, wrapping his arm around her waist as if he had been waiting. In an instant, Liv’s body fell atop his.

He could feel her warmth through the thin fabric of her chemise.

Daaemon felt his mouth water. No matter how often he had her, his desire never seemed to be satiated—it only grew.

His hand slid sensuously along her slender waist, moving down to grab her round buttocks. Liv let out a soft noise—somewhere between a sigh and a moan.

“But if the staff came in here, you wouldn’t let me do this.”

“…Of course not.”

Liv, her face flushed a bright red, replied in a small but firm voice. It was the answer Daaemon had anticipated.

She wasn’t the type to display affection casually in front of others, nor had she yet grown comfortable enough with the Langess staff to be entirely open around them.

Perhaps it was because of the tumultuous escape and chase that marked their relationship.

Daemon’s aides and the staff were overly attentive to Liv—almost excessively so. They seemed constantly worried that, should she be upset, a situation like before might happen again.

They were especially overzealous in serving whenever Daaemon and Liv seemed on good terms, as if to remind him not to have any other thoughts.

Liv found all this attention burdensome, but Daaemon made no effort to stop them. In fact, he was secretly pleased. Philip, as always, had likely handled the staff discreetly. It was the kind of capable response he expected from his butler.

In short, having the staff enter was out of the question.

If a servant were to enter their room each morning to wake them, Liv would surely change her nightwear immediately—opting for a long, cumbersome nightgown instead of the sheer silk chemise she wore now.

“Well, there’s no helping it.”

Daaemon clicked his tongue in a feigned tone of regret.

“Then I’ll just leave the curtains alone.”

What did it matter if the curtains weren’t drawn? What was far more important was waking up and finding Liv beside him.

Burying his face into her neck as she squirmed in his arms, Daaemon let out a deep breath.

It was the start of a peaceful morning.

 



 

Damn Buerno.

Perhaps he should take back what he said about it being peaceful.

Sitting with his arms crossed, Daaemon thought that returning to Buerno in the first place had been a mistake. He should have stayed at the estate in Adelinde.

He had returned to ensure that people wouldn’t dare describe Liv as a mere mistress, gossiping behind her back. He had deliberately treated her with all the reverence she deserved, ensuring everyone in Buerno saw it.

His intention was to prove that all the circulating rumors were false, to make sure no one would ever dare to spread similar gossip again.

Daaemon had expected the change in the attitude of Buerno’s residents. People’s nature was predictable, especially in high society, where ignoring past offenses was practically a virtue.

Still, one should have some sense of shame.

“Baron Pendance?”

How dare they send an invitation after dismissing Liv?

“To be precise, it’s from Milion.”

“There’s no way the Pendance couple wouldn’t have seen the letter addressed to my estate.”

Daaemon responded in a displeased tone, glancing at the letter Liv held. It was obvious—the Pendance couple, now embarrassed, had pushed their daughter forward to extend an olive branch.

They were desperate to forge a connection with the woman who had Marquis Dietrion so utterly captivated. That letter was the best idea they could come up with after wracking their brains.

“A sudden reading session? How transparent.”

And the date was set for tomorrow. How inconsiderate could they be?

 Unlike the disgruntled Daemon, Liv had a calm expression.

“It seems they met the author by chance and hastily arranged this event. Milion had always wanted to invite the author of that famous romance novel, and I had promised to attend the reading session if it ever happened.”

“The famous author just happened to visit Buerno by chance? It’s far more plausible they paid a hefty sum to hastily schedule this event.”

Their intentions were transparent.

Having been eager to reconnect with Liv, the Pendances likely clung to some trivial promise made during a class to hastily prepare this event. That Lady Pendance, Milion, who had always liked Liv, must have cheerfully written the letter.

Had the invitation come from Baron Pendance or his wife, Liv might not have readily accepted. However, since it was Milion who sent it, Liv seemed genuinely pleased. She had been regretful about not properly saying goodbye when she was dismissed and still appeared to feel some lingering attachment.

Moreover, the reading session was not to be held at the Pendance mansion but rather at a location rented in the city of Buerno, which made the invitation much less burdensome for Liv.

It wasn’t difficult for Daaemon to predict that Liv would eventually accept the invitation.

“Do you not want me to attend?”

Daaemon narrowed his eyes at her question.

It wasn’t that he disliked the idea of Liv attending the reading session. He just disliked the thought of her reuniting with Milion there.

Milion was a girl around Corida’s age.

Liv, who cherished her sister dearly, might try to fill the void left by their separation with Milion. And Milion was like a duckling following its mother—no, more like a young lady who followed Liv everywhere she went.

Daaemon had no desire to share Liv’s attention with anyone else. Even his feelings toward her relationship with her sister, Corida, were tinged with irritation, let alone having Liv devote herself to someone else’s daughter.

“If that child from the Pendances clings to you, you won’t be able to shake her off.”

“I’ll make sure to conduct myself so as not to cause any trouble for the Dietrion.”

“I couldn’t care less about causing trouble.”

After all, even if Liv attended the reading session, there wouldn’t be any problems that affected the Dietrion. It was just…

“I don’t like the idea of expanding ‘the places your gaze touches.'”

If they met again, it wouldn’t be surprising if Liv and Milion rekindled their connection. This only reinforced Daemon’s regret about returning to Buerno in the first place. The rumors could have been quelled in other ways. He should have stayed with Liv in Adelinde, surrounded by strangers who knew nothing about her, monopolizing her entirely.

But then again, if they had stayed longer in Adelinde, it was likely that annoying children like Milion would have appeared there too, clinging to Liv. Liv was kind and polite to everyone, which would undoubtedly have drawn attention, even in Adelinde.

Having a popular lover was truly exhausting.

Liv found herself at a loss for words, staring at Daemon’s petulant jealousy, which seemed incongruous with his otherwise nonchalant demeanor.

Only after seeing Liv’s expression did Daaemon begin to wonder if he might be acting somewhat petty. Still, he unabashedly expressed his dissatisfaction. If he didn’t like something, he wasn’t going to pretend otherwise.

Liv looked at Daemon, her lips pressed into a tight line. After a moment of silence, Daemon’s voice softened slightly.

“…I’m not trying to force you to stay away.”

He hesitated briefly before adding, “I just want to say that you don’t have to put yourself through something unpleasant.”

Daaemon remembered Liv mentioning how she found others’ judgmental gazes intimidating.

His efforts to change Liv’s reputation within Buerno were one thing, but Liv having to face those people directly was another.

From Liv’s perspective, seeing the people who used to gossip about her suddenly acting obsequious was revolting. If it twisted Daemon’s insides just watching it happen, how much worse must it be for her?

“If you truly want to reconnect with Lady Pendance, we could arrange a more comfortable and private meeting instead.”

The reading session was nothing more than a pretext. Considering the other guests that would be in attendance, it would undoubtedly be an event full of uncomfortable glances. If anything, the Pendance family would probably prefer a private meeting rather than a formal event.

Liv’s expression turned slightly enigmatic at Daemon’s suggestion.

“Of course, if you did that, it would be more convenient for now. But it would only be a temporary solution. I can’t keep avoiding gatherings like this forever.”

With her lips pressed firmly together, Liv looked at Daaemon before clearing her throat softly and turning away.

“If I am to stay by your side for the rest of my life, I need to be resilient in the face of others’ opinions.”

How mature and wise she was. It was a stark contrast to a certain baron family who sent invitations pretending that nothing had ever happened.

Daaemon barely managed to suppress a sigh. The idea of showcasing such an incredible woman to others filled him with frustration and irritation. He found himself feeling a completely unnecessary sense of jealousy toward the attendees of the reading session, people he had never even met.

“You’ve already changed my reputation for the better. So now, I want to carry myself confidently.”

“Then I should attend with you.”

“Oh, I know you have other plans for tomorrow.”

As if plans couldn’t be changed. True, Daaemon had an appointment with guests coming from the capital, and postponing it would likely make Charles faint from shock. But Charles would adapt. Dates could always be rescheduled.

Liv either didn’t know what was on his mind or simply ignored it. She looked perfectly at ease, her earlier hesitation completely gone, as if she had made up her mind.

“Besides, with all the dresses and jewelry you’ve given me, I need to go out more often if I’m ever going to wear them.”

“You don’t need an invitation to wear those things…”

“But I’d like to show off the gifts you gave me, to someone, anyone.”

Speaking gently, as if soothing a child, Liv cupped Daemon’s cheek and gave him a light kiss.

“I’ll boast about it as much as I can—about how much I’m loved.”

Having gone this far, there was nothing left for Daaemon to say. Frowning, he finally nodded.

“Do as you please.”

A brief image of an entire room filled with dresses crossed Daemon’s mind. He was glad he had already prepared an abundance of clothing and accessories for her.

Now that it had come to this, he’d ensure she had the best outfit and jewelry for her outing.

 



 

The reading session was held near Buerno’s central plaza.

Daaemon personally dressed Liv from head to toe before escorting her to the venue. Even that was enough to be considered overprotective by many, but Daaemon took it a step further—he decided not to return home and instead waited nearby. The reason was simple: the venue was close to the central plaza.

The very plaza where Liv had once tried to flee from him.

Daaemon had sent Charles to meet the guest from the capital in his place. He even suggested that Charles use the opportunity to take a tour of Buerno. Though Charles had been shocked, it was more important to Daaemon to stay close to Liv than to entertain some visitor.

Of course, Daaemon understood rationally that Liv wasn’t going to run away. It wasn’t just a matter of logic; emotionally, he knew she had accepted him. Only yesterday, she had promised to stay by his side for the rest of her life.

It wasn’t that he doubted her feelings. It was just…

This was more like a lingering trauma—an inevitable side effect of having lost her once before.

By now, Daaemon wondered if it might have been better for him to simply accompany her, but Liv had turned down the suggestion once again that very morning.

“It’s a gathering for young ladies and madams. If you come, it won’t be a reading session anymore.”

Liv had gently declined his offer and went into the building alone. He thought he saw attendants at the entrance fussing over her, leading her inside with much fanfare. He couldn’t see what lay beyond the entrance.

As Liv said, the reading session was a women-only event. It seemed Baron Pendance and his wife, concerned about their daughter’s reputation and safety, had gone out of their way to make this clear.

If Daaemon were to follow her in, it would be seen as… quite unnecessary. Even if the Pendances wanted to strengthen their connection with the Marquis Dietrion, there were limits.

“I should have assigned a proper maid sooner.”

Daaemon bit his lip nervously, regretting his oversight.

The maids at the Langess mansion were few, and they were still in the process of hiring a new one specifically to attend to Liv. In particular, selecting a maid for Liv required extra care, which meant the position had not yet been officially filled.

Liv had chosen one of the existing maids, a competent one, to accompany her today, but that wasn’t enough for Daemon.

The maid needed to be highly skilled in various areas—not just in attending to Liv’s personal needs but also in terms of her family background, personality, health, and even basic self-defense abilities. Unfortunately, the applicants kept falling short when it came to the self-defense requirements.

For today, Liv was accompanied by a maid who had been temporarily assigned. Daaemon doubted the woman even knew how to handle a gun and worried about her ability to properly serve her mistress.

“It seems the event is proceeding without any major issues.”

“Can you not see inside?”

“No, it’s not visible through the windows.”

Roman, who had been tasked with keeping an eye on the reading session, reported carefully from outside the building. Daaemon frowned, glaring across at the building opposite.

If they were going to hold an event, why not host it somewhere open? What was so secretive that they needed to rent such a hidden venue?

From beginning to end, there was nothing about this situation that pleased him.

 “No special reports from the inside either.”

Naturally, Daaemon had hurriedly planted someone inside the event as well. It was to receive immediate reports if any issues arose. Judging from the lack of reports, it seemed the event was proceeding without incident. However, no news wasn’t exactly comforting.

“I should have instructed them to report periodically, even if there were no issues.”

Lately, it seemed that Daaemon found himself regretting things more often than before.

He took out a cigar, lighting it to suppress his growing frustration. Outside the carriage, Roman watched him and spoke in a low voice.

“It’s not a long event. There’s no need to worry…”

“You call wasting half a day ‘not long’?”

“It’s only half a day… Yes, very long indeed.”

Roman, who had responded reflexively, quickly corrected himself. Daaemon shot him a cold look, inhaling deeply on his cigar before turning his head away.

Charles and Adolf had also grown insolent lately, and now even Roman. Once, Philip had been the only one to talk back, but now it seemed everyone had grown rather cheeky. In the past, Daaemon wouldn’t have tolerated even the slightest lapse in discipline, but these days he couldn’t be bothered with such trivial matters. He was more interested in just getting through this tedious time.

After checking his pocket watch, Daaemon leaned back. The carriage was soon filled with thick cigar smoke. Just as he was taking another drag, the entrance to the event building opened, and someone stepped out. It was the person Daaemon had planted just the previous evening.

Daaemon narrowed his eyes.

It wasn’t yet time for the reading session to end. The fact that they had left the building meant there was a problem.

Almost as if he had been waiting for this moment, Daaemon threw his cigar to the ground, the polished toe of his shoe crushing the end of the red cigar.

 



 

Liv had heard enough from Charles and Adolf about how the rumors surrounding her had changed in Buerno.

Indeed, she could feel a slight difference in the way people looked at her when she went out with Daemon. However, the truth was, facing many people alone still made her anxious.

When Daaemon offered to arrange a private meeting with Milion instead, she had to admit she was tempted. As Daaemon pointed out, there really wasn’t a need for her to attend such an event alone. Even if Milion had extended the invitation, it wouldn’t have been strange for her to refuse, considering her past dismissal under poor circumstances.

Despite this, Liv decided to attend, and moreover, to do so without Daemon. It was because she realized that she couldn’t always live in the shadows of Daemon. Now that she had returned to Buerno with him and had resolved to stay by his side for the rest of her life, she needed to grow stronger.

Daaemon was a man who attracted attention even without his secretive past. A single outing with him was enough to stir all of Buerno. If she intended to stay by his side, Liv needed to grow accustomed to the public’s gaze and become resilient in the face of it.

Besides, this time, she had every right to hold her head high. She was his lover—not a mistress, but an equal standing partner.

To Liv, this was a determined decision.

“Teacher!”

To her relief, Milion greeted her warmly, just as she always had. The familiarity of Milion’s behavior helped put Liv at ease.

Milion, acting quite maturely, introduced Liv to the other guests. Outwardly, everyone was very polite to Liv, regardless of their true feelings. They all smiled warmly, whatever they might actually be thinking.

The mood was further enhanced when Baroness Pendance briefly appeared before the event began, publicly apologizing for “unilaterally dismissing her without verifying the truth.”

It was as if Baroness Pendance wanted to prove that this event was indeed Milion’s pure invitation. After offering her apology, she left the venue. After she departed, several unfamiliar guests stepped forward, each apologizing for their own “misunderstandings.”

From what Liv could gather, it seemed that the nude painting displayed on the street had been dismissed as a forgery. Technically, it wasn’t entirely false, since the painting had used her as a model, but it wasn’t something Liv felt compelled to correct. She simply accepted their apologies, doing her best to mask her embarrassment.

Overall, the atmosphere was pleasant. Even after the reading session featuring the special guest author began, the mood remained amicable. Although Liv hadn’t read the guest author’s book, Milion whispered explanations, making it easy to follow the story.

The problem arose just as the reading session was nearing its end.

“Oh, you mean whether the characters were inspired by real people?”

During the tea time that followed the elegant reading, someone asked the author a question. On the surface, it seemed a simple enough query.

However, the author, who had maintained a calm demeanor throughout, visibly stiffened at the question.

“Well…”

The author’s hesitation made her appear awkward, and the young lady who asked the question grew visibly uncomfortable. As the previously pleasant atmosphere took on an awkward silence, the author spoke in a rather curt manner.

“I can’t lie to my dear readers, so I’ll be honest: yes, the protagonists are always based on real individuals. There’s someone who has been a particularly significant inspiration to me. I’m sure everyone here knows of her.”

At that moment, Liv instinctively knew what the author was going to say next.

“Lady Luzia Malte.”

The author’s gaze fell on Liv, who was seated in the front. Though the author wore a subtle smile, Liv felt a faint hostility in her eyes.

“Please don’t be offended. You are… the Marquis’… uh, I’m not quite sure what to call you.”

The author smiled as she openly singled out Liv. In an instant, all eyes turned to her. Finding herself the sudden center of attention, Liv calmly parted her lips.

“Liv Rodaise.”

“Ah, Miss Rodaise. Yes. I never imagined I’d meet you here. What a surprise.”

The author laughed cheerfully, but her underlying emotions were evident—she wasn’t pleased. Liv was certain that most of the other guests picked up on it too.

Even after Luzia Malte had been forced into a convent, the author still spoke of her as “my muse.” It was clear that Luzia was someone incredibly important or special to her.

If that was the case, it was easy to understand why the author held such animosity toward Liv. After all, it was Liv who had been at the center of the dispute between Daaemon and Luzia.

Liv licked her lips briefly before answering calmly. “I didn’t expect you to know me.”

She suspected that the author had known her name from the very beginning.

Upon hearing Liv’s response, the author smiled, her voice intentionally softening. “Well, you’ve been making quite a stir lately.”

No matter what relationship the author had with Luzia or how she felt toward Liv because of it, Liv had no interest in it.

Just because the people of Buerno were now smiling in her presence didn’t mean she believed everyone in the world held a favorable opinion of her. No matter how much Daaemon spread the story, Liv didn’t expect everyone to accept it. Naturally, there would be people like this author who viewed her with disdain.

Liv didn’t need everyone to like her.

But by the same token, she had no reason to tolerate the hostility directed at her.

After testing the waters, the author watched Liv’s reaction, while Liv responded with a composed smile.

“As you said, Lady Malte certainly faced her share of disgrace recently.”

The author’s lips tightened slightly. She shrugged and answered nonchalantly, “Well, the media always shows just one side of the story, you know? Every narrative has its characters and flow of events. They just presented the most sensational side of things this time.”

“You seem to distrust the media quite a bit.”

“Writing as I do, I hear a lot from those around me. You need to listen from all angles if you want to write properly.”

The author smiled meaningfully, glancing at the other guests. “Besides, nothing is more fascinating than a scandal.”

It was clear she was referring to the rumors about Daaemon and a “mistress.” It seemed she had heard her share of gossip somewhere.

As Liv watched her with indifferent eyes, someone suddenly raised their hand and spoke up, “Author.”

The one who spoke, with a slightly tense smile and a firm voice, was Milion. Perhaps because it was her reading session, she seemed particularly determined to lighten the tense atmosphere in the room.

“It seems there are other guests who also have questions.”

Hearing Milion’s words, the author sighed softly and turned her attention away. At the same time, another young lady quickly interjected with a question.

Seeing this, Milion subtly leaned toward Liv.

“Teacher, this is…”

“It’s fine, Milion.”

How could Milion possibly be at fault? How important could it be to verify every personal connection of an invited author? If Daaemon was right, this reading session was likely hastily organized, and there probably wasn’t enough time to verify the author’s relationship with Luzia.

Even if they had known, they might not have considered it an issue. After all, the reading session itself wasn’t important—what mattered more was finding an excuse to meet Liv again.

“I’m sorry.”

“You have nothing to apologize for.”

Who could have expected that the author would reveal such personal resentment in a setting like this?

 
Despite Liv’s words, Milion still appeared uneasy. Perhaps Baroness Pendance had given her specific instructions before the event began, as Milion occasionally glanced at Liv with concern.

Then, she quietly spoke to her again, “After the reading session, we should…”

She was likely about to suggest that they catch up since it had been a long time. However, Milion was unable to finish her sentence because the author once again directed her attention towards them.

“I heard you enjoyed my novel, Lady Pendance.”

“Oh? Yes, yes!”

“For someone who enjoyed it, you don’t seem particularly interested in me.”

Milion’s eyes widened at the author’s words.

“Or perhaps there’s an implicit protagonist for this event?”

he author asked this without a hint of a smile. It seemed she had guessed the true intention behind the reading session, which had initially appeared to be the pure endeavor of a young lady with a love for literature.

“You’ve shown quite a lot of interest in just one person, and I was curious.”

Milion’s smile turned awkward. Liv glanced at Milion’s embarrassed face, then turned her gaze towards the author. It was clear what the author was trying to criticize.

The author was expressing her displeasure with how Milion, as the event host, was focusing her attention solely on Liv.

But was there really any need to voice such displeasure in this way?

Picking on Milion like this would inevitably strain the relationship between her and the Pendance family. What reason could the author have for doing this?

“A protagonist must have a noble background, exceptional beauty, and an extraordinary story. No one is interested in the narrative of an ordinary woman. Since you’re one of my readers, I thought you would naturally understand that.”

Hearing the author’s words, Liv let out a quiet, involuntary sigh.

If anyone had an extraordinary story, noble background, and beauty, it was Luzia Malte. It seemed that the author wanted to indirectly insult Liv. Who knew just how close she had been to Luzia to openly express such animosity towards Liv?

Liv played with the handle of the teacup before her, contemplating for a moment.

If she reacted to every one of the author’s provocations, it would ruin the atmosphere of the event and put Milion in a difficult position. Judging by Milion’s anxious expression, she was clearly troubled by the situation.

Though Milion was the host, she was still a young lady in the early stages of learning her role. She probably hadn’t anticipated this kind of conflict, which only added to her discomfort. Liv thought it might be best to avoid unnecessary trouble, for Milion’s sake… but she didn’t see the need to hold back.

“If you can’t handle writing about diverse characters, isn’t that a lack of skill as a novelist…?”

She murmured as if talking to herself, but there was no way her voice wouldn’t carry. Liv had spoken clearly enough for everyone to hear. She widened her eyes slightly, as if realizing her mistake belatedly.

“Oh. That was just a personal thought.”

Liv, gently stroking her chin with her fingertips, then added in a calm tone, “But I do think it’s quite narrow-minded and lazy for someone who claims to be a creator.”

“…Excuse me?”

“Doesn’t everyone have a unique story? Every person is one of a kind. Yet, according to your perspective, it seems only certain people are meant to be protagonists.”

“Well, of course…”

“It seems you’ve relied too heavily on real people as inspiration for your writing. Perhaps it’s time to develop your own imagination and creativity. I hope you’ll explore a broader world of storytelling.”

The author’s lips parted, and her cheeks gradually reddened. Just as she was about to retort, her face contorting in frustration, there was a sharp sound that echoed through the hall.

Thump!

A loud, brief noise resounded, breaking the tense atmosphere of the event. Those who had been watching Liv and the author suddenly realized the presence of a new figure.

Liv also turned her head towards the source of the noise. Standing at the entrance of the event hall was a man, leaning on a cane. It was evident that the sound had been made by the cane striking the floor.

His piercing blue eyes, which had been scanning the hall, found Liv. His gaze, sharp as a well-honed blade, softened for an instant. The change was so subtle that no one but Liv might have noticed.

Most of the attendees were shocked by the sudden appearance of Daemon, but Liv wasn’t particularly surprised. In fact, she was more surprised by her own lack of reaction to his arrival.

It seemed she had unconsciously anticipated that he would be unable to wait for her and would barge in like this.

“Daemon.”

The crowd, who had been staring at Daaemon in shock, now turned their astonished gazes towards Liv. Among them was Milion, whose pale face seemed on the verge of losing consciousness as she stammered, “Di-Di-Di…”

Liv, who had thrown the hall into chaos, rose gracefully, her expression composed.

“As you can see, someone has come to pick me up, so I’m afraid I must leave early. Milion, it was lovely seeing you after so long.”

No one stopped Liv, and she left the hall calmly with Daaemon escorting her.

 



 

After returning from the reading session, Daaemon immediately ordered a thorough investigation of the author who had antagonized Liv. Charles, alarmed by Daemon’s fury, dropped everything else to conduct the investigation, which led to a swift report.

“Her pen name is Miel, her real name is…”

“Who cares about her name?”

Daaemon snapped sharply, causing Charles to cough awkwardly. He quickly flipped past the pages containing unnecessary personal details and cleared his throat before continuing.

“She was sponsored by Lady Malte. However, due to the recent trial, her sponsorship seems to have been jeopardized.”

“Is she bitter because she lost her patronage?”

Even so, why direct that bitterness towards Liv? It was Daemon, not Liv, who had brought Luzia to her current state. How incompetent did one have to be to fail to grasp such a simple fact?

Displeasure surged within him. To blindly lash out without understanding the full picture was utterly foolish.

Of course, Daaemon could guess why the author had targeted Liv instead of confronting him directly—antagonizing Marquis Dietrion would be madness, so she had aimed for what seemed like an easier target. But anyone with even a bit of sense should have known better than to provoke Liv. After all, anyone who had crossed Liv, like Luzia, had faced dire consequences.

In every way, the author was foolish.

“She seems to be seeking a new sponsor now. She’s avoiding Torsten, likely due to the Malte family’s influence, and has moved to Beren.”

“So her goal was Baron Pendance’s money,” Daaemon muttered coldly, furrowing his brow.

It seemed Miel had tried to win over Baron Pendance at the reading session. However, upon arriving, she found that Baroness Pendance had left early, and Milion, the event’s host, was solely focused on Liv, which displeased her.

The entire reading session had likely revolved around Liv. Daaemon could easily imagine the scene without having witnessed it. The author, already frustrated due to the Luzia affair, must have been further incensed by the attention Liv received.

“It seems her spending habits are quite extravagant, and she can’t sustain them with her book earnings alone.”

No surprise there. Given that she had been sponsored by Luzia, she must have mingled with high society and grown accustomed to a lavish lifestyle beyond her means.

When Daaemon first heard that the invited author had antagonized Liv, he could hardly believe it.

Daaemon pressed his fingers to his temples, a look of irritation crossing his face.

“How pathetic.”

He leaned back against his chair, gesturing dismissively. Understanding the unspoken command, Charles quickly bowed and left the room.

After Charles departed, Daaemon also stood. He intended to find Liv and comfort her, as her mood was surely ruined after an unpleasant encounter at the reading session.

“Where is Liv?”

“She is resting in her room.”

Upon hearing the servant’s reply, Daaemon hurried his steps.

 



 

“Oh, sponsorship…”

After hearing Daemon’s explanation, Liv nodded, her expression subtly complex.

“I did find it a bit odd. The animosity she showed couldn’t be explained solely by her relationship with Lady Malte.”

Liv’s voice, as she murmured this, was so calm that she seemed like someone relaying a story unrelated to herself.

Daaemon already knew what Miel had said to Liv. He had heard that Miel had belittled Liv, bringing up Luzia’s name, mocking her without overt insults but rather with sneering, sarcastic remarks. Liv, sharp as she was, couldn’t have missed the intent behind Miel’s words.

Attending the event to show herself confidently in front of others must have made the experience all the more unpleasant for her.

Daaemon knew that, apart from matters involving Corida, Liv rarely showed her emotions. But even so, her demeanor was almost too calm. It reminded him of the day when her nude painting was displayed in public.

Instead of getting angry that day, she had remained composed, tricked him, and left him behind without hesitation…

A sudden sense of unease crept in, prompting Daaemon to speak quickly.

“I’ve already instructed Charles to handle it, so there’s no need for you to think about that woman.”

At his words, Liv’s eyes widened briefly, then she smiled faintly.

“It seems like you’re more concerned about her than I am.”

Liv chuckled softly, almost as if she found the situation amusing.

“In the past, I think you would have agreed with her.”

 “No way.”

Daaemon immediately rejected her statement, frowning. However, Liv asked again with a face that clearly showed she didn’t believe him.

“Really?”

“Of course…”

Of course, he wouldn’t have agreed that she was lacking compared to Luzia.

Daaemon was about to say as much, but stopped when he met Liv’s gaze, her eyes staring at him quietly. His tongue, which had been about to move smoothly, seemed to freeze in place.

Neither of them had forgotten how their relationship had begun and how it had continued. Liv had seen Daaemon closer than anyone else and was a woman who quickly understood what Daaemon wanted.

Daemon, who had been about to say something, eventually lowered his voice slightly and admitted:

“Yes, I would have agreed.”

The old him, at least.

To be honest, there was no need for such a grand qualifier like “the old him.” It was still true now that Luzia had a higher social status than Liv and that they came from completely different worlds.

Daaemon believed that, regardless of his dislike for high society, there were still distinctions between its members. Status and power were clear indicators of those distinctions. Although his perspective had become a little skewed because of Liv, that was only because she was involved. Outside of situations involving Liv, Daaemon hadn’t changed one bit.

Especially back when he hadn’t yet realized his feelings for her?

Naturally, he would have acknowledged the gap in status and power between Liv and Luzia. But…

“Even if I agreed, I would have felt inexplicably annoyed.”

Yes, Luzia came from a good family and had a high status. Because of that, she might deserve to be treated with more respect than Liv. And yet…

Even knowing Liv’s objectively lacking circumstances, he wouldn’t have been able to tolerate it. He might have understood in his head that Luzia was treated as more valuable than Liv, but in his heart, he would never have agreed.

Just thinking about it was enough to make him angry again. He should remind Charles to deal with that author, Miel, even more thoroughly.

“And since it upset me, I would have found a way to make that author pay.”

Liv let out a breathy laugh at Daemon’s words.

“That’s a strange logic.”

“I’ve always been strange when it comes to you.”

Daaemon responded in a nonchalant tone, reaching out to wrap his arm around Liv’s waist.

The distance between Liv and Daaemon closed. Daaemon could smell the strong scent of roses on her, as she had mentioned taking a stroll through the rose garden while Charles gave him his report. It was as if she was wrapped in the scent of blooming red roses, and it suited her perfectly.

“Looking back, every moment.”

He lightly bit down on her slightly parted lips, catching the faint taste of cream. He could easily imagine Liv being persuaded by Philip to enjoy a simple tea while walking through the rose garden.

Daaemon imagined Liv, sitting at the white outdoor table between the half-bloomed rose petals, leisurely eating a piece of sweet cream cake—a scene that fit naturally into the daily life of Langess mansion, like it belonged there.

His lower body tightened.

“I can’t understand why it took me so long to realize.”

Liv let out a low laugh, wrapping her arms around Daemon’s neck and pulling him close.

 



 

It was true that Miel’s taunts had upset her.

However, the unpleasantness was easier to control than she had expected. Not only had she not remained silent in the face of Miel’s words, but the sight of Daaemon barging into the reading session had unexpectedly set her mind at ease.

She didn’t need to think too hard to know that he would respond immediately to such insults.

Miel, who had crossed borders in search of a new patron, would not achieve her goal. Considering Daemon’s unforgiving nature, it was uncertain whether she would even be able to continue her work as an author.

To be honest, Liv didn’t pity Miel. She didn’t want to stop Daaemon from retaliating.

To put it bluntly, Liv rather liked the fact that Daemon, enraged by her insult, would demand appropriate retribution. That was all.

‘I don’t care anymore.’

Yes, she no longer cared about how others treated her.

While working as a tutor and secretly continuing her relationship with Daemon, Liv had always been conscious of others’ eyes and the rumors that would spread. She thought her life could be easily shaken by even the slightest careless words.

Even when she returned to Buerno after confirming Corida’s enrollment in Adelinde, a part of her was still worried. But she thought she had to endure it. It was her choice, her desire to stay by Daemon’s side. Having made that decision, she had to take responsibility for the consequences.

When she met Milion again and found herself less nervous than she had expected, she thought it was merely because she was reconnecting with someone familiar.

But even when she faced Miel’s confrontation and drew attention from everyone at the event, Liv wasn’t scared or burdened.

After returning to Langess mansion with Daemon, Liv found herself wondering why she felt so at ease.

‘Is it because of this man?’

Late at night, Liv stared at the man lying peacefully beside her. The faint embers of the fireplace cast a soft glow on his face.

His long, even lashes, his straight nose, his lips closed in a line—with his eyes closed in peaceful sleep, Daemon’s face was angelic.

Liv raised her eyes without thinking, gazing at his face as if entranced. She soon came to her senses, slowly blinking. While nestled against him, she shifted slightly. When she rested her head against his bare chest, she heard the steady thumping of his heartbeat.

Even if it was only for a few hours, Daaemon always seemed to fall into a surprisingly deep sleep whenever he went to bed with Liv. He breathed so quietly when he was asleep that Liv would sometimes press her ear to his chest during sleepless nights, just like now.

In the stillness of the bedroom, the sound of his heartbeat seemed exceptionally loud. As she focused on that sound, her heart gradually calmed. At the same time, her paused thoughts began to stir again.

‘On my side.’

No, rather than saying ‘on my side’…

‘My person.’

Liv’s gaze rose again. The sleeping man’s face looked so serene that it was hard to believe he was usually so sensitive. If she were to touch that face, would he wake up?

Even if he did wake up, he wouldn’t get mad at her for interrupting his rest. After all, Liv was his ‘exception.’

This man loved her. So much so that it was impossible not to know. He was utterly devoted to her. The proud, fastidious man softened his thorns and bent his head submissively only for her. Yet he was also a man who didn’t hesitate to wield his power for her sake.

His love gave her stability. The fears she had carried throughout her life no longer seemed significant—not when he supported her.

Suddenly, Liv felt her heart itch. Her emotions were overflowing to such an extent that she felt as though they might burst at any moment.

She wanted to do something special for him. To ease his worries and show him that he, too, was her ‘exception.’

Just as she could easily understand his feelings, she wished he could also feel her emotions just as easily.

Sometimes, the early hours of dawn lead people into irrational thoughts. The chaotic thoughts swirling in her head right now might just be a temporary phenomenon, like morning dew that disappears with the sunrise. But Liv had already been seized by an unusual impulse.

Staring at the peacefully sleeping Daemon, she made up her mind.

She would show him her love.

Just as he had given her peace of mind, this time, she would bring comfort to his heart.

 



 

Milion requested a meeting, wanting to apologize for the incident at the reading session.

This prompted Liv to rekindle her interactions with Milion. Daaemon watched Liv leave for her outings, barely concealing his disappointment. Even for him, there was no way he could follow her when she went to meet Milion.

In truth, he could have, but Liv, knowing him all too well, had asked him to ‘let her meet comfortably,’ leaving him no choice.

The problem was that others, having witnessed this, began to change their approach and started to reach out to Liv again. Word got around that Liv had a soft spot for young ladies, thanks to Milion, and soon enough, people in Buerno were sending their daughters or cousins to get close to her.

The girls were around Corida’s age, and Liv seemed less inclined to draw a firm line with them, as she had in the past.

“Damn Buerno.”

Daaemon thought irritably, feeling as if he was increasingly gripped by the same frustrations. His fingers tapped impatiently on the book before him.

“A ring won’t be of any use against children.”

Liv always wore the ring that Daaemon had given her, but it could only deter the advances of scheming men. Young girls paid no attention to the ring; they just wanted to befriend Liv.

That very morning, he heard that Milion had asked Liv to resume the lessons she hadn’t completed. Liv hadn’t given her an answer yet, but Daaemon was already displeased that Milion had even made such a request.

Seeing Milion do this, the other young ladies would likely follow suit, and Liv seemed unlikely to refuse them. Given how she had enjoyed her role as a governess, she seemed well-suited to teaching others.

What if she tried to fill the space left by Corida with these girls?

 If only I had already made her the Marchioness, I could have easily justified keeping others from receiving any lessons from her by stating that she was too noble for such tasks.

Daaemon frowned at the documents in front of him, clearly frustrated.

“Why is this process taking so long?”

Unfortunately, Adolf, who had come merely to report on the progress, bore the brunt of Daemon’s displeasure. Adolf looked momentarily disheartened, though he quickly adapted to the situation and replied in an even voice.

“Well, it’s because you chose Eleonore as one of the witnesses for the marriage oath, Marquis.”

“So what?”

The Eleonore family should be grateful and sign eagerly, considering they were covering up the disgraceful actions of their son, who had overstepped boundaries with someone else’s lover.

Daaemon glared sharply at Adolf—a look that made his thoughts unmistakable without words. Adolf took a deep breath, doing his best to remain calm as he continued.

“…Camille Eleonore is quite beloved in his family.”

“What does their affection for that brat have to do with my marriage oath?”

Adolf couldn’t help but marvel at how quickly Daaemon reduced Camille from a beloved son to a “brat.” Adolf gave a dry laugh.

“The cherished brat is throwing a tantrum, and his parents can’t ignore it.”

“Are they suggesting they want to cancel the negotiation?”

Being a witness to the marriage oath was only one part of the agreement between the parties involved. While it may have seemed less important compared to other clauses from Eleonore’s perspective, Daaemon certainly wasn’t going to let it slide.

“They’re not refusing to sign; rather, they’re trying to delay it as much as possible.”

“There’s nothing to gain by doing that.”

“Exactly, which is why it’s simply a childish tantrum—a spoiled brat’s stubbornness.”

“Pathetic child.”

Daaemon scoffed. If Camille had openly tried to block the marriage, Daaemon might have at least respected the audacity—even if it meant cursing him as a madman. But this? Delaying things out of petty spite? Such pettiness was why Liv had never spared Camille a second glance. The boy remained foolish and small-minded to the very end.

He laughed mockingly at Camille, wishing that the brat would be forced to watch his marriage to Liv unfold before his eyes, causing him endless agony.

“But in the end, Eleonore will sign.”

“Of course.”

Daaemon hadn’t chosen Eleonore as a witness solely to spite Camille. The main reason was that the Eleonore family was a well-respected noble house in Beren.

Having an influential figure act as a witness increased the value of the marriage. With the Eleonore family’s respected name on the oath, it would also strengthen Liv’s authority as the future Marchioness.

Of course, the Eleonore name had faced some scandal lately due to Camille’s disgraceful actions. But at least Daaemon hadn’t hauled him into court, as he had Luzia. In his heart, Daaemon would have preferred to issue a public challenge and settle things permanently and legally.

“Yes, Camille Eleonore is fond of Miss Rodaise, after all. He should understand how much his family’s name on this oath will benefit her. Eventually…”

Adolf trailed off abruptly as he saw Daemon’s expression change at the mention of Camille’s feelings for Liv.

“…Eventually, Eleonore will sign, thanks to the astute negotiation conducted by you, my lord. Thus, it will be you who pave the smooth path ahead for Miss Rodaise.”

Adolf narrowly avoided making a serious mistake with his quick redirection. Daaemon clicked his tongue in disapproval but didn’t press the issue further, shifting his focus back to the documents. Adolf let out a silent sigh of relief.

“Tell them to take their time, but sign eventually.”

“Understood.”

Having survived the tension, Adolf was now visibly calmer as he answered. He was about to leave after giving a polite bow when he noticed Daaemon picking up his coat, preparing to head out.

“Are you going out, sir?”

Adolf was certain that Daaemon didn’t have any outings planned for today, though he had heard that Liv was out. Did that mean…

“Should I confirm Miss Rodaise’s whereabouts?”

“No.”

“Pardon? Then where are you headed now?”

Adolf’s eyes widened, surprised that Daaemon wasn’t about to go after Liv.

Daemon, who gave him a disdainful look, answered curtly, “Art lessons.”

 



 

If there was one thing Daaemon found somewhat acceptable about Liv reconnecting with Milion, it was that it had led to fewer shared sessions with the art teacher.

Liv hadn’t quit her art lessons entirely—she simply couldn’t attend them as often due to her frequent outings. Meanwhile, Daemon, with little reason to leave and no desire for extended absences, continued with his usual lesson schedule.

Their gap in skill had become evident over time, and their lessons began to differ. Liv’s skills had been improving rapidly, whereas Daaemon was still struggling. Even if it wasn’t just about the frequency of their lessons, it seemed inevitable that their classes would diverge.

Daaemon needed extra lessons, much like a struggling student staying behind after class for remedial help.

As much as he hated to admit it, Daaemon had to acknowledge that, when it came to art, he was very much a slow learner.

“You are truly consistent in your steadfastness, Marquis!”

Daaemon shot a sideways glance at his art teacher, who clapped in exaggerated admiration. He turned his gaze back to the canvas before him.

“Are you saying there’s been no progress at all?”

“Well, an unwavering skill is quite remarkable in itself…”

“I asked for improvement, not to stay the same.”

Daaemon cut him off coldly. The teacher, now used to the routine, calmly took out a handkerchief and wiped his forehead before responding in a composed manner.

“It seems to me that there’s impatience in your brushstrokes, Marquis. Instead of focusing on completing the piece immediately, you might benefit from observing the subject more thoroughly, contemplating, and taking your time…”

“I’ve already spent plenty of time observing and contemplating the subject.”

Every night, Daaemon looked at Liv—thoroughly, attentively, never missing a single detail. He studied her meticulously, touching and caressing every part of her body.

Who else in this world could know Liv’s body better than him? Even when she wasn’t present, Daaemon could clearly picture her in his mind.

The problem was that his mind wasn’t a canvas he could show to others.

“Tsk.”

Frustrated by his stagnant progress, Daaemon threw down his brush. He had recently been visiting the shooting range and training grounds again, trying to regain the dexterity he once had when he was adept at handling all sorts of weapons. But it seemed those efforts weren’t enough.

Maybe he should change his canvas. Perhaps the texture was too rough, making it difficult to draw proper lines.

The fact that he had already replaced his tools several times seemed to have slipped Daemon’s mind. Crossing his arms, he glared at the canvas for a while before his gaze shifted to something else.

Not far away, an empty chair and easel stood. It was Liv’s spot.

Even when they took lessons together, Daaemon never bothered to peek at her canvas because Liv didn’t want him to. But he could roughly guess what she was drawing. Like him, Liv had a clear objective when she started learning art.

“What has Liv been drawing lately?”

“She has been very interested in portraiture.”

It seemed Liv’s plan to draw Daemon’s nude portrait was progressing steadily. Daaemon nodded, a satisfied smile on his face, before narrowing his eyes. Something felt off about the usual setup.

“Where is Liv’s canvas?”

“Oh, since her lessons are less frequent now, she said it would be better to work on it separately. I’ve already reviewed the basics, so she’s capable of continuing on her own.”

Separately?

Daemon’s expression shifted slightly.

Liv was staying at the Langess mansion. Although her residence in Buerno still existed, it was safe to say that her true home was now at the Langess mansion. Therefore, if she wanted to work on her art separately, it only made sense for her to bring her canvas there.

And besides, he had always attended her art lessons with her. If she had taken the canvas, he would have noticed.

“When did she take it?”

“Quite some time ago.”

“Did you meet her personally?”

“No, not at all! The future Marchioness sent a letter, and afterward, she came by herself to collect it.”

The sharp tension Daaemon had felt eased slightly at the teacher’s prompt response, though an unpleasant feeling lingered.

Daaemon tilted his head, staring at the empty chair and easel.

There was nothing inherently wrong with Liv taking her canvas. If she wished to work on it alone, he could easily accommodate her. He would even go as far as offering an entire mansion for her to use as her studio.

It was just… what bothered Daaemon was the whereabouts of the canvas. If she had taken it to the mansion without his knowledge, that would be one thing. But if, by any chance…

If by any chance the canvas wasn’t at the mansion, it would mean Liv had her own space somewhere that he didn’t know about.

 “The lesson is over.”

Daaemon stood up immediately. He had to return to the mansion and meet with Philip. No one, person or item, could enter or leave the mansion without Philip knowing. If Liv had brought the canvas back, Philip would surely know.

The art teacher, pleased by the prospect of ending work much earlier than usual, quickly tidied up his things, hiding his joy.

As he offered Daaemon an overly polite farewell, Daaemon said in a dry voice, “The marriage is near, so it makes no difference if you think of her as the Marchioness already. There’s no need for unnecessary ‘future’ qualifiers.”

Daaemon believed in correcting things that needed correction, no matter the urgency.

The art teacher seemed at a loss for words at Daemon’s statement, falling silent for a moment before slowly nodding.

“…Oh, yes.”

Though it wasn’t exactly a satisfactory response, Daaemon didn’t have time to nitpick. He strode out of the studio with larger-than-usual steps, his face even more hardened than usual.

 



 

…Had she set up a secret place, hiding it from me?

This was the first thought that crossed Daemon’s mind when he heard from Philip that there was no canvas stored within the mansion. A cold sensation swept over his body, like a bucket of ice water had been poured over him. His fingertips tingled as if all the blood had drained from them.

Since returning to Buerno, Liv hadn’t had anyone secretly following her. They were living together now, so he hadn’t needed constant reports on her every move. He knew her general outings, but he didn’t have anyone shadowing her or reporting on her actions.

‘Was my confidence too premature?’

Daaemon ordered Philip to confirm once again, and as he strolled through the rose garden, he found himself lost in thought. As he waited for Liv to return, countless possible scenarios flashed through his mind only to be dismissed. His thoughts were disorganized, his reason and emotions clashing moment to moment.

It was the most inefficient use of time imaginable. Even knowing this, Daaemon couldn’t stop the chain of suspicions and anxieties from gnawing at him. The sense of control he thought he had was giving way to a lurking volatility, and he was tempted to fall back on the familiar, straightforward solutions he’d relied on all his life.

If Liv had secrets, he had the means to uncover them all. A few words to his subordinates would be enough to reveal everything.

Yet, he hesitated.

He had decided of his own accord not to pry into her affairs. All he could do now was wait for her return. And so he found himself aimlessly pacing the rose garden, doing nothing but wasting time.

Liv returned home just as the twilight of the setting sun began to cast its orange hue over the rose garden. Until that moment, Daaemon had been wasting time inefficiently.

“Daemon!”

Hearing that he was in the garden, Liv came directly to find him, still dressed in her outing clothes. Her steps were light and lively as she approached him.

Daaemon had intended to ask her about the canvas as soon as they met. He could tell himself he had been patient enough simply by not investigating behind her back. A slightly sharp inquiry could be justified.

At least, that was what he thought until he faced her.

“Did you come out here to greet me?”

Her eyes sparkled as she asked, her voice full of excitement. Just seeing her like that made the tension that had been coiled tightly within him for hours slacken.

“You said you didn’t like seeing the roses wither. You usually prefer the rear garden to this one.”

“…You can see the entrance from here.”

The rose garden offered the best view of the carriages approaching the mansion. Not that it made a huge difference compared to waiting inside, but he hadn’t been in the right state of mind to sit still and wait, so he had chosen the place where he could see her return just a little bit sooner.

“So you came out to meet me.”

Liv’s conclusion was correct. Though it wasn’t for the tender reason she was likely imagining now, there was no need to ruin her joy. Daaemon gave her a subdued nod, and Liv’s eyes crinkled as she broke into a radiant smile.

Had her outing been particularly enjoyable today? She looked genuinely happy—happier than she’d been in recent memory.

And now, Daaemon realized he couldn’t bring himself to interrogate her. He didn’t want to upset her with suspicions when she looked at him so innocently, with no idea of what had been troubling him. In the end, what escaped his lips was not an accusation but a simple comment.

“…It seems you had a good time.”

“Oh, right. I visited a lakeside today. Not the one we’ve been to—a different place. It’s not well known yet, but I think you’d like it.”

Learning that she intended to take him with her next time gradually eased the turmoil in his mind.

Of course, she hadn’t taken the canvas to some secret place for some clandestine reason. If Liv had intended to plan something behind his back, she would have been much more meticulous. The canvas was likely left somewhere in her carriage, or perhaps it was stored in some corner of the mansion that Philip had overlooked.

There was no reason for her to hide anything from him. Liv wasn’t bound by any contract anymore. She was staying by his side of her own free will.

Still, he disliked leaving even a hint of suspicion lingering. He decided he would bring it up casually during dinner.

Surely, Liv would answer easily, brushing it off as nothing important.

 



 

He didn’t ask.

As ridiculous as it was, every time Daaemon tried to ask about the canvas, it felt as though something was stuck in his throat, and no sound would come out. After a few failed attempts, Daaemon analyzed his state with his characteristic rationality.

What was stopping him from asking?

It wasn’t hard to find the answer. He was afraid of her response. Whatever Liv’s answer might be, it was bound to unsettle him.

If she admitted there was a place he didn’t know about, he would hate the fact that she had created such a place. But if she denied it, pretending such a place didn’t exist, he would only grow more suspicious inside. Whether it was a yes or a no, he didn’t want to hear it.

Did he really need to know the whereabouts of that canvas? Was it really that significant? Wherever Liv kept it, did it truly matter?

No matter where she went during the day, she would always return to sleep beside him. That wouldn’t change.

When Liv, who had been in a good mood throughout dinner, continued to appear cheerful even in the bedroom, Daaemon found himself unusually lenient. He wanted to let go of trivial annoyances.

The more he thought about it, the less important the issue seemed.

Rather than worrying about the canvas, it was far more productive to focus his attention on Liv right in front of him.

After finishing her preparations for bed, Liv climbed into bed, her skin fresh and warm from a recent bath. She nestled against him without hesitation, her body pressing partly against his chest.

She was not just in a good mood; she was almost overly affectionate. Had something particularly good happened?

Before Daaemon could ask, Liv spoke first, her face bright with excitement.

“Today, Milion gave me tickets to a concert. The performers are supposed to be skilled enough to be invited by the royal family.”

Concert tickets had made her this happy?

It was such an unexpected reason that Daaemon frowned slightly without realizing it.

“I thought you didn’t like performances.”

Daaemon recalled the time they had gone to see an opera together.

“I remember you didn’t have a favorable opinion of it.”

“If high society’s idea of proper decorum is like that, then I’d rather not attend performances in person.”

That was what she had said back then. Despite the dark interior of the theater, people’s eyes had followed them throughout the opera, and Liv had found it extremely uncomfortable and intimidating. In fact, she had even described it as “threatening.”

It wasn’t just a matter of disliking it—it had made her feel genuinely unsafe. After that, Daaemon hadn’t considered taking her to another theater.

Liv seemed to remember the same day, letting out a low sigh.

“It was like that back then.”

“And it’s not as if people’s gazes have changed much since then.”

While saying that, Daaemon adjusted Liv’s position on top of him. As their lower bodies made closer contact, he could feel his arousal building, his half-erect member now fully hardening.

Liv must have felt his erection pressing against her, yet she seemed less affected than he was, more focused on reminiscing about the past.

“Things are different now.”

The green eyes that had been filled with joy suddenly dimmed, and Liv gazed steadily down at Daaemon without blinking.

“Back then, you didn’t care at all about my reputation. That’s why I was so nervous.”

Daemon’s fingers, which had been about to push aside the thin chemise she wore, paused.

Momentarily at a loss for words, Daaemon missed his chance to respond and remained silent.

During that opera outing… yes, she was right. He hadn’t cared about her reputation at all.

In fact, he had secretly hoped her reputation would be tarnished. At the time, he had found her public activities distasteful. He wouldn’t have minded if she had been dismissed due to troublesome rumors. Moreover, he had wanted to make a point to Luzia, deliberately fueling the gossip.

He had never discussed that day with Liv afterward.

Naturally, she had no idea that the opera visit was meant to provoke Luzia. They had never talked about it, and there was no way for her to find out, so she still didn’t know.

Daaemon never imagined that he would hear such words from Liv.

 
Daemon, momentarily at a loss for words, offered a feeble excuse.

“That was just an attempt to bind you to me.”

“I understand now that your way of expressing affection is a bit unusual.”

Liv spoke with a surprisingly calm expression. She didn’t look like someone who was trying to express lingering grievances or make a belated accusation. She was simply stating the facts, openly and honestly.

“But it wasn’t pleasant.”

And because of that, even without getting angry, she made it impossible for him to justify himself.

Daemon, lips parting and then closing again, let out a shallow sigh. What had happened could not be erased. Moreover, Liv was clearly stating that she had found his behavior back then unpleasant. Continuing to make excuses would be nothing but a waste of time.

Daaemon quickly made up his mind.

“…I apologize for not respecting you. It was a poor judgment on my part.”

The words, unfamiliar to him, came out in an uncharacteristically blunt tone. Still, they were sincere.

Now, Daaemon had lost all confidence regarding his relationship with Liv. While he still had the power to control her, it was not something he wished to use on her—something he might do with his subordinates. He didn’t want Liv to be like his subordinates or akin to the statues he kept in his private gallery. His desire went far beyond that, and past experiences had made this abundantly clear.

“Now that I’ve recognized the problem, I won’t repeat it.”

His hands, which had paused briefly, moved slowly again—more to soothe Liv, whose mood had sunk, rather than to fulfill his own desire.

“That’s why I’ve been making an effort to provide what you like.”

At his words, Liv tilted her head slightly. Her flowing hair moved with the motion, gently tickling Daemon’s bare chest, like the mischievous tail of a clever fox who knew just how beautiful she was.

“Really?”

“Of course.”

“What is it that I like?”

Liv’s eyes gleamed with interest.

From time to time, Philip would quiz Daaemon on “Liv’s preferences,” as if it were an exam question. When Philip first asked, Liv had been more embarrassed than Daemon, but now she wore an intrigued expression similar to Philip’s, waiting for Daemon’s answer.

That was exactly the expression Liv wore now as she sat on his stomach. She didn’t seem to be hoping he would give the right answer but rather looking forward to whatever absurd answer he might give.

“My body.”

Liv’s eyes widened at his answer, given without hesitation. She stared blankly at Daaemon for a moment, then gradually parted her lips. Her exposed neck began to blush.

Liv, her lips moving slightly, spoke in an embarrassed voice, “…If you put it that way, I sound like some lewd woman who only desires your body.”

Given their current position—Liv straddling him—his answer seemed all the more believable.

Liv, apparently aware of the suggestiveness of their posture, tried to slide off him, inching sideways. But with Daaemon holding her waist firmly in place, she couldn’t do as she wished.

Every time Liv shifted her hips, a heat built up in his lower body. Daaemon subtly applied pressure to her waist, rubbing his hardness against Liv’s bare skin, his voice calm to the point of dryness.

“But it wasn’t my personality you fell for, was it?”

“Well…”

Liv seemed at a loss for words at his self-aware comment. She appeared so taken aback that she forgot her earlier attempt to move off him. Daaemon seized the opportunity to pull her closer, adjusting their position.

Her soft, full breasts were pressed against his chest, their stomachs touching. His swollen head, slick with precum, nudged her entrance, ready to push in.

Daemon, moving his hands from her waist to cup her soft buttocks, suddenly curled his lips in a sly smile.

“Ah, maybe it wasn’t my body but my face.”

“No, that’s not… Ah!”

Liv, who seemed about to protest, swallowed her words as he thrust into her, her body bending forward. Liv, too, must have been aroused while their bodies were in contact, as her inner walls were wet and slick.

Perhaps it was because he entered her nearly every day.

It was easy to bury himself to the root in one go. It felt as though her insides had molded perfectly to his shape. Just imagining the walls being identical to his member had his heart swelling with satisfaction.

Daaemon paused for a moment with his pillar fully buried. Just being enveloped by her warmth felt incredible.

But the moment of respite didn’t last long. The subtle squeezing of her walls continued to stimulate his senses.

“Mm, ah…”

Liv, lying on top of him, rubbed her breasts against his chest, her breath hot against his skin. She seemed to be trying to manage her growing arousal, but to Daemon, it only felt like she was urging him on.

So he decided to grant her unspoken request.

“Ah!”

He tightened his legs, thrusting up. His cock pulled out just slightly from the base, then plunged in again. It wasn’t an explicit in-and-out motion, but even the slight movement was enough, given how tightly her walls gripped him.

With every thrust, Liv’s thighs trembled, her love juice spilling and soaking the area between them. As she clung to him, moaning, her lips brushed against his scarred chest.

Whether it was intentional or not didn’t matter. What mattered was that the small, playful caress stirred something primal within him.

“Ugh…”

Daemon, propping himself on his knees, began thrusting harder. Liv’s body collapsed fully onto his, her back arching.

The creaking of the bed, the sound of their skin meeting, and their gasping breaths filled the room. Daemon, holding Liv tightly, sank his teeth into her flushed neck. The reddish mark left behind stood out against her heated skin.

Licking over the mark, Daaemon bit down again.

It was easy to cover her neck in love bites, marking from her round shoulders to just below her ear. Yet even with her skin marred in red, he felt no relief—only a growing hunger.

An unknown yearning took hold.

It was strange. No matter how deeply he buried himself in her or how many marks he left on her, it was never enough. The faint hunger only seemed to grow.

“…Haa.”

Daaemon licked along the edge of Liv’s ear, his breath hot. When his breath tickled her ear, Liv shivered, wrapping her arms tightly around his neck, almost desperately.

“Ah, Daemon…”

Calling his name in a voice thick with pleasure, Liv kissed his jaw and cheek.

“…Daemon.”

“Yes.”

His thrusts sped up, the wet sound of their bodies meeting growing louder. He was on the verge of release, his shaft throbbing. Liv’s tight walls squeezed him, and Daaemon gritted his teeth, holding back a curse.

With his voice tight with impending climax, Daaemon whispered against her ear, “You called me. So say it.”

“Uh!”

“Hm?”

“Haa, ah! Ah!”

At the force of his thrust, Liv’s moan turned sharper. Daemon, teeth gritted, growled low.

“Liv.”

“Ha, Daemon…”

Between her trembling thighs, a surge of hot fluid gushed out. Tears and sweat drenched Liv’s face as she gasped through her climax.

Even as she reached her peak, his thrusts didn’t slow, sending her reeling from one wave of pleasure to the next. Unable to keep up, Liv’s body went limp, her lips repeatedly murmuring his name in a daze.

“…Good.”

At that moment, his rough thrusts halted. With his shaft buried deep inside her, Daaemon let out a groan. A rush of heat seemed to explode in his head, blinding him momentarily.

With his cock buried to the hilt, he released inside her, marking her as his. His shaft twitched repeatedly, pumping his seed deep. But what truly heightened his pleasure wasn’t the physical sensation—it was Liv’s drowsy murmur.

Without pulling out, Daaemon asked quietly, “You liked it?”

“Ah…”

“Liv.”

“Mmm…”

Her body limp, Liv rubbed her forehead against his neck in a gesture that seemed more out of exhaustion than affection. Yet Daemon, unwilling to let it end there, rubbed her sticky back insistently, pressing her.

“Did you like it?”

“What…”

His fingers teased her entrance, still filled with his cock. He began gently prying it open.

“Did you like having me inside you here?”

 Even after ejaculating once, the girth of his shaft left no room for gaps where they were connected. Yet Daaemon moved his fingers slowly as if trying to find a place to push deeper.

Liv, who was lying languidly, was startled and raised her head at the sensation of his fingers trying to force their way in, despite the already tight space.

“…Wait a moment…!”

“You said you liked it.”

Daaemon didn’t stop teasing her even after seeing her shocked expression. It was rare for Liv, who had grown accustomed to their lovemaking, to look flustered, and seeing her like this stirred something inside him even more.

“No, wait, Daemon…!”

“Why?”

“Your fingers, no…!”

“What do you mean ‘no’?”

Liv’s eyes shook as Daaemon persisted, creating a small gap with his fingers. Her trembling lips spilled out words in a rush.

“It won’t fit! I’ll tear! I’m scared!”

As if. The human body didn’t tear that easily. Besides, seeing how her entrance was already sucking his shaft in, it was clear she was prepared.

Daaemon considered denying her words outright, but decided against it. He could push his fingers in if he wanted to, but seeing her genuinely scared killed his mood.

Instead, Daaemon moved his hands, firmly supporting her thighs, and slowly withdrew his shaft.

The thick pillar that had once again grown fully hard slid out, grazing against her inner walls. The stimulation from the slow movement seemed to ease the tension in Liv’s rigid shoulders.

Seeing her body go limp, Daaemon slid his long fingers back down. The entrance, which had just housed his shaft, had already closed up as if nothing had happened, though the sticky essence covering her opening was proof of their earlier activity.

“Now that I think about it, you do seem to like my hands.”

“What I like is… Ah…”

Daemon’s thick fingers parted her tender flesh. He couldn’t reach as deep as with his shaft, but the freedom with which he moved his fingers brought about a different kind of pleasure.

“Just rest a little longer, ugh!”

Inside, he felt something squishy. It wasn’t like the inner walls or her essence—it must have been his cum.

“Didn’t I say I would do my best to provide what you like?”

So now, he whispered that he would thrust his fingers in, as she liked, and smiled arrogantly.

Daaemon was willing to give her anything she liked—anything that could make her swoon in pleasure.

 



 

During a long, sticky night, Daaemon pushed thoughts of the canvas away.

However, it didn’t take long for that canvas—once almost forgotten—to resurface, its presence unmistakable. It all started when Liv’s outings grew excessively frequent.

Of course, ‘excessively’ was a highly subjective term for Daemon, as he barely left his estate compared to the average person. To him, even Liv had not previously seemed particularly fond of going out as often.

Thus, it was odd how frequently Liv had begun leaving the mansion.

The main reason for her outings seemed to be her meetings with Milion. According to the guard who escorted Liv, she did indeed meet with Milion. However, the guard was only responsible for accompanying her to the designated meeting location and waiting outside, so there was no way to know what the two talked about inside.

Should I assign someone to her again?

Of course, it wasn’t that Daaemon doubted Liv. What could she possibly be doing with Milion? The only activities they could be engaging in were sharing tea, listening to that child’s endless chatter, and…

And… Damn it! That’s probably all they’re doing, yet why do they meet so often?

Outwardly, Daaemon remained the same, appearing sarcastic and indifferent. Inside, though, his thoughts had flipped a thousand times over. In his head, he had long imagined storming the place where they met.

Had their meetings not taken place in the Pendance mansion, he would have turned that scenario into reality by now.

 

“Another outing?”

“Yes.”

“Have you taken up a new tutor position behind my back?”

“Of course not.”

Perhaps mistaking his comment for an awkward joke, Liv chuckled as she shook her head while preparing to leave. She was too busy getting ready to even look at him.

Liv, pressing a bonnet onto her head and tying the ribbon under her chin, suddenly looked back at Daemon, seemingly remembering something.

“…Um, I do go out a lot, don’t I?”

It seemed she had finally noticed his mood. There was a hint of unease in her large green eyes, blinking beneath the light brown bonnet embroidered with floral patterns. Her reddish-brown hair, styled in waves and hanging down, looked like a fox’s tail swishing back and forth.

…How could she look so lovely even now? Because of that, Daaemon couldn’t bring himself to utter anything harsh, not even in jest.

Liv wasn’t the one at fault. The clueless Pendance child probably pestered her into meeting. So, swallowing his displeasure, Daaemon answered briefly.

“Not really.”

Not wanting to reveal his discontent, Daaemon bit down on an unlit cigar. Unfortunately, he had no justifiable reason to stop Liv’s outings.

He really should hurry up with the marriage oath and establish her as the marchioness. His mounting frustration shifted towards Eleonore, who had been delaying their witness signature.

Camille Eleonore—that bastard was the root of all problems. From the very beginning, he had been the cause of everything. That filthy scoundrel who had deceitfully used multiple aliases to hide Liv…

Surely Liv hadn’t learned anything nefarious from him? Like how to keep secrets from him, or how to set up a hidden retreat… Could her missing canvas be in that secret place?

“I’ll be back soon.”

Completely unaware of what was running through Daemon’s mind, Liv gave a casual promise to return early before turning away. Daaemon watched her leave, chewing on the end of the unlit cigar.

Today again, she would meet Milion at the Pendance mansion.

Could there be a secret passage leading outside the Pendance mansion? One she used after dismissing the guard, slipping away through it…

Daemon, lost in these thoughts, laughed at himself.

“What an idiotic idea.”

Before meeting Liv, Daaemon had never been an imaginative person. His creativity was sorely lacking. Yet when it came to Liv, even the tiniest sliver of possibility bloomed into endless scenarios.

He really had become a fool. Irritated, Daaemon ran a hand through his hair, turning away.

“Philip, prepare the hunting grounds.”

 



 

It had been a while since Daaemon had last taken in the metallic scent of blood.

It had been ages since he last visited Berryworth Mansion. After indulging in hunting and soaking in hot water to ease his exhaustion, he had time to leisurely stroll through the arboretum.

He reached the greenhouse, filled with the fresh scent of greenery and earthy undertones. The flowers blooming in season decorated the inside beautifully, and the air was thick with their scent.

Despite this, his blue eyes remained indifferent. Neither the beautiful flowers nor the sweet fragrance moved him.

Come to think of it, after Liv had escaped, I spent quite some time here.

Memories surfaced of waiting helplessly for news about Liv, sitting idly in this place. Though the situation was entirely different now, the helplessness and irritation felt similar to back then.

“Shall I prepare some refreshments?” Philip, trailing at a distance to serve him personally, cautiously spoke up.

Daemon, sitting on a bench, replied in a cold voice, “Forget it.”

Daaemon never cared much for snacks. To be more precise, he derived little pleasure from eating. To him, food was something to be consumed out of necessity.

“Bring me some alcohol instead.”

It had been quite a while since he last had a drink. Not since finding Liv in Adelinde had he touched any alcohol—it had been quite some time.

As Philip went to prepare the drink, Daaemon leaned back on the bench, closing his eyes. His relaxed posture exuded decadence and ease.

Daaemon knew he was in a somewhat sensitive state.

He never noticed it when Liv was by his side, but her absence made his nerves stand on edge, almost unbearably so.

Although he had never shown it to Liv, the aftereffects, which had subsided for a while, began creeping back in with the increasing frequency of her outings. It wasn’t as if the scars ached or itched severely as before, but the sensation was still there, creeping in with an uncomfortable subtlety.

He never expected the symptoms to disappear overnight, not after having dealt with them for years. But only recently did he realize just how dependent he had grown on Liv.

Now, a new symptom seemed to have emerged, piled on top of the old.

An abnormal obsession with Liv. Paranoia, anxiety, delusions.

If this wasn’t a mental illness, what was?

To Daemon, this state of his was a genuine nuisance. It felt like carrying a loaded revolver without a safety mechanism, liable to fire off at the slightest mistake.

 Shall I bring Miss Rodaise here?” Philip asked subtly as he placed the whiskey and glasses on the table.

Daaemon glanced at him and filled his glass without answering. Philip didn’t press further and quietly left the greenhouse.

Time continued to pass, empty and meaningless.

What had he spent his days doing when Liv wasn’t around?

When he first arrived in Buerno, he was in such poor shape that he spent most of his time doing nothing in the mansion. Even after regaining his composure, he still didn’t engage in anything noteworthy.

At best, he would occasionally buy some artwork—though that wasn’t a regular activity. It wasn’t easy to find pieces that caught his interest.

Other than that, he spent his time hunting, drinking moderately, smoking cigars, or simply lounging idly.

Yes, that was everything. His days were originally filled with little ambition or meaning.

“I see.”

Realizing how aimlessly he had lived without any real purpose, he felt an unexpected sense of clarity. There had been nothing significant in his life in the past.

Without Liv, his life would truly be no different from being dead.

If that were the case, then his sensitivity was understandable—it was a matter of survival, after all.

Finding some justification for his mental instability made his unpleasant feelings a bit more bearable. It was easier for him to accept discomfort if it had a clear reason rather than lacking logic or justification. Furthermore, having a rational basis made it possible to persuade others of his argument.

In other words, Daaemon had now found a reasonable argument to present to Liv, who had just entered the greenhouse.

“You came back quickly.”

“I did say I’d be home early today.”

Liv was still in the same outfit she had worn when she left that morning.

“But why are you drinking here in the greenhouse…?”

“Your hairstyle has changed.”

“Huh?”

Liv, who had been reaching for the whiskey bottle, paused and looked up. Daemon, watching her wide eyes, spoke with a cold expression.

“This morning, it looked like a fox’s tail; now it looks like a horse’s.”

“…Excuse me?”

Liv’s clear green eyes filled with confusion. Instead of explaining his metaphor, Daaemon continued speaking in a dry tone.

“Did Lady Pendance show off her bathroom today?”

Liv’s expression wavered slightly. Daemon, who had been watching her closely, noticed the subtle change in her emotions. The confusion from his odd remark had been replaced by another kind of discomfort, as if he’d struck a nerve.

“Otherwise, why would you have bathed outside the mansion?”

Having confirmed his suspicion, Daemon’s lips twisted into a faint smirk, and his voice grew colder and heavier.

“Or did you go somewhere else?”

The casual follow-up question made Liv frown deeply.

“There are plenty of people who can verify where I went.”

She seemed genuinely hurt by Daemon’s suspicion, but he didn’t try to comfort her. Instead, he brought up the topic that had been tormenting his mind for days.

“Where is the canvas?”

“The canvas?”

Liv, unable to follow the sudden shift in topic, looked bewildered once again.

“The art teacher isn’t the type to lie to me, so it’s clear you took the canvas. But Philip couldn’t find it anywhere in the mansion.”

Daaemon hadn’t ruled out the possibility that the art teacher was lying, but he doubted the man would risk getting caught so easily.

On the other hand, if Liv had truly intended to move the canvas secretly, she wouldn’t have acted so openly. It was probably nothing, but just bringing up the topic made his emotions spiral.

“Has returning to Buerno made you feel suffocated again? Are you trying to stay out of my sight?”

That was understandable.

It wouldn’t be surprising if the past rumors in Buerno still haunted her, leaving some lingering scars. Perhaps old feelings had resurfaced, making her want to distance herself from him. Maybe she even missed her life before getting involved with Daemon.

Surprisingly, Daaemon wasn’t angry. He was simply trying to understand Liv’s state of mind rationally. After all, only by understanding could he convince her.

“I said I’d give you what you wanted, but not like this. Your actions are killing me. Fighting to stay alive is a natural instinct for any living being. So it’s only natural that I want to keep you in the mansion.”

Of course, rationality aside, his words came out more like a plea than an argument.

No, in truth, it was closer to begging than persuasion.

And he wasn’t even sure if his reasoning was logical. It might have been the strong whiskey he’d had after such a long time clouding his mind.

The only fortunate thing was that, despite everything, he still managed to keep up his usual cold and arrogant demeanor. If he had shown even a hint of vulnerability, he would have rather kept his mouth shut. Otherwise, who knew how much further his delusional thoughts might have spiraled?

In fact, Daaemon thought this was a good opportunity. Since the topic had come up, he might as well settle it clearly.

“If you really can’t stand it, out of pity…”

“Wait, wait!”

Liv, who had been listening to Daaemon absentmindedly, finally raised her hand to interrupt him. Seeing Daaemon fall silent, Liv spoke more firmly.

“You should give me a chance to respond.”

“Speak.”

Daaemon nodded slightly, his chin tilted upward—a gesture full of arrogance.

Seeing his attitude, Liv sighed heavily, pressing her forehead. Watching her, Daaemon subtly lowered his raised chin.

Without noticing his reaction, Liv rubbed her temples and began to speak.

“I didn’t realize taking the canvas would upset you like this. That was my mistake. I can see how it might have caused a misunderstanding.”

“A misunderstanding?”

“Yes, a misunderstanding.”

Liv emphasized the word ‘misunderstanding’ as she crossed her arms.

“The canvas is at the Pendance mansion. I borrowed Milion’s old art studio for a while.”

“The Pendance mansion?”

“Yes. I wanted to work on it separately, so I didn’t bring it to Langess mansion.”

“Why?”

If she needed a studio, she could have asked him. He would have transformed the entire Berryworth mansion into an art studio if she wanted.

Sensing his confusion, Liv explained further.

“I wanted to finish it secretly and then show it to you.”

There was no need to ask who she intended to show it to. Her gaze was fixed directly on Daaemon as she spoke, “And about my hair… I didn’t expect you to notice, but yes, I washed it. But it’s not what you think. I got paint in my hair while cleaning up, so I used their bathroom. I didn’t want you to find out I was painting, so I asked to use the bathroom.”

Liv fiddled with her hair as she spoke, then sighed deeply again. She took off her bonnet and placed it on the table, her shoulders slumping slightly with a hint of disappointment.

“It seems it was all for nothing.”

Muttering that she didn’t understand why this had to become such an ordeal, Liv shook her head. Then, she took the glass from Daemon’s hand and casually put it aside, closing the whiskey bottle.

Daemon, who had been watching her quietly, asked suddenly, “So, you’re not creating secrets to get away from me?”

“I don’t understand why you’d think that.”

Judging by how she moved the whiskey bottle and glass out of his reach, she seemed to believe his odd comments were the result of drinking.

Even if alcohol had played a part in loosening his tongue, it wasn’t the main reason.

This unstable mindset wasn’t because of the whiskey—it was because of Liv’s absence.

“It’s because you’re not here.”

Daaemon corrected Liv’s assumption bluntly, pulling her towards him.

“So don’t start anything secretive. Or if you must, at least hide it well.”

With Liv sitting on his lap and his arms wrapped around her waist, all his chaotic thoughts seemed to vanish like magic.

Liv, resting quietly in his embrace, answered calmly, “I’ll keep that in mind.”

His arms tightened around her without him even realizing it.

Daaemon lifted his head slightly to look at Liv, his eyes narrowing.

“…Are you declaring in advance that you plan to keep secrets?”

Even though he had told her to hide things thoroughly if she must, that had been an empty remark.

“Declaring? I’m sorry, but I’m a pacifist.”

Liv smiled gently at his reaction, wrapping her arms around his neck. Though their conversation could have soured her mood, she didn’t seem upset at all. If anything, she seemed to be growing more content.

Daaemon didn’t quite understand which part of their conversation had pleased her, but he supposed it was better than her being unhappy.

With that thought, he tightened his embrace around her, letting the alcohol dull his senses a bit more. A strange fatigue settled in, making everything else feel trivial. All he wanted now was to stay like this, holding Liv close.

 
Liv squirmed a bit in Daemon’s arms, but soon relaxed and leaned against him. She buried her face into the crook of his neck and began to whisper.

“When you said that my actions are killing you, you meant that being apart from me is unbearably difficult, right? It’s a common expression, but hearing it from you doesn’t make it sound light at all. So I’d appreciate it if you could avoid using such frightening words.”

Daaemon decided not to say that it wasn’t just a metaphor. That would only scare her even more.

Unlike his relaxed body, his mind grew clearer. Daaemon judged what Liv could and could not handle.

The nightmares that plagued him each night might invoke her sympathy, but the extreme obsession and delusions he struggled with would more likely evoke fear.

Liv was a woman who could accurately assess what she could and couldn’t handle. To avoid losing her again, Daaemon felt the need to manage his own instability, to ensure that his mental illness never became apparent.

Fortunately, she was by his side—a woman who served as a safety device for him.

Daaemon closed his eyes.

It’s fine. As long as the safety is on, the trigger won’t be pulled.

The revolver in his chest would not be fired.

 



 

Liv asked Daaemon on a date.

It was true. She spoke in a somewhat shy yet clear tone, saying, “I’d like to ask you out on a date.” And this, despite seeing each other every morning and eating dinner together every night!

They even agreed to meet at an outdoor location after taking care of their individual tasks, rather than leaving the mansion together.

Ever since Daaemon discovered that she had tried to complete a painting in secret, Liv no longer hid her work. Now, she openly announced she was leaving to paint, and today, she mentioned she would go to the Pendance mansion in the morning.

Though Liv didn’t say anything specific, Daaemon instinctively knew her painting was complete. Today would likely be the day she presented the finished piece as a gift.

“I want you to put extra thought into your outfit.”

“Should I wear something more elaborate?”

“Hmm.”

Daaemon rubbed his chin, narrowing his eyes as he stared at the prepared clothes.

Daaemon always felt pleased when Liv made requests of him. And this date proposal was, in its own way, also a request she made of him.

However, what made it different from her previous requests was that she was planning to give him something. Because of that, his feelings weren’t just pleased—they were complicated.

When it came to material things, Daaemon lacked nothing. Frankly, if not for Liv, there would be nothing else he desired. Liv surely understood this well. There was likely little she could give him that he didn’t already have.

So was that why she secretly painted for him? A painting by Liv was certainly a unique and special gift—something that couldn’t be obtained anywhere else.

If that were the case, then he needed to fulfill his role as the recipient properly.

“Alright, something elaborate.”

Daaemon resolved to make sure Liv wouldn’t be disappointed, even if it meant putting on an appropriate act. After all, the fact that she had asked him on a date for the first time was enough to make the occasion interesting.

 



 

The man stood out even from afar, his appearance splendid.

Typically dressed in black or dark shades close to black, today Daaemon wore a blue tailcoat, and that alone drew attention.

The smooth fabric resembled the piercing blue of his eyes, adding an icy quality to his look, while the finely crafted silver buttons and silver-thread embroidery lent an air of sophistication. Underneath, he wore a vest and shirt made of ivory silk, with his collar turned up and wrapped with a cravat.

The unusually voluminous cravat was fastened with a sparkling diamond pin. The glimpse of a handkerchief added a touch of elegance, making him look like a fine gentleman. The perfectly tailored trousers highlighted his long legs attractively.

But no amount of finery could overshadow his features.

His platinum-blond hair was elegantly swept back, revealing a smooth forehead. His brow furrowed slightly, likely annoyed by the attention from all directions. Yet, with his sharp nose, pale skin, lips pressed into a firm line, and defined jawline, it was inevitable that anyone who saw him couldn’t help but stare.

Even Liv, who had seen his face just this morning, stood frozen, gazing at him now. She found herself admiring his beauty all over again.

The feeling she had on the day they first met—when his appearance had stunned her into silence—resurfaced.

‘I’ll never get used to this…’

With that thought, Liv snapped back to her senses and took a step forward.

Daemon, who had been standing casually, holding his cane loosely, noticed her approach. For a moment, the previously indifferent look in his eyes gained a faint light, and Liv felt as though she was witnessing a statue coming to life.

“Liv.”

He even slightly lifted the corners of his lips. The smile was subtle, but it was enough to draw gasps from those secretly watching him.

Even from her vantage point, Liv could spot a few women stumbling behind a nearby alleyway. Seeing their flushed faces, Liv quickened her pace, feeling somewhat flustered.

“What brings you out here?”

Usually, he wouldn’t even get out of the carriage, let alone open the curtains.

From his expression, he clearly wasn’t pleased with the attention he was receiving. He could’ve just waited in the carriage.

Liv’s eyes drifted toward the waiting carriage nearby.

“You could have waited inside.”

“Since you were the one who asked me on a date, I thought it proper to at least step out of the carriage to greet you.”

Though Daemon’s thought process often deviated from common norms, there were times when he would take his wise butler’s advice to heart. It seemed today was one of those times.

Seeing Daemon’s puzzled expression, Liv averted her gaze slightly, murmuring, “Mr. Philemond’s suggestions aren’t always perfect.”

“Was this one wrong?”

Daaemon mumbled quizzically, clearly curious to understand. Instead of answering, Liv examined his attire again. Up close, it was evident that today’s outfit was more elaborate than usual. Even the cufflinks seemed meticulously chosen.

Normally, his fair and handsome face stood out against his dark coat, but today, even in this more elaborate coat, his face shone just as brightly.

Truly, it seemed as though the clothes were relying on the wearer for their splendor.

“Was Mr. Philemond also behind your outfit today?”

“No, but is this outfit wrong too?”

Daaemon raised an eyebrow and tilted his head slightly.

“Judging by the look on your face, it seems you approve.”

“…I couldn’t possibly say otherwise.”

No one in their right mind would call this look unappealing. If anyone did, they surely had issues with their eyesight.

Blushing slightly, Liv nodded honestly, and a faint smile played on Daemon’s lips.

“I thought so.”

Daaemon extended his arm to her.

“I look quite good in blue, don’t I?”

Liv placed her hand lightly on his offered arm, walking alongside him as she spoke, “I didn’t know you liked blue.”

For him to say, “It suits me well” implied that he had worn blue often or taken care to examine himself in it. Given how uninterested Daaemon usually was in his appearance, this revelation surprised Liv.

Catching her curiosity, Daaemon answered indifferently, “It was the color of my uniform.”

“The uniform you wore during your service?”

Liv’s eyes sparkled with interest. Without turning his head, Daaemon noted her reaction with a glance and spoke matter-of-factly.

“Everyone said it was a uniform made just for me.”

He didn’t say it boastfully—in fact, his tone was so dry it bordered on emotionless.

“It suited me so well that Philip couldn’t bring himself to discard it and kept it in storage.”

Liv imagined Daaemon in a uniform similar in color to today’s attire. Of course, it looked incredible—perhaps even more stunning in person. Beautiful, even.

Seeing Liv fall silent, Daaemon suddenly stopped walking. With her arm hooked around his, Liv had no choice but to halt as well.

She looked up at him with a puzzled expression, and Daaemon leaned slightly closer, his voice dropping low.

“Should I wear it in bed for you?”

In bed, wearing that blue uniform…

Liv’s eyes widened, her lips moving soundlessly. Without needing a mirror, she could feel the heat rising to her face. Her cheeks were surely flushed in an unbecoming shade of red, and she was too stunned to even think of covering them.

Daaemon watched her intently, his lips curving mischievously. There was a hint of mischief in his blue eyes.

“This seems to be the right answer.”

Liv, having missed her chance to refute him, quickly averted her eyes. To hide her embarrassment, she coughed awkwardly and tugged on his arm.

“Ahem, let’s get going.”

“Alright, where are we headed?”

Daaemon followed her lead easily, and Liv responded to him resolutely, “First, we’ll have lunch, then we’ll take a stroll, and after that, we’ll go on a flower boat ride!”

 



 

Once, Milion had boasted about building a beautiful flower boat and enjoying a boat ride on it—and eventually, she fulfilled that promise.

When Liv had been struggling to find the perfect spot for a special occasion, Milion had willingly lent her the flower boat. Thanks to Milion’s generosity, Liv’s plan for the date could be made even more beautiful.

After lunch, they took a light stroll to aid digestion, eventually arriving at the lakeshore. The sky was bathed in the colors of sunset, and the lake’s surface reflected warm hues, adding a sense of tranquility to the scene.

 The pre-prepared flower boat was quite large for just two people. They could sit far enough from the oarsman that, without raising their voices, they could easily have a personal conversation.

Daemon, seated against the backdrop of beautiful lilies and peonies, looked as if he were part of a painting. Liv, who had personally chosen the flowers, couldn’t help but smile in satisfaction.

“These days, young ladies are lining up just to ride the flower boat.”

Liv spoke in an excited voice as the boat slowly made its way toward the center of the lake.

“I thought you were only meeting that Pendance child.”

“Milion sometimes brought friends along.”

Though Liv’s visits to the Pendance estate had been primarily for her painting, they weren’t limited to that. As word spread that Liv was visiting the Pendance estate, some people made a point to visit just to see her. Liv had tea with a few of them who were close to Milion, considering it a form of thanks for Milion’s help in lending her the studio.

“Actually, some of the young ladies subtly asked to see you.”

Recalling those she met at the Pendance estate, Liv spoke cautiously, “But I refused.”

“If you wish it, I could show myself.”

“That’s…”

Daaemon disliked mingling with others, so his offer was undoubtedly a significant gesture. However, Liv had no intention of accepting his kindness.

In fact, the reason she had rejected the young ladies’ requests so flatly wasn’t only because of Daemon’s temperament.

“Do you know why I didn’t attend the reading session with you?”

Liv, who had been gazing at the softly rippling lake surface, took a small, deep breath. The farther they moved from the lakeshore, the more the only sounds they heard were the gentle splashing of water and the occasional call of distant birds.

This allowed their voices to reach each other more clearly.

“The truth is, I didn’t want others to steal glances at you.”

Not having the courage to look at Daemon, Liv lowered her gaze, fiddling with her skirt.

“We’re not yet married, and I can’t completely claim you as mine.”

The word “claim” felt so explicit that it made her face flush.

Despite mulling it over, Liv couldn’t find a better way to express it. What she wanted was the right to declare Daaemon as hers. The clear evidence that this man—the one who gave her such peace—would belong to her for the rest of her life.

“Teacher Marcel was right. We’re merely lovers, and no one knows what the future holds. You’re handsome, and everyone wants you.”

Of course, Liv wore the ring Daaemon had given her. However, this diamond ring alone couldn’t deter others from gazing at Daemon.

“So, I felt jealous in advance—over something that hasn’t even happened yet. Foolishly.”

Throughout Liv’s confession, Daaemon wore an expression she’d never seen before. It seemed he’d never imagined her feeling jealous.

Daemon, frozen like someone who had been struck, squinted as he asked, “Are you confessing this because you’re determined not to be jealous anymore?”

“No.”

Of course not. Liv couldn’t promise that she wouldn’t be jealous again. Instead of making that futile pledge, she decided on something else.

Liv took out the canvas she had prepared on the boat.

“I can’t afford an expensive ring like you.”

Daaemon seemed unsurprised as he took the canvas—perhaps he had already guessed it had something to do with this. He calmly unwrapped the cloth covering it.

Despite having braced herself, Liv felt embarrassed and ashamed when handing over her first completed work. She fidgeted with her fingers, hoping her flushed face would be mistaken for the glow of the sunset.

Finally, the revealed painting came into view. It was a clumsy first work, made with awkward brushstrokes and simplistic colors.

Liv, watching nervously, licked her lips.

“Instead, I’m giving you myself.”

It was a self-portrait.

Daaemon gazed at the canvas without a hint of a smile. Judging by his expression, Liv couldn’t tell what he was thinking or feeling.

Seeing him unable to take his eyes off the canvas, Liv grew anxious. She swallowed hard and spoke cautiously, “Honestly, I thought you might like this more.”

She had thought so, but now she was feeling less certain. Perhaps she should’ve painted Daaemon instead?

But the painting was already done, and she had given it to him. There was no taking it back, so Liv decided to proceed with her original plan.

Her green eyes, warmer than ever, gazed at the man.

“So, if you’re okay with it, will you have a beautiful wedding with me?”

Finally, Daemon’s gaze shifted from the canvas to Liv. His blue eyes shimmered like the lake beneath them.

Meeting his eyes, Liv’s nervous heart slowly calmed. She was able to smile as she finished speaking.

“So everyone can know we belong to each other.”

Daaemon stared at her without blinking. The time spent waiting for his answer felt like an eternity.

The calm she had barely regained began to deplete again. Just as Liv was starting to feel an unavoidable sense of unease at his stillness, Daaemon finally spoke—letting out a low sigh and murmuring.

“Ah, a grand wedding.”

If his quickly blinking eyes looked somewhat overwhelmed, could that be a misinterpretation?

Liv, watching him carefully, called out to him in a worried voice.

“Daemon?”

“A grand wedding, huh.”

“…Are you alright?”

Was her proposal for a beautiful wedding that shocking?

Liv began to feel embarrassed.

But hadn’t he also intended to marry her? Or did he plan on skipping the wedding?

Seeing Liv’s complicated expression, Daaemon spoke slowly, “Of course, I’m alright. I was just momentarily stunned by my own stupidity.”

“Stupidity?”

Without giving Liv time to ask, he murmured, covering his mouth with his hand.

“I was so focused on the marriage oath that I hadn’t even considered the wedding.”

He seemed genuinely shocked, his rare pale complexion betraying it.

Daemon, lost in thought for a while, finally nodded as if coming to a conclusion. It seemed his previously paralyzed rationality had begun to recover.

Returning to his usual cold and indifferent demeanor, he said, “We’ll need some time to find the most beautiful location in Buerno.”

“Yes.”

Of course, it would take time. Liv nodded in agreement, thinking it was only natural.

“So, shall we hold the wedding next week?”

Liv, who had been about to agree without hesitation, paused and asked again, incredulous.

“…Next week?”

“Ah, we’ll need to fit the dress too. It should be possible if the tailor works through the night.”

Daemon, having wrapped the canvas back up and set it beside him, seemed to genuinely ponder. His voice, drifting out as if talking to himself, was utterly serious.

“What else do we need? Rings?”

Seeing his earnest expression without a hint of playfulness, Liv frowned in astonishment.

“Wait a moment. Holding the wedding next week is impossible.”

“Why?”

“…Are you seriously asking that?”

Daemon’s face twisted in frustration at Liv’s question.

“You know I’m not a patient man.”

This had nothing to do with patience. Liv shook her head firmly.

“Even so, it’s not possible. I don’t want a rushed wedding. I want to plan it meticulously and invite everyone in Buerno. Plus, we need to call Corida.”

“Oh, yes. That’s something we agree on—especially your younger sister. She won’t be convinced until she sees with her own eyes that her sister is mine.”

Liv held back the question that rose to her throat—why exactly Corida needed to see it—instead focusing on calming Daemon, who looked ready to book a venue and order a wedding dress the very next day.

“If you don’t know, let me tell you. Adelinde School for Girls doesn’t allow students to leave during the semester. And the semester just started.”

Daemon’s already displeased expression soured further.

“You don’t mean to wait until she graduates, do you?”

“Even I can’t wait that long. But we can at least wait until the end of the semester, can’t we?”

Daaemon pressed his lips into a thin line. Seeing the dissatisfaction on his face, Liv suddenly thought he looked quite endearing. No one would agree with her, but that was how she felt.

Smiling without realizing it, Liv gently placed her hand over his. Daemon, as if he had been waiting for her touch, pulled her into his arms.

Looking up at him, Liv asked, “So, are you accepting my proposal?”

The question, though unnecessary, was one she wanted an answer to.

Daemon, tilting his head for a kiss, let out a small chuckle.

“Of course.”

It was an arrogant acceptance, befitting him.

 



 

In the center of the basement of the Langess mansion, a woman’s clumsy self-portrait hung in place of a nude painting.

The man who had hung the frame himself stood before it, lost in thought for a long while. It still felt as if the scent of lilies hung thick around his nose.

Whether the woman knew it or not, lilies were the purest flower, dedicated to those who had served faithfully until the very end. And now, surrounded by those noble flowers, he had received the most unique gift in the world—a moment he would never forget.

His heart was calmer than it had ever been. After staring at the self-portrait for a while longer, he slowly turned away.

A gentle darkness settled over the gallery.

At last, there was peace.

 The child was lost.

The realization came late, only after being swept away for a long time by the crowd. The surroundings were unfamiliar.

It all started because of the intoxicating songs and lively atmosphere that made the child wander about as if enchanted, drawn further by the sweet aroma. The child, now alone amidst adults wearing colorful and ridiculous masks, hugged a small basket of candies close.

It was the candy seller, who had given the basket to the child, thinking the child was cute, that had led the child this far into the unfamiliar plaza. The child had been overjoyed to receive the gift, only to realize the situation afterward, but by then, the candy seller had vanished.

 

“It’s the Harvest Festival, so there are lots of people around. Don’t cause trouble and behave quietly. If you act up, the scary man will come and get you!”

 

The child’s face darkened rapidly at the memory of their mother’s stern warning. To avoid meeting the “scary man,” the child had been good, listened well, and even ate all their food.

But now, it seemed today’s mistake might lead to an encounter with the scary man. The thought almost made the child cry. Tears began welling up as the child anxiously glanced around, hoping for help.

But the adults around were all too busy enjoying themselves. They either didn’t notice the child, or they didn’t see any reason to care. And approaching them was difficult—everyone was wearing a mask. Just when the child, holding back tears, was about to finally give in to sobbing—

“Are you alright?”

With a worried voice, someone bent down to meet the child. The child, momentarily forgetting about the tears, looked up wide-eyed. Staring blankly at the person who had addressed them, the child watched as they knelt to match eye level.

“Do you live around here? Where are your parents?”

The child opened their mouth unconsciously.

 

“Shh! If you’re good, the beautiful angel will come down and bring you a gift. Alright?”

 

Suddenly, the child realized—mother’s words were always right.

“Angel!”

“Huh?”

When the child exclaimed, the angel looked puzzled. The round, gentle brown eyes were so serene that the child, without hesitation, concluded this person was indeed a kind angel.

“Did you come to bring me a present?”

“…What?”

“But you don’t have to give me anything.”

At the child’s unexpectedly mature declaration, the angel frowned slightly.

“…Um, alright.”

“Instead, could you help me find my mom?”

When the child mentioned their mother, the reality of being alone sank in again, and the tears began welling up once more. They should have stayed by their mother. What if they met the scary man before finding her? It was terrifying to think how angry mother would be…

“You seem to be lost.”

The angel gently patted the child’s small shoulder, looking troubled while glancing around.

“Where’s your house? Do you remember where you lost your mom?”

“I got candy, but my mom wasn’t there.”

Seeing the basket of candy clutched tightly by the child, the angel chuckled.

“You shouldn’t just follow someone because they offer you candy.”

“A man gave it to me.”

“Still, if you wanted candy, you should have gone with your mom.”

“I’m going to share it with mom.”

“I see… well, that’s true. I’m not really in a position to talk, am I?”

The angel seemed to mutter something else but then nodded, seeming resigned, and stood up. They held out their hand to the child.

“Let’s get out of this plaza first. There are too many people here, and it’s not safe to stand around.”

After a moment’s hesitation, hugging the basket tighter, the child carefully took the offered hand. The warmth of the slender fingers spread through their grip.

Strangers might be dangerous, but angels are kind!

This isn’t disobeying mother’s words—so the scary man won’t come and take me!

 



 

Liv was lost.

After looking around the plaza three times, she concluded that Daaemon had gone missing while she had gone to a nearby shop for a moment. She had left him there to wait in the plaza.

She could imagine a few possible reasons.

Today was the Harvest Festival, and the streets were overflowing with people. Daaemon wasn’t in his usual carriage either. There were spontaneous parades popping up here and there, making it even harder to navigate. Everywhere, masked groups moved about in colorful clusters.

And she and Daaemon had decided to wear masks too, as he didn’t like being the center of attention. Ironically, this helped them blend in with the crowd.

Perhaps if they had brought a guard, things might have been different. But today was supposed to be just the two of them—Daaemon had decided they should try walking through the streets like a regular couple after seeing young lovers enjoying their time.

Riding a carriage with guards was comfortable, but they had wanted to blend in, just like the other couples. Liv agreed; it seemed fun to try for a change.

If only she had known this would happen, she would never have agreed to such an impulsive plan.

Or perhaps coming to a strange city to enjoy the Harvest Festival was the root problem.

An unfamiliar place, a festival, traveling on foot—in hindsight, it seemed like a recipe for disaster.

‘He hasn’t punched someone already, has he…?’

Just standing there, Daaemon exuded arrogance from head to toe—always a prime target for trouble. Normally, his face and status acted as a buffer, but today both were concealed. It wouldn’t be surprising if he had already gotten into a scuffle with someone.

Daaemon wasn’t one to avoid trouble when it came his way. If someone challenged him, he wouldn’t back down—he’d fight first and settle things later with money and status.

‘No, no. If there were a fight, it would be far louder than this.’

If Daaemon had gotten into a fight, there’d be no way for the surroundings to remain so peaceful.

Liv, arms crossed, scanned the plaza again. The exaggerated masks made it difficult to pick out faces.

When one was lost, the best course was to stay put. But in a place like this, surrounded by identical masks, staying still might not help—it could easily make her lost too.

Liv sighed, her frustration evident, and looked up. Returning to their lodgings and reuniting with Roman and the guards seemed the most sensible plan.

Liv had always had a good sense of direction. Before getting tangled up with Daemon, she had mostly traveled on foot. She could navigate by landmarks and find her way back even if she got lost.

But Daemon?

A man used to traveling by carriage was unlikely to navigate a strange city easily. Even if he had a better sense of direction than her, she doubted he’d return to their lodging alone, leaving her behind.

Finally deciding, Liv began to make her way out of the plaza. She had just started moving when she stopped again.

Amid the bustling crowd stood a small child, looking lost.

The child was probably here to enjoy the Harvest Festival, but they looked far too young to be wandering alone. Hugging a basket adorned with a cute ribbon, the child stood there, only about waist-high to an adult. The wide, frightened eyes darted around, and the lips were pressed into a pale line.

Liv scanned the crowd, searching for anyone who might be with the child, but no one stood out.

“Oh dear…”

Though she really should return to their lodging and find Roman to help her search for Daemon, she couldn’t ignore a child on the verge of tears.

“Are you alright?”

She couldn’t bring herself to turn away from the child who looked ready to cry at any moment.

Seeing the child look up at her in surprise, Liv was grateful she’d removed her mask before approaching. Surely, her face would be less intimidating than a masked one. And fortunately, the child warmed up to her more easily than she’d expected.

“What’s your name?”

“I’m Noah!” answered the child in a determined voice.

“I see, Noah. I’m Liv.”

“Yes, Angel!”

Hoping to correct the title, Liv had tried to introduce herself, but it was a spectacular failure. Seeing the child beaming up at her, Liv eventually smiled back. While the name “Angel” might be embarrassing if overheard, she couldn’t help but accept it.

At least being called an angel suggested that her appearance was kind enough. Finding comfort in that, Liv led Noah to a quieter corner.

“So, Noah, do you live in this city?”

“I came here by train with my mom.”

Oh, so they lived quite far away—far enough to need a train ride.

Liv sighed softly, easily understanding Noah’s words.

“It might be difficult for me to take you all the way home, so let’s get some help.”

Liv decided to find a patrolling officer first. Given it was festival time, there should be officers nearby—it wouldn’t require going all the way to the police station.

 Was it too naive to think finding an officer would help?

“It happens all the time.”

The officer seemed indifferent to Liv’s explanation that she had found a lost child. Instead, he looked rather uninterested, as if he had already handled numerous similar cases that day.

“You may not be aware of this, being a lady, but on days like this, there are many parents who abandon their children.”

“How can you be so sure? I told you the child is lost, not abandoned.”

The officer sighed, frustrated by Liv’s immediate rebuttal, but didn’t ignore her.

“Look at the kid’s shoes. Do those look like shoes meant for a child out having fun?”

Liv looked down at Noah’s shoes, which she hadn’t paid much attention to amidst the chaos. They were clearly worn and tattered, hinting at Noah’s circumstances.

But shoes alone couldn’t tell the whole story. Shoes wore out easily, especially for kids. However, when she also noticed the short, frayed pants and faded sleeves, Liv pursed her lips tightly. It was evident that Noah’s clothing was not suitable for a child his age.

His cheeks seemed a bit sunken too. Judging by how the ill-fitting clothes weren’t too tight, it was likely that he was undernourished overall.

“Unfortunately, there’s not much we can do. During the Harvest Festival, hundreds of people come and go from the city every day, so catching parents who came here just to abandon a child is nearly impossible.”

She was glad she had kept Noah away from hearing this conversation. Regardless of whether it was true, it would be too cruel for Noah to hear such words.

Liv looked at Noah, who stood watching them from a distance, with a troubled expression, and spoke calmly again.

“Perhaps their situation isn’t good, and they haven’t been able to provide properly. I want to help find his parents. Isn’t there anything that can be done?”

“Oh…”

The officer scratched his head, looking conflicted, then clicked his tongue before responding, “There’s been no report of a missing child today, so there’s not much information I can give you. However, if the child came here by train, it means he’s not a local, so I can contact the inns around the city to ask if his parents are staying there.”

Even that was a big help. Liv had been worried she might have to go to every inn, holding Noah’s hand, so she nodded gratefully.

“Thank you so much.”

The officer avoided her gaze and cleared his throat, seemingly flustered by Liv’s bright smile.

“Then please wait here for a moment.”

“Alright.”

Liv decided to stay at the makeshift patrol station with Noah while they tried to contact the inns. Though she was a bit worried about Daemon, who might be wandering around looking for her, it didn’t change her decision.

Daaemon was an adult, and Noah was a child—surely, Daaemon would understand.

No, he had to understand.

…Right?

 



 

He was lost.

Daaemon stopped calmly and looked around. It was clear that the place he found himself in now was not the original plaza where he was supposed to wait for Liv.

He had only moved slightly to avoid the rowdy crowd, who seemed to be laughing and shouting like madmen. While wandering, he had bought a bag of candies from a candy seller, intending to relive an old memory, and returned to find himself in a different place.

He hadn’t moved much, so how had the location changed?

Daaemon crossed his arms, trying to understand the baffling situation. The most likely culprit was the damned crowd. Even now, waves of people were brushing against his shoulders as they passed by.

Caught up in this human wave, he must have wandered through several alleys without even realizing it. To make things worse, every street had been decorated similarly for the Harvest Festival, making it difficult to tell one alley from another.

“Tsk.”

If he returned to the plaza now, would Liv still be waiting?

He didn’t know how much time had passed, but it was long enough for Liv to notice he was missing. Knowing her, she had probably realized he had been swept away by the crowd and had considered her options.

She could either wait at the plaza or return to their lodging.

Judging by the atmosphere, the crowd wouldn’t thin out even by evening, so staying in the plaza indefinitely wasn’t wise. Returning to the lodging seemed like the more sensible choice. Liv was likely to have chosen that option.

Yet, despite reasoning this out, Daaemon found himself naturally heading back towards the plaza—or rather, in the direction he guessed the plaza was.

He doubted that Liv, being the smart woman she was, would wait for him like a child, but seeing the plaza empty with his own eyes would at least put him at ease. And if, by chance, he did find Liv waiting for him, it would make him genuinely happy.

He wasn’t worried about not recognizing her because of the mask. He had made a special mark on her mask that only he could identify. At the time, he hadn’t thought much of it; it was simply because he didn’t want her to wear a mask identical to everyone else’s.

Who knew it would come in handy like this?

Daaemon strode confidently. Naturally, he didn’t ask anyone for directions to the plaza. Finding it on his own should have been easy enough. This wasn’t a massive city like the capital, after all—just a small provincial town.

And so, Daaemon got even more thoroughly lost.

It was the consequence of underestimating the monotonous appearance of the buildings and the streets packed with people half out of their minds.

 



 

“There’s no one looking for a missing child.”

“That can’t be true.”

“I’m sorry, but there’s nothing more we can do.”

The news they received after waiting was the worst possible outcome.

Seeing the officer’s apologetic face, Liv couldn’t press him further. It was already generous of him to take the time to investigate, especially with the crowds keeping him busy. There was nothing more she could ask of him—nor did it seem like there was anything more he could do.

“Um… just in case a report comes in later, could you leave a contact number where we can reach you?”

Liv gratefully accepted the officer’s kind suggestion and wrote down the contact information for her lodging. However, she wasn’t confident that she would receive any contact.

It didn’t feel like a good sign that, despite having spent quite some time with Noah since meeting him in the plaza, no missing child report had come in.

Liv glanced at Noah. Seeing something in her expression, the officer lowered his voice and whispered softly.

“If you’d like, you can leave the child here. If his parents come looking, we can hand him over immediately. It might be better to leave him with us.”

“And if they don’t come looking?”

“Well, then…”

The officer glanced at Noah. “Children like him usually end up in an orphanage. He’d probably be placed there temporarily. Given his age, where he can walk and communicate, he likely wouldn’t stay long.”

“Temporarily?”

“There are limits to how many children the orphanages can take in. As I mentioned, many parents abandon their children during the festival.”

Liv fell silent, biting her lip.

After a moment, she spoke calmly, “I’ll take care of him for now. Please contact me if there’s any news of a missing child.”

“It’s quite a burden…”

The officer sighed at her insistence, but Liv smiled, undeterred.

“Thank you for your help.”

After thanking the officer, who looked like he had more to say, Liv took Noah and left the patrol station. However, she didn’t get far before she had to stop. She glanced at Noah.

She had confidently declared that she would take care of him, unable to leave him alone. But now that she was outside, doubts crept in. She hadn’t even asked Noah what he wanted, which bothered her.

“Noah, it might take a bit more time to find your parents.”

Would it be better for Noah to wait at the patrol station instead?

But what if no one ever came for him, and he ended up in an orphanage, just as the officer said?

“Temporary placement” just meant they’d find an excuse to send him away. While some children in orphanages found kind adoptive parents, many did not. Some were even sold off as a means of making money—used for begging or worse.

The younger a child, the easier it was to exploit people’s sympathy. Liv knew this, and she also knew that those children often had gangs behind them, making it hard for ordinary people to help them.

If she wanted to ensure Noah didn’t end up like that, she had to help him now.

“…If you’d rather wait at the patrol station, you can. But if you’re okay with it, I’d like to stay with you for a while longer. Is that alright?”

Noah looked up at her worried face, clutching his basket of candies tightly, and answered, “Yes.”

“Are you sure?”

“Yes!”

There wasn’t a trace of worry in his innocent reply. Liv smiled as she gently patted Noah’s head.

“Are you hungry? Did you have lunch?”

“I had bread in the morning.”

 It was lunchtime, yet Noah’s answer referred to breakfast.

Without hesitation, Liv took Noah’s hand. During a festival, there was no shortage of food in the streets, so finding something to fill the child’s stomach wouldn’t be difficult. Most of the shops were packed with customers, but fortunately, Liv found a restaurant in a nearby alley where they could sit. The menu was simple—soup and soft meats—perfect for a child to eat.

As they settled at an outdoor table, Liv placed a napkin on Noah’s lap and asked, “Noah, what are your parents like?”

“Mom.”

“Yes, can you tell me about your mom?”

“Mom is…”

Noah frowned, fiddling with the candy basket and pursing his lips.

“You have to listen to Mom. If you don’t, the scary man will come for you.”

Liv nodded with a gentle expression. Noah’s response was oddly off-target, but thanks to their earlier conversations, Liv could easily understand his meaning.

So, in other words, his mom was strict.

Feeling satisfied that she had understood Noah, Liv smiled. It seemed she could now naturally lead the conversation without stumbling over what he said.

“I see. And what about your dad?”

“Mom threw him away.”

Liv’s determination to keep the conversation flowing smoothly was derailed in less than a minute.

Liv, who had missed her timing to respond, stared at Noah in shock. Noah, however, seemed oblivious to what was wrong.

It was possible… for a mom to leave the dad. Well, if a couple didn’t get along, they could split up, couldn’t they? He just expressed it a bit harshly.

While Liv was trying to rationalize Noah’s words, Noah beamed and added, “So now I’m meeting Dad number three!”

A third dad… That’s possible too. It’s not always easy to find the right person on the first try, so it wasn’t strange if there were a few failed marriages.

“But you know what’s amazing? Mom is number two.”

Number two… Wait, what?

“Mom number two said that if I don’t listen, Mom number three will come. That’s why I have to be good.”

“Let’s stop talking about your mom.”

Liv calmly stopped Noah from continuing. Fortunately, the food arrived just in time, and Noah’s attention quickly shifted to the warm soup. Moving the dishes around to prevent Noah from burning himself, Liv suppressed a sigh. The more she spoke with Noah, the more hopeless the situation seemed.

It felt increasingly likely that the officer’s words were true. What would she do if that really turned out to be the case?

Should she try to find a decent and proper orphanage for Noah now? But Noah was too small and young to be sent to an orphanage. Even if he could walk and communicate on his own, that was all he could do.

No, it hadn’t even been a full day yet. Wasn’t it too soon to conclude that Noah’s mother had abandoned him?

As she wrestled with her conflicting thoughts, Liv found herself momentarily setting aside her worries about Daemon, who might still be wandering the streets.

 



 

By the time Daaemon finally reached the plaza after wandering through an unfamiliar alley, the sun was already setting behind the rooftops.

He had walked through the crowded streets for longer than expected, which left his clothes looking rather disheveled. Anyone who knew how meticulous and fastidious Daaemon usually was would be shocked to see him in such a state.

Nevertheless, Daemon’s mental state remained surprisingly intact. Of course, he found nothing about his situation pleasing—the rude people bumping into his shoulders, the unknown stench lingering in the air, the incomprehensible mix of street noises—none of it.

But the fact that he was wearing a mask, and thus drawing fewer stares than usual, made it somewhat more bearable. Compared to all the eyes that usually followed him whenever he stepped out onto the streets of Buerno, this felt like true freedom.

Listening to Liv had indeed been the right choice.

Whose lover could she possibly be? She’s so intelligent and wise. If luck truly exists in this world, he must have used it all up by having someone so perfect, both inside and out, as his lover.

But it wasn’t just this that kept him steady. It was the thought of Liv, who must also be wearing her mask. She was a woman who caught everyone’s eye wherever she went, and if she had walked the streets today without her mask, amidst these drunken revelers, she would surely have been accosted within ten steps.

Knowing she was wearing a mask was a great comfort to Daaemon in her absence.

“As expected, she’s not here.”

As he had guessed, Liv was nowhere to be seen. She must have headed back to their lodging.

Daaemon finally turned to head back. Earlier, he’d struggled while wandering unfamiliar paths, but now that he’d been to the plaza once, he could find his way back directly.

Just as he started walking in what he was sure was the correct direction, Daaemon stopped abruptly, glancing to the side.

At the end of his gaze was an officer on patrol, holding a mask. Something about that mask drew Daemon’s attention.

It looked exactly like Liv’s mask. Of course, it was a common design, so it wasn’t surprising.

Understanding this, Daaemon was about to look away when his lips pressed into a firm line. Narrowing his eyes, he examined the mask in the officer’s hand more closely, then let out a dry laugh.

He must have been separated from Liv for too long if he was starting to see things.

“Hey.”

With his long strides, Daaemon closed the distance between himself and the officer instantly, his gaze cool as he looked down. Up close, it became even clearer. This was indeed Liv’s mask.

The officer, whose path had been blocked without warning, responded irritably without properly looking at Daemon.

“My shift’s over, so find another officer.”

“Where’s the owner of that mask?”

“What?”

“Where is the owner? Why is some random idiot holding that mask?”

The officer frowned at Daemon’s provocative words, glancing between the mask in his hand and Daemon. He then hardened his expression threateningly.

“It’s not anyone you know, so move along.”

“That’s impossible.”

He wouldn’t mistake the mask he had placed on Liv’s face that morning.

Daemon’s lips curled crookedly. The mask covered his expression, so the officer couldn’t see the change as he spoke in a threatening tone.

“So what if it is? I was about to return it anyway, so back off.”

As an officer, he seemed confident in his physical abilities, as he made a show of his broad arms while tucking the mask away.

“Or do you want to see how rough things can get?”

“Rough, huh?”

Daemon, who had been staring at the mask, finally looked up at the officer, a faint sneer in his blue eyes.

“Sounds good.”

Just what he had hoped for.

 



 

Liv stared at the man sitting in front of her.

“…I thought you might pick a fight, but with an officer…”

She hadn’t meant to voice her thoughts aloud, and when she realized she had, she hastily closed her mouth.

“I only called for Roman.” Daaemon frowned as he watched Liv, who stood speechless.

“I insisted on coming. How could I send only Sir Roman when you were here…”

Liv glanced around. A few older men in uniform looked flustered in front of Sir Roman, who stood expressionless. Behind them were a group of people glancing nervously in her direction…

“The police station, really.”

Daemon, at the police station!

To Liv, who was used to seeing Daemon, whose arrogance could intimidate even the police chief in Buerno, sitting here in a place meant for criminals was nothing short of shocking.

“Is this your first time visiting the police station?”

“I’m surprised that things escalated to the point where you had to come to the police station.”

Unable to wander the streets any longer, Liv had returned to their lodging with Noah. By then, it was nearly nightfall, and as expected, Daaemon wasn’t there.

Noah, who had looked exhausted since they left the restaurant, fell asleep almost instantly after Liv offered him a bed. Just as she was turning her attention to Daemon, a message arrived at the lodging. It was from Daaemon to Sir Roman: he was at the police station and needed to verify his identity, so they should prepare accordingly.

“Prepare accordingly” was Daemon’s way of saying to ensure everyone who had inconvenienced him faced appropriate consequences.

If it had been a minor altercation, it could have been handled at a nearby patrol station—but the police station?

Hearing the message with Sir Roman, Liv had hurriedly put on her coat. On the way to the police station, she couldn’t help but feel a pang of guilt. She should have gone to look for Daaemon sooner.

It was clear he had gotten into some major trouble.

Hopefully, he wasn’t hurt anywhere.

 When Liv arrived, worried about what she might find, she was greeted by Daaemon sitting with his legs crossed, looking completely unbothered. Behind him, an officer whose face was so swollen it was almost unrecognizable was gesturing angrily. Roman approached, whispered a few words, and the officer quickly backed down.

“Honestly, I’m amazed you’re here at the police station so willingly.”

“Well…”

Daaemon tilted his head slightly. The officer, who had been hunched in his chair, flinched when he caught Daemon’s gaze.

“Targeting a vital point is cleaner than a bothersome fistfight.”

It looked like there had already been some troublesome fighting, though. Or rather, it seemed more like Daaemon had dealt the blows unilaterally.

Following Daemon’s gaze, Liv turned her head. When the officer, his face a patchwork of bruises, spotted her, his eyes widened. He looked at her with fervent desperation, clearly wanting to say something but unable to approach, scared of Daemon.

Wait a second—something about his face looked familiar.

Just as Liv tilted her head, trying to remember, Daaemon suddenly pulled her hand, causing her to fall onto his lap. Twisting his body, he blocked her view of the officer entirely.

In that instant, every gaze in the police station turned towards them. Though those who met Daemon’s fierce glare quickly averted their eyes, it was enough to make Liv feel utterly embarrassed.

“…Just say it instead.”

“Say what?”

“Even children don’t get jealous like this.”

When Liv pointed out his childish behavior, Daaemon responded with a cynical smile.

“Jealous? Me? Over that guy? Impossible. I just wanted to hold my lover on my lap, that’s all.”

What could she do if he insisted on that? After trying to squirm off his lap a few times, Liv realized that his arm wrapped around her waist was quite firm. It seemed she would have to stay in this awkward position until all issues at the police station were resolved.

Well, knowing Daemon’s separation anxiety, this level of fuss was quite mild.

Liv resigned herself and asked the question that had been on her mind all this time.

“What happened that led to an altercation with an officer?”

On the way here, she had been shocked to learn whom Daaemon had gotten into a fight with. Liv had imagined he might have clashed with a passerby—just someone brushing against his shoulder—but it seemed her imagination had been rather lacking.

At Liv’s question, Daaemon frowned deeply and answered seriously, “That man isn’t just an officer—he’s a deranged stalker. It’s a serious problem when someone like him is responsible for the city’s safety. I went through the trouble of coming here for the city’s sake. The police chief should be thanking me.”

Liv listened quietly, then looked at him, puzzled.

“A stalker?”

This was surely their first meeting, so how could Daaemon know the officer was a stalker? Had he witnessed the officer secretly following someone and caught him in the act?

…But Daaemon wasn’t the type to be kind and just, helping out with other people’s stalking issues.

As Liv’s face showed her confusion, Daaemon answered proudly, his voice laced with irritation.

“Yes, your stalker.”

“…Whose stalker?”

“That guy knew your lodging address and contact information. He even stole your mask, using the excuse of returning it to approach you. How did you even lose your mask?”

Only after hearing this did Liv realize why the officer’s bruised face looked so familiar. He was the very same officer from the temporary patrol station she had approached for help with Noah.

“When I questioned him, he spouted nonsense, claiming you left it on purpose. He even went so far as to impersonate an acquaintance, saying he knew you.”

Daaemon brazenly concluded that his actions were justified because he’d stopped a dangerous individual before he could cause harm. Judging by Roman’s expression as he spoke to the officer in Daemon’s place, they might just succeed in getting the police chief to issue a commendation.

Was it really okay to tell Daaemon the truth, given how convinced he was that he had acted heroically?

Feeling overwhelmed, Liv hesitated before cautiously speaking up.

“He really does know me. I think he misunderstood when I accidentally dropped the mask.”

Daaemon tilted his head slightly, his narrowed eyes glinting with a cold light.

“So you’re saying his advances were genuine?”

“Advances? No! It wasn’t like that. I just briefly asked for his help in the plaza!”

When Liv quickly corrected him, Daaemon nodded indifferently.

“Of course, you wouldn’t entertain advances from someone like that with me by your side.”

“…Ha.”

Just a few sentences in, and she already felt drained. How was she going to explain about Noah, who was currently sleeping peacefully at her lodging?

Liv, her head pounding, eventually decided it didn’t matter. Daaemon had always been this kind of man, and she had chosen him despite it all. There was no use getting worked up over it now. She knew from the beginning that he was merciless to everything except her…

If she gently coaxed him with a look, he’d reluctantly agree.

Liv knew this well. Once again, he would give in to her.

 



 

The sound of a crying child could be heard outside the lodging.

Recognizing the source of the crying, Liv hurried to enter, but Daaemon beat her to it, striding in first. The loud wailing that had echoed from inside abruptly stopped. It seemed they were startled.

But that didn’t last long. A sharper, even louder wail erupted almost immediately. No matter how she looked at it, Daemon’s presence was making the crying worse.

It had only been five minutes since she had asked Daaemon not to startle or threaten the child. She had emphasized it repeatedly on the carriage ride back, and he had said he understood. But from the start, everything had gone wrong.

“Waaaaah!”

Liv rushed into the room as the child wailed as if their breath might give out at any moment.

The room was a mess. Noah, who seemed to have been woken from sleep, sat in the middle of the bed, surrounded by several large men who were sweating nervously. Blankets that Noah had likely kicked away were strewn across the floor, and small ornaments that had been on the bedside table lay scattered.

Amidst all this, Noah continued crying, his face flushed red. It looked like he’d been crying for quite some time—his eyelids were puffy.

The men, who had been glancing nervously at Daemon, turned to Liv as she entered, their expressions apologetic.

“We tried to calm him down, but since it’s an unfamiliar place, he wouldn’t settle…”

It wasn’t so much the unfamiliar place, Liv thought, as it was these large men surrounding the bed that was the problem.

It had been a mistake to leave Noah with Roman’s men in her rush. She should have asked the lodging staff for a female attendant’s help.

“Tsk. Can’t even manage a child…”

Clicking his tongue in frustration, Daaemon approached the bed. Noah, his eyes brimming with tears, recoiled further and wailed even louder.

“Waaaah! I don’t like this bad man! Don’t take me away!”

Daemon, now standing by the bed like the other men, wore an irritated expression.

“They say children like beautiful people.”

So was he questioning why Noah wasn’t stopping his tears at the sight of his handsome face?

Daaemon was indeed attractive, but his cold, sharp features, full of irritation, likely looked quite threatening to a child.

“I’ll calm him down. Please step outside.”

Seeing that Noah’s cries were only intensifying, Liv intervened. The men surrounding the bed withdrew immediately, but Daaemon showed no intention of leaving.

Liv spoke firmly to Daemon, who stared at Noah with disdain, “Daemon, I don’t think you’re helping right now.”

“Ha!”

The Marquis Dietrion, an elite retired officer who had never once heard he wasn’t helpful, scoffed. But he could hardly ignore the fact that Noah, who had almost stopped crying, began wailing harder every time he saw him.

Reluctantly, Daaemon stepped back, still glaring disapprovingly at Noah. Only then did Noah, face flushed, manage to spot Liv.

“Angel… This bad man came to take me away!”

“Noah, calm down. It’s not like that.”

Having learned earlier just how terrifying “bad man” was to Noah, Liv quickly reassured him.

And as she did, she thought to herself.

Daaemon being called a “bad man” actually suited him quite well, surprisingly.

 Noah quickly calmed down in Liv’s embrace.

After putting the red-nosed Noah back to sleep, Liv left the bedroom, where Daaemon was waiting for her in the sitting room outside. Roman and his subordinates, who had received orders from Daemon, had already vacated the area.

“If you wanted to find the child’s parents, you should have told me. You probably wasted time dealing with that incompetent officer.”

Of course, Liv knew that if she had told Daemon, things would have been handled much faster and more effectively than with the officer. But ultimately, it would have been Daemon’s subordinates carrying out the work, and Liv didn’t want to burden those already weighed down by their demanding master.

“I’ll have it sorted within a day.”

Daaemon declared confidently. And Liv could easily imagine him giving the order to his subordinates: “Find that child’s parents immediately and bring them here. You have one day!”

Liv made a mental note to arrange extra bonuses for Roman and his men, who had come all the way out here to escort their master’s date without even getting a chance to rest. Otherwise, even someone as stoic as Roman might one day decide he’d had enough and quit without warning.

“Thank you, Daemon.”

“It’s not you who should be thanking me—it’s that child.”

“He’s too young to understand such things.”

“Do you really think he doesn’t understand?”

Liv pursed her lips in response to Daemon’s question. Noah was still very young, certainly not old enough to grasp adult motives, greed, or ugly selfishness.

But that didn’t mean he was foolish.

“Children are cunning. Especially when they’re young and vulnerable, they instinctively seek out the safest refuge.”

The proof was that Noah clung only to Liv out of all the people in the city. He must have instinctively known that she would never abandon him.

But was that a bad thing? Noah was far too young to survive on his own.

“If you keep acting so coldly, he’ll keep calling you ‘that bad man.'”

“What do you want to do, then?”

Daaemon lit a cigar, murmuring with a hint of sarcasm.

“You went through all the trouble of coming here, only to find the parents who abandoned the child and hand him back over?”

“They might not have…”

The faint hope that they might not have abandoned Noah never made it past her lips. Seeing her crestfallen expression, Daaemon gently stroked her cheek.

“Miss Rodaise, righteous and kind. You have the power to make anything happen—it’s not even that difficult. All you have to do is command your man.”

His low voice carried a cool, cynical tone, but there was something oddly seductive about it, like the way his large hand naturally moved to massage the back of Liv’s neck.

“I will gladly serve you.”

“It’s not an order.”

“Fine. Whether it’s an order or a request, it makes no difference.”

Daaemon smirked, scoffing at the idea that the phrasing mattered.

Indeed, what difference did it make what words she used? The fact that he would do anything she asked remained unchanged.

“No one would believe that you are the great Marquis Dietrion at this rate.”

“That, too, is of no importance.”

Liv leaned naturally into Daemon, her body practically in his arms. When she looked up at him from that position, Daaemon gave a small smile, his eyes softening.

“Just use me as you wish. But let me remind you—a wise superior always rewards and punishes appropriately.”

“I said it’s not an order. Ugh. What kind of reward do you want?”

Daemon, who had been murmuring in Liv’s ear, moved his lips to her neck and slowly began to speak.

“Well, first of all…”

Creak.

“Angel?”

“Oh, Noah! You’re awake!”

Pop!

Liv wriggled out of Daemon’s arms faster than she ever had before and hurried over to the bedroom.

Daaemon stood there with an incredulous look, his arm still frozen mid-air. Liv, seemingly unaware of his gaze, was busy comforting Noah, who peeked out from behind the door.

Feeling the warmth he’d just had in his arms suddenly vanish, Daemon’s already sour mood took a turn for the worse.

“…First of all, we need to decide what to do with that child.”

Grumbling to himself, Daaemon bit into the cigar he’d been holding. Meanwhile, Noah, who had fully emerged into the sitting room, peeked at Daaemon from behind Liv’s skirt.

“Angel, are you friends with that bad man?”

“He’s not a bad man—he’s the one I love. He’ll be my husband soon.”

Liv gave Daaemon a stern look as she spoke—a look that clearly said not to smoke in front of the child. Daaemon could have ignored it, but he didn’t. Not because he particularly enjoyed being introduced as her future husband, though it was true. After all, they had set the date for their wedding, and this was one of the last dates they’d have as lovers.

“Why did you wake up? Were you scared to sleep alone?”

“I wanted to give this to you, Angel. I couldn’t let anyone else take it, so I’m giving it to you now.”

Noah shyly offered something he’d been holding close to his chest—a basket of candy.

“I was going to eat it with my mom, but I’ll give it to you first, Angel.”

With that, Noah took the biggest, prettiest candy from the basket and handed it to Liv.

Liv smiled as she accepted the candy, then glanced at Daemon.

“Just me?”

Would he be upset about not getting any candy? Daaemon folded his arms, watching Liv fuss over him. He would have refused it anyway, but since she was looking out for him, he decided to see how Noah would react.

Noah’s gaze shifted from Liv to Daemon. Standing there, pink sleep marks still visible on his cheeks, Noah blinked and then reached into the basket.

Holding two candies in his small hand, Noah offered them to Liv instead of approaching Daemon.

“These are for the baby.”

Liv looked down at the two candies placed in her palm, not quite understanding.

Daaemon scowled and interjected, “The baby?”

Noah flinched, his shoulders shaking under Daemon’s intimidating voice. But he didn’t seem inclined to give up his candy, holding the basket close to his chest. After rolling his eyes nervously for a while, Noah made a peace sign with his fingers.

Daemon’s eyebrows shot up at the gesture.

“I gave you two.”

Liv still didn’t quite understand and stared blankly at Noah, while Daaemon casually tossed aside the cigar he’d planned to smoke.

“Alright. I’ll invest in you.”

“What?”

Surprised by his sudden declaration, Liv asked in confusion.

“You’re young, but you show promise. That kind of insight isn’t easy to come by at your age.”

“…Insight?”

It felt like she’d misheard something. Liv stared at Daemon, incredulous. Surprisingly, there wasn’t a hint of humor on his face.

Daemon, still looking down at Noah with a haughty expression, raised one corner of his mouth in a smirk.

“If I support him, you won’t have to worry about this child anymore, right?”

“Well…”

That was true.

Liv looked bewildered, as if Daaemon had struck some sort of agreement with a child twenty-five years younger than him without her realizing. Yet Daaemon remained completely unfazed, mentioning that he’d ask Adolf to prepare a sponsorship contract.

A sponsorship contract, of all things?

Still feeling uneasy, Liv led Noah back to bed. The child, who had secured Marquis Dietrion’s sponsorship with just two pieces of candy, had no idea what a great achievement he had accomplished as he was led back to bed by Liv.

 

A few days later, after the harvest festival date, a new seat was added to the carriage taking Daaemon and Liv back home. It belonged to Noah Leblanc, the only protégé of the Marquis Dietrion.

And on the day Noah had lived at the Langess mansion for a year, the Marquis and Marchioness Dietrion welcomed their beautiful twin daughters into the world.

It was a joyful coincidence brought about by two pieces of candy.

…Or perhaps it was the result of an innocent insight?

 Liv had fallen from a horse.

It happened just three months before their wedding.

 



 

Bang!

“Where is Liv?!”

Upon hearing the news, Daaemon canceled all external engagements and rushed back to the Langess mansion. Thierry, who had arrived earlier and was organizing her medical bag, stood up. Philip, who had been standing nearby with a worried expression, spoke in a heavy voice.

“You’re here.”

“How is she?”

“Aside from her arm being injured, she has no major external injuries. She instinctively shielded her head when she fell, which is why it wasn’t worse. Frankly, it’s a miracle it ended like this.”

“It’s not a miracle—Liv is smart and protected herself,” Daaemon retorted sharply, his eyes sweeping the room with a fierce gaze.

“Where is the attendant?”

“…There was no one with her at the time of the fall.”

Daemon’s expression turned cold at those words. His sharp gaze bore into Philip.

“No one was with her?”

“She sometimes enjoys light walks on her own…”

Liv had never been accustomed to being waited on by others, and she often liked wandering freely by herself. The vast private grounds surrounding the Langess mansion were perfect for such leisurely activities—including horseback riding.

However, that explanation did nothing to calm Daemon’s anger.

“I can’t believe the staff at my mansion are working so carelessly. Unbelievable.”

“I apologize.”

Instead of making excuses, Philip bowed his head. Thierry then intervened.

“Marquis, please lower your voice for the patient’s sake.”

Daemon, who had been frowning, turned his gaze toward the bed. Except for the bandage wrapped around her arm, Liv appeared to be peacefully asleep.

Falling from a horse is a dangerous accident that can easily be fatal. Considering that she only injured her arm, they were incredibly fortunate.

Liv had never been a skilled rider, and she likely knew her limits and rode slowly. Judging by where she fell—a spot with lots of shrubbery—it seemed the foliage had softened her landing.

Daaemon turned his gaze back to Thierry. “Are you sure she’s alright?”

“Yes, I’ve checked all her external injuries. We’ll conduct further tests once she wakes up…”

Thierry was explaining calmly when they suddenly heard a soft groan.

In an instant, Daaemon rushed to the bedside. Liv, who had been lying still with her eyes closed, furrowed her brow slightly.

Daaemon gently stroked her forehead.

“Liv.”

As if responding to his voice, her eyelids fluttered. Moments later, with a soft sigh, her green eyes slowly opened.

She blinked slowly, her gaze unfocused, staring blankly at nothing. Gradually, as she regained her senses, she began to look around.

Light returned to her eyes as she processed her surroundings. With a faint look of confusion, Liv tried to sit up but immediately winced in pain, her brows knitting together.

“Wait, don’t move your arm.”

Daaemon quickly comforted her.

“Where…”

“Can you see me? Are you hurt anywhere else?”

Daaemon leaned forward, scrutinizing her face closely. But when their eyes met, he froze. Liv subtly pulled her head back, avoiding his touch.

Daemon, staring intently into her clear, transparent eyes, suddenly felt an ominous premonition.

In the chilled silence, Liv cautiously parted her lips.

“I’m sorry, but who are you?”

Philip looked at Liv with a shocked expression, and Thierry turned pale in disbelief.

Liv looked around at the visibly startled people, her brow furrowed in confusion.

“Where is this…”

Daaemon slowly straightened up. His face, now devoid of any emotion, looked cold. The atmosphere in the room grew even frostier.

“I take back what I said about it being a miracle. It seems she’s not alright after all.”

For the first time in her life, Thierry revised her diagnosis.

 



 

Standing under the bright sunlight pouring in through the large window, Liv stared blankly ahead—toward the entrance of the mansion.

From time to time, she gently touched the bandages on her arm, her expression distant. Then, all of a sudden, her face brightened. Moments later, the door to the sitting room burst open, and someone rushed in.

“Sister!”

With a pale face, Corida ran toward Liv. She was about to throw herself into Liv’s arms but froze when she saw her bandaged arm.

Liv was equally startled. She used her uninjured arm to cup Corida’s cheek, scolding her with a worried expression.

“Corida, you shouldn’t run like that! What if you collapse?”

Corida’s eyes widened at Liv’s gentle touch, as if handling fragile glass. Liv, unaware of Corida’s changing expression, anxiously examined her complexion and body. Feeling a bit embarrassed by the fuss, Corida hesitantly removed Liv’s hand.

“So it’s true that you lost your memory. Sister, I’m fine now. I’m healthy.”

“What?”

“A new medicine was developed. My condition has improved significantly—I’m almost like a normal person now. I’m healthy enough to live in a dormitory.”

“A dormitory? My goodness, how could you stay in a dormitory…!”

“Don’t you remember attending my entrance ceremony? You watched me move into the dormitory.”

Liv faltered, struggling to respond as she met Corida’s worried gaze.

“I… um…”

Confusion clouded her face, and Corida, watching her, let out a sigh.

“I heard you’ve lost a few years of memories.”

“It seems so,” Liv nodded, accepting the truth.

Corida set her jaw with determination. “Sister, I’m on your side, no matter what. Do whatever you want. If you want to leave here right away, do so. I’ll get you a ticket for the farthest train.”

Liv tilted her head slightly, observing Corida with a puzzled expression.

“Did I dislike this place that much?”

“Huh? …No, I don’t think so.”

“Then why are you saying that?”

“Well…”

Corida, still holding her fists, blinked and avoided Liv’s gaze, awkwardly clearing her throat to cover her discomfort.

Liv, not missing Corida’s reaction, narrowed her eyes. Her tone was firm as she questioned Corida.

“Corida, did something happen between the owner of this mansion and me? Do you know?”

“Well, um…”

Corida hesitated, stepping back cautiously, pretending not to hear. Just as Liv was about to press her further, a cold voice came from the doorway.

“Shouldn’t you be asking the person involved?”

Liv and Corida both turned their heads at the same time.

Standing tall with a strong build, Daaemon blocked the doorway, leaning on a cane. He frowned at Corida before turning his gaze to Liv.

“Why are you asking someone else about what happened between us?”

His voice was so cold that Corida involuntarily flinched. But the person he was addressing remained calm and collected, as if she felt no fear.

“She’s not someone else. She’s my only family.”

“Your family…”

Daemon, who had begun to speak quickly, clenched his teeth, pausing. He took a deep breath and continued in a restrained voice.

“You may not remember, but we are engaged. That makes me your family as well.”

Liv looked at him with a wary expression, and suddenly seemed to remember something, her eyes blinking rapidly before she lowered her gaze.

“I can’t quite grasp that part yet. I sincerely apologize for unintentionally being rude…”

“You are the only one allowed to be rude to me.”

Daaemon cut her off, gripping the handle of his cane tightly. His face grew increasingly rigid, reflecting his displeasure at the palpable distance between them.

“No matter what you do, there’s no need to apologize.”

“Alright, I will try to understand.”

Regrettably, this was the best response Liv could offer.

 “Ha.”

Daaemon finally let out a sigh. He roughly ran his hand through his bangs, his frustration evident as he spoke in a restrained tone.

“Just talk freely.”

With that, he turned on his heel and disappeared. Liv watched him leave, a look of bewilderment on her face, before turning to Corida.

“Corida, was I really engaged to him?”

“Yes.”

“How could that even be possible?”

She looked utterly unable to comprehend it.

Corida, watching Liv with an odd expression, awkwardly smiled and murmured, “Well, sister, I always thought you were far too good for him. But now… he does look a bit pitiful.”

Corida didn’t specify whom she meant, but it was obvious. It was also an answer to Liv’s repeated questions.

Yes, Liv had indeed been in love with that impossibly beautiful man and had even been on the verge of marrying him. It still felt completely incomprehensible from beginning to end.

“Why would he…”

“Sister, do you not remember him at all? Did you forget even his name?”

Liv looked troubled at Corida’s question.

Now that she thought about it, from the moment she first opened her eyes and saw that stranger and the unfamiliar surroundings, she hadn’t even managed to ask his name. He probably hadn’t had the chance to introduce himself either. After all, to him, his lover, who had been sweetly greeting him just that morning, had suddenly woken up and treated him like a stranger.

“All I heard was that he is my fiancé and future husband.”

Corida clicked her tongue in understanding, crossing her arms as she spoke calmly, “He’s Marquis Daaemon Dietrion.”

“What?”

Liv looked at Corida in disbelief, and Corida continued in a firm voice, “And you are soon to be the Marchioness Dietrion.”

…She was supposed to be what?

For a moment, Liv was utterly speechless.

 



 

Daemon, who had always hated even leaving the mansion for work, hadn’t left the Langess mansion at all since Liv’s fall from the horse.

Though he couldn’t bring himself to openly watch over Liv, he kept a constant distance—close enough to respond instantly if anything happened. As a result, his aides had to come and go from the Langess mansion for work reports.

It had become common knowledge among Daemon’s aides that he was practically acting as Liv’s personal servant, always standing by. Naturally, they also became aware of Liv’s condition.

“Shouldn’t you postpone the wedding?”

Roman, who couldn’t stand it anymore, cautiously suggested. Charles, who was also present for the report, jumped in shock and scolded him.

“Are you out of your mind?”

They had all witnessed what Daaemon had been like after temporarily losing Liv. Though the circumstances were different this time, the emotional toll on Daaemon was similar. Charles knew how deeply the previous incident had affected Daemon.

Charles shot Roman a scolding glance. But it seemed Daaemon hadn’t heard a word of their exchange, as he continued staring through the trees.

From where he stood, he could see Liv slowly walking through the garden.

After spending a week in conversation with her sister, Corida, Liv had finally begun to explore the mansion, as if her curiosity about the place had been piqued. She moved cautiously, looking around.

During that week, Daaemon had deliberately avoided speaking to her. It wasn’t just the hurt from seeing her discomfort every time she saw him—he feared she might decide to leave the mansion entirely, unable to bear the pressure.

Since he didn’t approach her, Liv didn’t approach him either. She seemed almost indifferent to his presence, as though she’d forgotten he existed.

Charles could see that Daemon’s patience was nearing its limit. The fact that Daaemon was receiving reports outside the mansion, in the path leading to the garden, was evidence of that.

And Daaemon wasn’t even pretending to be interested in the report—it was clear he was simply waiting for Liv to appear, glancing repeatedly at the garden’s entrance.

When Liv finally approached, close enough to notice Daemon, he clasped his hands behind his back, pretending to be casually engrossed in Roman and Charles.

Charles nudged Roman, who looked bewildered. Acting natural, Charles held out a document.

“It’s news from the capital.”

“But I already reported that… Ugh.”

Charles jabbed his elbow harder into Roman’s side, flashing a dependable smile at Daemon. Daaemon glanced at Charles, nodded, and took the document, his face showing a hint of satisfaction. Charles’ eyes lit up with a sense of accomplishment—surely he’d earn a bonus this month!

“Ah, Liv.”

Daemon, pretending to have just noticed Liv, called out to her.

Liv, who had seemed intent on passing by quietly, hesitated when she met his gaze. She bowed her head politely in greeting. Though her manner was clearly formal and distant, Daaemon maintained a composed expression.

“How are you feeling?”

“I’m alright. Thank you for your concern.”

“It’s not something to be thankful for—I’m just checking on my lover’s wellbeing. If anything, you should blame me for failing to prevent the accident.”

“Oh.”

His words, meant to convey a desire for a less formal interaction—even frustration that she wasn’t more comfortable around him—were lost on Liv, who simply gave an awkward half-smile and stayed silent.

Watching the exchange, Charles and Roman could barely contain their discomfort. They wanted nothing more than to leave immediately. Thankfully, Daaemon soon gave them a glare that clearly meant “get out,” and they gratefully turned to leave.

“Please, take your time to talk. We’ll be off!”

Before Liv could protest, the two men hurriedly fled, practically running.

Liv watched them disappear, then lowered her gaze, clasping her hands together in front of her. She hesitated for a moment before slowly beginning to speak.

“I, um, spoke with Corida briefly. You are Marquis…”

“Daemon.”

Daaemon cut her off, his voice carrying a hint of irritation. Liv, who had been looking down, quickly lifted her head to look at him.

“Pardon?”

“You should call me Daemon.”

“…Me?”

Her incredulous response made it clear she couldn’t believe it, and that twisted something inside Daemon. He put extra emphasis into his voice as he continued.

“Yes. You are the only woman to whom I have given that privilege. You are my first and last lover, and soon you’ll be my one and only family.”

Liv seemed to understand his intention behind emphasizing each word. After a moment of contemplation, her expression slightly conflicted, she spoke calmly.

“I have heard that, but still—I don’t quite understand. How could—I mean, how did we come to be like this?”

“What do you remember?”

“…It feels like I just arrived in Buerno yesterday.”

Liv frowned slightly, as if muttering to herself.

“So, you’ve lost all memory of the past few years.”

Daaemon pressed his fingers against his furrowed brow.

If she believed she had just arrived in Buerno, that meant she had no memory of her time tutoring for Lady Pendance. More importantly, it was before she had any connection to the artist—before her involvement in any nude paintings or the incidents that followed.

“Explaining everything will take some time.”

Could “some time” even begin to cover it?

For the first time, Daaemon truly grasped the meaning of the word “overwhelming.” The thought of having to start from their very first meeting and recount everything honestly weighed heavily on his heart.

Unable to bear Liv’s innocent gaze, as if she were seeing everything for the first time, Daaemon looked away and spoke gruffly, “If you push yourself too hard to remember, you’ll just end up exhausted. Focus on recovering for now.”

“But…”

Liv seemed ready to argue, but Daaemon quickly changed the subject.

“It’s true that we’re supposed to get married. No matter where you go in Buerno, you’re treated as the Marchioness. Everything is ready for the wedding—your dress is finished, the jewels have been chosen, and the invitations have all been sent. There’s no backing out now.”

His detailed explanation about their upcoming wedding sounded almost desperate.

Liv listened quietly, tilting her head slightly.

“But… will we be able to go through with the wedding?”

 Daemon’s face grew serious at her questioning words.

“What do you mean?”

“Well, I’ve lost my memory, haven’t I? I might make a mistake in front of others… Everything feels so unfamiliar and overwhelming. Especially with you, Marquis…”

“Daemon.”

“Oh, yes. With you, Daemon… our relationship is just so surprising to me.”

Liv corrected herself awkwardly under Daemon’s prompt, carefully watching his reaction.

“Is that meant in a negative way?”

“Not really. It’s not something I could easily describe as positive or negative. It’s just surprising, that’s all. To think we are lovers… You probably know, but I’ve always had to work to make ends meet, so I couldn’t possibly attend gatherings where I might meet someone like you.”

Her question made sense. Considering Daemon’s status, it was unlikely that their paths would ever cross. And yet, somehow, this man, who seemed beyond her reach, was now her betrothed. It was all too incredible.

While it might feel like good fortune, Liv’s rational approach to understanding their connection—instead of simply accepting it—left Daaemon feeling unexpectedly disheartened.

“You…”

Daaemon paused, wetting his lips as he chose his words. It was better for him to explain things himself rather than let her imagination run wild.

“You were teaching the young lady of the Pendance family. I met you while visiting the baron’s residence on personal business.”

“I see… The baron’s residence…”

Liv nodded, her expression showing understanding.

“So our relationship began after we met at the baron’s residence?”

“…More or less.”

It wasn’t entirely wrong, though it left out much of what had happened in between. Daemon, uncharacteristically vague, looked away. However, Liv didn’t seem inclined to let the matter rest.

“What made you take notice of a mere tutor?”

Hearing her belittle herself like that made Daaemon frown.

“What about you was lacking?”

“You’re handsome, of noble rank, and you seem to be wealthy. I’m sure many women must have wanted to be with you.”

It was meant as a compliment, but it didn’t make Daaemon smile. The qualities she listed didn’t seem to sway her at all, even after losing her memory. Worse still, she hadn’t even considered that he might have fallen for her at first sight.

Unaware of Daemon’s dissatisfaction, Liv seemed deep in thought before voicing a careful guess.

“Did I somehow deceive you or do something improper?”

“You, deceive me?”

Where would her imagination take her if he didn’t intervene?

Daaemon almost laughed out loud at the absurdity of her suggestion. However, seeing her genuinely serious expression, even the urge to laugh faded. Unable to hide his incredulity, he responded in an exasperated tone.

“Do I look like someone who would easily fall for trickery?”

Liv gave Daaemon an appraising glance. His commanding presence made it abundantly clear that he was not someone who could be taken lightly.

She shook her head in acknowledgment, conceding that her thoughts had been a bit far-fetched.

“Of course not.”

“I understand that all of this is unfamiliar to you,” Daaemon sighed deeply, meeting her gaze. “But the one thing I can tell you for certain is—I’m not good at interacting with others. I’ve never kept anyone else close to me. You—you are the only one who holds everything of mine. This leash, I gave it to you myself. There’s no question; it belongs to you…”

Liv still regarded him with unfamiliar eyes. Even so, Daaemon couldn’t help but continue.

“And that will never change, no matter what.”

Even if Liv had lost her memory, she was still the only one for him.

 



 

Mental health wasn’t Thierry’s main field of expertise, so she decided to gather some materials and head to a nearby town to consult on the matter. Since Liv’s arm needed time to heal anyway, Daaemon allowed Thierry to be away for a few days.

Before leaving, Thierry advised Liv to avoid trying to force her memories back and to proceed cautiously. It was an injury that couldn’t be physically touched or seen, so she had to be particularly careful.

Corida, too, gave Liv a brief summary of important matters but otherwise decided to watch the situation unfold. It happened to be school break, so Corida stayed by her side, trying to keep Liv’s mind at ease.

Liv agreed with Thierry’s suggestion to take things slowly, but that didn’t mean she wasn’t questioning the situation.

In fact, the more time passed, the more her doubts grew.

“I think… I must have done something to him.”

Liv spoke suddenly while gazing absentmindedly out the window.

Corida, who was reading in the same room, looked up with a puzzled expression. Though Liv’s eyes were still fixed on the view outside, her gaze wandered aimlessly.

“How could such a fine-looking man be so devoted to me unless I did something wrong to him?”

Corida, who had been listening silently, let out an exasperated sigh.

“Sister, just accept it. Amazingly enough, this is your life now.”

“Still… something about it doesn’t sit right with me.”

“What doesn’t?”

“It feels like I’ve led someone who was doing perfectly well down the wrong path.”

Corida couldn’t believe what she was hearing.

“…How could you even think that?”

But Liv didn’t seem to hear Corida’s muttering, her face showing only concern.

“How did it come to this? What could I have done?”

She had it all wrong. In fact, it was quite the opposite.

Watching Liv with an incredulous look, Corida clicked her tongue, shaking her head. Clearly, Liv must be feeling well enough to have such irrational thoughts. Glancing briefly at Liv’s arm, which was healing nicely, Corida turned her attention back to her book. From her vantage point, watching their dramatic romance unfold up close was of little benefit. Better to just study for next semester.

Regardless of Corida’s reaction, Liv was quite serious.

The memory of Daemon’s expression during their recent conversation outside the mansion lingered in her mind.

 

“You are the only woman to whom I have given that privilege. You are my first and last lover, and soon you’ll be my one and only family.”

 

The words made her heart drop.

Honestly, how could she not be moved when such a stunningly handsome man confessed so passionately? Liv had long stopped expecting romantic relationships, having focused solely on supporting herself and earning money for Corida’s medical expenses. But it wasn’t as if she never wished for love.

She had always wanted someone to lean on, someone to protect her, but she believed it was unrealistic and had thus never shown it.

So she should be happy with her current circumstances…

But why did his heartfelt confession feel so unsettling? No—it wasn’t his words that felt unstable, but the man himself.

And maybe it was just her imagination, but Daaemon seemed reluctant to speak clearly about their relationship. It didn’t seem like his reluctance was just because of Thierry’s advice to tread carefully.

That lingering ambiguity left an uncomfortable mark on her heart.

 

“If you want to leave here right away, do so.”

 

Now that she thought about it, Corida had said something like that early on. It was an odd thing to say to someone who had just lost their memory.

Her thoughts were increasingly leaning toward the idea that there was something being hidden from her.

Knock, knock.

A knock interrupted her thoughts. Daaemon stood at the door when Corida opened it.

Daaemon cleared his throat under the curious gazes of both women. Then, in a formal tone, he asked, “Would you like to go out for some fresh air together?”

Corida looked at Daaemon and Liv in turn before covering her mouth and stepping back, clearly signaling her intention to leave them alone. After a moment’s hesitation, Liv nodded.

Nothing would be solved by just overthinking. She decided she’d spend more time with Daemon—perhaps doing so would help her regain her lost memories.

 



 

It was Philip who had suggested they go on a date.

 

“You can’t just sit back and wait forever. Dr. Gertrude didn’t say you shouldn’t date, did she? If you spend time together naturally, she might remember the familiarity you once shared.”

 

Daemon, who had been helplessly hovering around Liv, immediately agreed. He also made subtle arrangements to create an environment that might trigger her memories.

The boat they were riding was one such arrangement.

“The lake is so vast.”

Daaemon watched Liv closely as she marveled at the scene, but it was clear that she remembered nothing.

It seemed all his efforts to borrow this boat from the Pendance family had been in vain.

 “To think that a day would come when I could spend such a leisurely time like this.”

Liv looked at the flower-decorated boat with a sense of wonder, her gaze turning to the serene scenery of the lake. Her eyes, gazing endlessly at the scene, were filled with an unfamiliar unease at the sudden leisure given to her. So much so that even Daemon, who watched her, began to feel uncomfortable seeing her act as if she didn’t deserve such treatment.

Eventually, unable to bear it any longer, Daaemon spoke first.

“You proposed to me here.”

At those words, Liv, who had been looking around, turned to Daaemon in surprise.

“Really?”

Her expression, filled with disbelief, gradually turned into one of deep thought. Soon, she furrowed her brows slightly.

“I’m sorry.”

“For what?”

“For not remembering. A proposal must be such a precious memory.”

Her face, filled with sincere regret as she apologized, left Daaemon at a loss for words momentarily. He finally parted his lips to speak.

“…No one could have made a more wonderful proposal than you.”

It was an indirect affirmation of her words. After all, it wasn’t incorrect.

Who else could have prepared such a perfect setting, offering gifts made specifically for him, and proposed with words that hit his heart precisely?

Daaemon still clearly remembered that day—the scent of lilies surrounding them, the weight of the picture frame, and Liv’s innocent smile as she gave him those gifts.

It was, indeed, as Liv had said—a “precious memory.”

Daaemon looked at the woman before him. She was the one who had proposed to him, but now she was different. The woman before him didn’t remember the “precious memory” they had created together; she sat awkwardly, as if listening to someone else’s story.

This realization caused Daaemon to feel somewhat disheartened.

“I must have really liked you, Daemon,” Liv said gently, seeming to sense his feelings. “To have proposed first, I must have been quite fond of you.”

Liv spoke in a kind tone, seemingly aware of the loss Daaemon felt from the time they had spent together. However, she did not try to force herself to act like the lover she could not remember, knowing that would be an even greater affront to him.

“In truth, I’ve never been familiar with romantic relationships. It’s so strange that I was able to approach someone so assertively.”

Liv mumbled as if to herself, gently touching the flowers that decorated the boat with her fingertips.

“I can’t even imagine how much I must have clung to you.”

“It was me who clung to you.”

Daaemon corrected her immediately.

“I was the one begging—I said I’d die without you.”

It was purely an objective fact, and there wasn’t an ounce of shame or embarrassment in his correction. However, Liv looked at him as if she suspected he was exaggerating a bit.

“How kind of you. You’re saying that just so I won’t feel bad.”

“It’s the truth.”

“Alright, I’ll believe you.”

While Daaemon was utterly sincere, Liv chuckled as if she had just heard a joke.

Realizing that the laughter was involuntary, Liv hurriedly covered her mouth and turned her head away, but her eyes still formed a soft curve. Daaemon stared at her warm green eyes, as if captivated.

“Ahem, I’m sorry. I wasn’t laughing at you—I just felt good, that’s all.”

Her gentle voice was full of concern that she might have offended him.

Suddenly, Daaemon found himself wondering if this was the carefree smile he might have seen if they had started their relationship more “properly.”

If not for the hardships—if she hadn’t ended up as a nude model, caught the attention of a wicked man, been treated like a pretty statue, then fled in desperation only to be caught and forced into endless struggles—perhaps she could have been as peaceful as she seemed now, without those bad memories.

And so, a question naturally followed.

Did he really need to see her memory return?

“Do you think my memory will come back?”

As if reading his thoughts, Liv suddenly spoke.

“I’m curious. About the time we spent together. About how someone like me ended up in a relationship with someone like you, Daemon. Right now, all I can think is that it’s too much for me.”

“I’m the one who’s unworthy.”

“Thank you for saying that.”

Their quiet date on the calm lake seemed to have softened her guardedness. Liv spoke more comfortably than she had before.

“Actually, I thought you didn’t want to tell me anything. I mean, about our relationship or our past.”

Daemon’s eyebrows rose slightly. He took a quiet breath, replying in a blunt voice, “Why would I… have a reason to do that?”

“That’s what I’m saying. I don’t know why I thought that. Maybe I’ve just been on edge since I suddenly lost my memory.”

Liv shook her head, smiling as if the thought was ridiculous.

“Dr. Gertrude said she’d return with the related research, so I’ll be able to regain my memory soon enough. It’s all strange, but I’m trying not to rush things.”

What was this feeling?

For the first time in a long while, Daaemon couldn’t define the emotions swirling within him. Suppressing his confused feelings, he found himself with a lump in his throat and had to look away from Liv as he spoke.

“Yes, you’ll regain your memory soon enough.”

 



 

The atmosphere of their date turned out better than expected.

Liv seemed to have opened her heart a little and was starting to see Daaemon in a positive light. She even thought of him as a kind and considerate man—perhaps a bit blunt in expressing himself, but with warmth beneath the surface.

Strangely, it was Daaemon who began to change.

He no longer hovered around Liv all the time. However, he still wouldn’t leave the mansion, and it seemed he spent more time thinking about her now than when he was by her side.

The same was true now as he sat in the study. Though he had an open book before him, it had long since become a mere decoration. Even the cigar that had become a habit for him lay discarded to the side.

“Is it really right for her to regain her memory?”

Resting his chin on one hand, Daaemon tapped his finger anxiously on the armrest. Philip, who stood by his side, looked at him curiously at the murmured words.

“Pardon?”

“All those useless memories are gone now—why bring them back…”

It didn’t seem like he expected an answer. Watching him with a worried gaze, Philip called out cautiously.

“Master.”

“Hah.”

Daaemon sighed deeply, pressing his temples with his fingers before glancing at Philip.

“Where is Liv?”

“Madam is touring the mansion. She mentioned visiting the east wing today.”

The Langess mansion was vast, and there were still many areas Liv had not explored.

Since her trip to the lake, she seemed to have decided to embrace her current circumstances. She had taken an active interest in exploring every corner of the mansion. With the staff being consistently kind and cooperative, Liv’s exploration was going smoothly.

Even before she lost her memory, Liv had maintained a harmonious relationship with the mansion’s staff. Everyone respected and followed her, as she was in no way lacking as the mistress of the house.

“The east wing, where Liv’s studio is.”

The fingers that had paused on the armrest resumed their anxious tapping.

The studio at the Langess mansion wasn’t a place she visited often, as the larger external studio was much better equipped for painting. Compared to that, the mansion’s studio was just somewhere she would occasionally visit to doodle when she was bored.

So, there was little chance that visiting it would suddenly bring her memories back.

Realizing that Liv’s studio wasn’t likely to play a significant role in helping her recover her memory made Daemon’s mind restless again. This undefined emotion had become so bothersome that he frowned deeply.

While subconsciously touching his lips, unable to shake off this feeling, an idea suddenly crossed his mind.

“She hasn’t gone to the basement yet, has she?”

“No, since you didn’t say anything, so I haven’t suggested it.”

As soon as Philip’s calm response reached him, Daaemon sprang to his feet.

“Prepare a cover.”

Pushing the unread book aside, he hurriedly left the study, not forgetting to instruct Philip along the way.

“Something to use as a cover, as much as possible.”

 The Langess mansion was truly an expansive place. It was so grand that calling it a castle would not be an exaggeration. This vast stone building was meticulously maintained in every corner. Every small window frame and spiral staircase railing was spotless, and each room was adorned with elegant sculptures and paintings that pleased the eye.

Corida had mentioned that Daaemon was a sophisticated collector, and indeed, her words were no exaggeration. Even to Liv, who had no particular knowledge of art, it was evident that not a single small painting was placed carelessly.

Moreover, the staff working there were impeccably trained—their speech was faultless. Liv, who had worked as a live-in governess for noble families before, had never encountered servants as well-trained as those at the Langess mansion.

The way they respectfully bowed and called her “Madam” whenever they saw her made her feel like she was walking on clouds—unreal.

“I really painted here…”

“Yes, Madam.”

The studio, to which her personal maid had guided her, was excessively luxurious for an art studio. Even the wallpaper appeared expensive at first glance. It was so lavish that she felt guilty even imagining paint splattering on it.

Liv slowly surveyed the room, her gaze landing on the neatly arranged art supplies.

Huh?

She stared at the brushes, meticulously organized by size, before looking back at the maid.

“These are brushes, right?”

“Yes, Madam.”

“…Brushes inlaid with jewels?”

“I understand that they were custom-made for you by the Master.”

Why in the world were there jewels on the brush handles?

Liv stared at the sparkling handles for a moment, then turned her gaze away. She was curious if those shining stones were real diamonds, but she had a feeling she’d be even more unsettled if she found out. Instead, she looked at the large shelves next to them.

“…Why are there so many pigments?”

“They were provided to ensure you had any color you desired. The ones below were specially mixed.”

“And those canvases…”

“Organized by size.”

“Ah. And next to them are easels.”

She thought an easel was just something to hold up a canvas. But there were three-legged easels, four-legged easels, wooden ones, metal ones, square easels, and triangular ones…

Did it really make sense to have so many different types?

Liv felt a bit overwhelmed. From what she’d heard, painting had been a “light” hobby she’d enjoyed before losing her memory. It wasn’t even something she had been doing for a long time.

Corida wouldn’t have lied, so this lavish setup for a newly acquired hobby seemed way over the top. Even professionals probably wouldn’t paint in such an extravagant environment.

Liv couldn’t imagine that she herself had requested all of this. Even though she had lost her memory, she knew enough about her own behavior patterns to be sure—she was not the type to go overboard for a casual hobby. Which meant that this studio was put together under Daemon’s orders.

She had heard him say it multiple times, but seeing the ridiculous gifts he had showered her with made her feel something new.

Was he really so desperate for her?

Had she really done nothing wrong to make him feel that way?

“Angel?”

Lost in her thoughts while staring at the studio, Liv was startled by a sudden call. She turned to find a young boy, neatly dressed, looking up at her with sparkling eyes.

“You are…”

Liv hadn’t heard of Daaemon having any other family, so she hesitated, simply watching the boy.

The boy’s eyes, which had been filled with excitement, soon clouded with confusion. It seemed that he had remembered Liv’s current condition, and his face quickly turned gloomy.

“This is Noah,” the maid beside her explained quickly. “He recently came under the Master’s patronage and is staying here temporarily.”

Listening to the maid, Liv slowly nodded and moved her lips.

“Noah.”

The name felt somewhat familiar in her mouth, but it didn’t bring back any particular memories.

Seeing that Liv didn’t recognize him, Noah looked somewhat disappointed. But he quickly seemed to regain his composure, and spoke in a deliberately mature tone.

“I heard you were unwell. I hope you recover soon.”

“Oh, thank you.”

Liv smiled involuntarily. The sight of Noah acting so mature for his age was both endearing and slightly pitiful.

It seemed Liv wasn’t the only one with this impression, as the maid watching from the side also smiled softly. She leaned toward Liv, whispering quietly enough that Noah wouldn’t hear.

“You were the one who helped Noah when he was abandoned by his parents during the festival, Madam. The Master decided to support him after recognizing his talent.”

“He did something good.”

“If it weren’t for you, Madam, Noah wouldn’t be staying here.”

“That’s not true. Ultimately, it was Daaemon who chose to sponsor him.”

Noah looked up curiously at the two women whispering, and Liv carefully patted his head. Noah, seemingly familiar with her touch, calmly leaned into her hand.

If Noah had been abandoned by his parents, he must have grown up in a poor environment. Even so, looking down at Noah’s chubby cheeks, which were round and plump, Liv could tell that he was well-fed and looked after now. It was clear that this was more than just financial support—Noah was being genuinely cared for.

Liv, gazing down at the boy who barely came up to her waist, muttered to herself, “Perhaps he isn’t such a bad person after all.”

“Is that ‘bad person’ supposed to be referring to me?”

A blunt voice suddenly cut in. Liv looked up, startled, to see Daaemon approaching with Philip in tow.

Liv wasn’t exactly speaking ill of him, but she still felt embarrassed and hesitated. In that brief moment, Daaemon gestured toward the maid and Noah, and Philip smoothly led the two away.

Noah seemed like he wanted to talk more with Liv, but whatever Philip whispered to him worked, and the boy soon smiled brightly and said goodbye.

Daaemon glanced at Philip, who was walking away with the boy, then turned his gaze to Liv.

“I wasn’t saying anything bad about you.”

“I know you aren’t the type to do such things.”

He replied easily, his gaze shifting to the inside of the studio that Liv had been examining.

“What do you think of your hobby?”

“One thing’s for sure.”

Liv looked into the studio, following his gaze. Standing straight, with her hands neatly clasped, she took in all the unusual details that had caught her attention earlier—all the absurd, extravagant items.

“Someone is very eager to please me.”

At her words, Daaemon let out a small laugh. He was clearly well aware of how over-the-top the scene before them appeared.

“From ‘bad person’ to ‘someone eager to please you.'”

“Did my words offend you?”

“No. I was just surprised at how accurate you are.”

He certainly didn’t seem offended. In fact, he looked somewhat amused. His faint smile left his expression completely unguarded.

Liv found herself staring at him blankly. His sharp jawline, tightly shut lips, high-bridged nose, piercing blue eyes, and platinum hair slightly tousled over his forehead…

No statue in the world could match this man in real life. Just seeing his face filled her with pure awe.

It was because of that face that Liv had found it hard to accept reality.

The healthy Corida, a peaceful and abundant life, and an extraordinary fiancé who adored her…

“Honestly, this moment right now is the life I always dreamed of.”

Still mesmerized by Daemon, Liv slowly continued, “If I said it feels like God has given me a gift, would that be too childish a thought?”

Daaemon shifted his gaze from the studio to Liv. “If it makes you happy, it doesn’t matter. Believe it’s a gift from God if you want to.”

“But all of this is really a gift from you, Daemon.”

Somehow feeling shy under his gaze, Liv lowered her eyes. A blush spread across her cheeks, and a bashful smile appeared.

“Then, you’re my god, Daemon.”

Daemon’s gaze wavered. He stared down at Liv for a long while, then cautiously cupped her face.

Liv did not avoid him as he leaned in closer.

As their lips met, warmth spread between them—a familiar heat that felt instinctive.

 If Liv appeared in a dream, it couldn’t possibly be a nightmare.

Even if it were a dream where Liv despised him, how could that ever be called a nightmare?

 

“There’s no need for you to be my god, Marquis.”

 

One day, those cold words echoed clearly in his mind, stirring the anxiety Daaemon had barely managed to suppress, rekindling it like a smoldering ember.

In the dark of the night, Daaemon woke after only a few hours of sleep. The dark bedroom was silent, and the vast bed was cold. In that emptiness, he tried to piece together his emotions, which felt as though they had been shredded by Liv’s indifferent gaze.

It wasn’t easy to calm himself alone. He had never been able to sleep deeply without Liv by his side, and as the days of sleeping separately dragged on, his sleep grew shorter and shorter. And then, a dream like this.

Daaemon ran a hand through his sweat-dampened hair, closing and opening his eyes again.

Liv had said she didn’t need a god. She had told him not to become one.

But Liv, who had lost her memory… no, but once she regained her memory… Would she even regain it at all?

“Do I really…”

Do I really need to make her remember? Those memories filled with pain and negative emotions?

The question that had crossed his mind earlier in the day returned, now more forcefully.

Daaemon took a deep breath and got out of bed. Out of habit, he reached for a bottle of liquor, his thoughts colliding endlessly in his head. He couldn’t tell what was right.

…No, this wasn’t really a question of right or wrong.

 

“All of this is really a gift from you, Daemon.”

 

He took a gulp of the strong liquor, a hollow laugh escaping his lips.

 

“Then, you’re my god, Daemon.”

 

It was nothing more than his ugly desire—wanting to keep facing the trusting, bright-eyed Liv who smiled at him without a hint of doubt.

 



 

Daaemon and Liv went on several more dates.

Daaemon remained consistently courteous, always behaving like a gentleman. Even when he kissed her, he did so with the utmost respect for her wishes. Of course, when Liv shyly initiated a kiss for the first time, he couldn’t help but show some impatience, but whenever she seemed to pull back, he immediately suppressed his desires and stepped away.

In that manner, they maintained a gentle level of intimacy, visiting the greenhouse and arboretum at Berryworth Mansion and even taking a tour of a small studio house where Liv received her painting lessons. Liv’s fondness for Daaemon grew by the day.

Though her memories still seemed distant, her arm was healing well, and her heart felt at peace. In fact, Liv’s recovery went so smoothly that even Corida began going out more frequently, seeing how much calmer Liv had become.

The Langess mansion might have been large, but it seemed boring to Corida, as she spent nearly every day out and about.

Apparently, she was meeting friends. Liv later found out that one of those friends was Milion, the only daughter of Baron Pendance, whom Liv had once taught. Milion had sent a letter full of concern after hearing from Corida about Liv’s injury.

It seemed Corida hadn’t mentioned the memory loss, as Milion’s letter was full of warmth, as if nothing had changed.

 

“You were teaching the young lady of the Pendance family. I met you while visiting the baron’s residence on personal business.”

 

Baron Pendance’s residence was where Liv first met Daemon.

So, had Milion seen their first meeting? What did the two of them look like to that girl back then? And what did they look like now?

Liv was genuinely curious. So, when Milion said she wanted to see Liv again, Liv agreed. It wasn’t a particularly difficult meeting—she would simply accompany Corida when she went out.

It seemed best not to mention her memory loss, but it wouldn’t be hard to reminisce about the past with just a few shared memories.

Daaemon hadn’t asked many questions when he heard she was going out with Corida. Though he did ask what time they’d be back, it seemed strangely serious, but Liv didn’t think much of it. Considering her injury and memory loss, she thought it natural for him to worry, even if she was with her sister.

And so, they met at one of Buerno’s finest coffee houses, which had private rooms for comfortable conversations.

“Teacher! How have you become even more beautiful!”

Milion’s exaggerated words left Liv looking embarrassed. However, Milion didn’t seem to care at all and began chatting even before taking her seat.

To be honest, Liv had felt a bit guilty for deciding not to tell Milion about her memory loss. She worried that it might become obvious in her words or actions.

But, to her surprise, Milion kept up a steady stream of chatter, requiring little input from Liv. Moreover, Corida’s naturally cheerful personality meant that the two of them hit it off quickly, soon forgetting Liv was even there.

“It’s a pity we don’t see each other often since you went off to Adelinde. No one else can even hold a conversation with me for three hours straight.”

Milion sighed in frustration. Unlike Liv, Corida let out a loud sigh, looking genuinely confused.

“Why not?”

“Exactly! Why not? I mean, even talking about the novel I read last night isn’t enough time—why is Adelinde so far away?”

“You’re right, it’s too far.”

Corida nodded in agreement. As Liv quietly listened to their conversation, she tilted her head slightly.

Adelinde. The area where Corida’s boarding school was located.

When she first heard that Corida was attending boarding school, Liv had looked up its location. To her, it seemed far too distant from Buerno. However, since Corida was on a scholarship and had a sponsor, she assumed there must have been a reason for the arrangement.

Still, thinking about it again, it seemed strange.

Why would she have chosen to send Corida to a school so far away, especially while preparing for her wedding here in Buerno? No matter how healthy Corida had become…

‘It’s not the kind of choice I would have made.’

Liv was in the midst of this thought when Milion spoke up again, her lips pursed.

“But I understand. If I had faced that kind of unfounded slander, I wouldn’t have wanted to stay in the area even for an hour.”

“Oh, um. That…”

Corida, who had been listening quietly, seemed flustered and tried to interject, but Milion, oblivious to Corida’s reaction, continued casually.

“Who would have guessed that Lady Malte of the famous Malte Duchy family would turn out to be the type to spread such malicious rumors and act so underhandedly.”

“Uh, well…”

Corida tried to say something again, but Milion, as if unaware, went on.

“Still, I’m glad everything got sorted out so quickly, aren’t you? And thanks to that, Teacher, you’ve been able to come back like this.”

Milion suddenly turned to Liv, addressing her directly. Liv responded with a vague expression.

“Yes.”

“In that sense, thank you so much for meeting me again. My mother is really regretful, too. I still have so much to learn from you, Teacher. If I’d known this chance would be gone forever, I would’ve begged you to stay as soon as I heard our contract was ending.”

It seemed that this was what Milion had wanted to say all along. Her usually lively demeanor seemed subdued, and she looked like she’d been mulling over this for quite some time, waiting for the right moment to say it. Liv, having no memory of these events, simply smiled gently in response.

Interpreting Liv’s smile as a positive response, Milion’s face brightened slightly. She regained her usual energy, her eyes sparkling as she changed the subject.

“Oh, by the way, the self-portrait you painted in my mansion’s studio—where did you hang it? Was the Marquis completely amazed by it?”

“A self-portrait?”

“Yes, your self-portrait!”

Liv let out a low sigh. She had been exploring the Langess mansion, the Berryworth mansion, and several other properties recently.

But she hadn’t seen any self-portraits.

“Oh, oh my! Look at the time! Goodness! My brother-in-law will be worried!”

“Wow, calling the Marquis ‘brother-in-law’… Corida, you’re amazing…”

“Hahaha…”

Corida hurriedly began to gather her things. Milion lamented that it had only been three hours, but seemed to leave without much fuss, aware of Liv’s still bandaged arm.

Liv remained composed until she parted ways with Milion, maintaining a calm demeanor without a single hint of disturbance. She saw Milion off with a faint smile and then boarded the carriage, Corida following behind hesitantly.

Once they got into the carriage and the door closed, the sound of hooves began as the carriage moved slowly. At that moment, Liv finally spoke.

“Corida. I want to hear in detail about the time we went to Adelinde.”

Corida, who had been glancing around to gauge the mood, shrugged her shoulders heavily.

“Well, I don’t really know the full story myself, Sister.”

“There must have been a reason to send you to that faraway girls’ school, especially when you were unwell. Isn’t that so?”

Liv’s gaze, as she looked at Corida, was endlessly gentle, causing Corida to relax unwittingly.

“Um… Yes…”

Corida blinked and swallowed dryly.

“Can you explain the situation?”

“Uh, but Sister… Dr. Gertrude said…”

“Corida.”

Liv gazed intently at Corida. Her calm gaze showed no hint of harshness, but for some reason, Corida felt uncomfortable in her seat.

Well, when you’re in a relationship, you fight, you almost break up, but then you get back together because you like each other again… It was probably like that back then too. So, surely, telling her wouldn’t cause a big problem.

…Right?

 Daaemon learned about Liv’s meeting with Milion a little late.

“…Ha, Pendance.”

Liv’s memory loss was strictly confidential and had not been disclosed to anyone outside. There was no need to stir up gossip right before their wedding, and revealing such information could easily be exploited negatively.

In Buerno, there were no longer people who dared gossip about Liv. Anyone remotely connected to any scandal had already been identified and removed.

Among those Daaemon couldn’t remove was the Pendance family. Not because they were a prominent noble family in Buerno, but because of Milion Pendance, their only daughter and Liv’s student. The simple fact that Liv cared for Milion had allowed them to remain in Buerno until now.

Milion’s cheerful nature had spread good stories about Liv far and wide, which Daaemon found quite useful. However, in the current situation…

“Madam has returned.”

At the servant’s report, Daaemon grabbed his cane and stood up abruptly.

 



 

“Uh, um, I’m tired, so I’ll just go now.”

Corida, who got off the carriage first, slunk away as soon as she saw Daemon. That unnatural movement allowed Daaemon to sense that they had talked about something during their outing—something that hadn’t been discussed before.

Liv, however, showed no noticeable change. Calmly alighting from the carriage, she paused briefly upon seeing Daaemon waiting for her at the front entrance, before bowing slightly, without any apparent reaction.

“I wasn’t late compared to the time I told you earlier. Were you waiting for me?”

Perhaps today’s outing hadn’t caused any problems.

Daemon, who had just moments before sensed something amiss from Corida’s behavior, couldn’t help but be reassured by Liv’s serene expression. Or maybe he simply wanted to believe that everything was fine.

Daaemon was feeling guilty and uneasy. If he made too much of an issue now, he might end up creating a problem that wasn’t even there.

After hesitating for a moment, Daaemon spoke in a calm manner, “Did you have a good outing?”

“Yes.”

“I heard you met Lady Pendance today.”

At his words, Liv’s lips curved slightly.

“You’re well-informed. I just got off the carriage.”

Was it just his imagination, or was there something hidden beneath her gentle words?

“That’s…”

Or maybe he was overreacting.

“Your safety is always my top priority.”

His emotions fluctuated with every word, and his thoughts grew increasingly complex.

Yet Liv’s voice remained calm and steady. “Miss Milion is far too innocent a young girl to be any kind of threat.”

Her voice was impossible to read. Daaemon felt more clueless than ever.

There were too many things preoccupying his mind, and he couldn’t trust his own judgment.

“You… lost your memory. Dr. Gertrude said we should approach the matter carefully.”

He tried to sound nonchalant, but a trace of anxiety slipped through. Whether Liv noticed or not, she responded lightly.

“It wasn’t exactly a meeting to discuss old memories. Though, I did hope a few things might naturally come up.”

She turned, as if to head inside the mansion, but then suddenly stopped and looked back at Daemon. Standing upright, she fixed her gaze on him, her eyes seeming particularly steadfast.

“It seems like you’re worried I might have heard something.”

Caught off guard, Daaemon pressed his lips together tightly. Finally, he managed to respond.

“…Honestly, I’m not a good person.”

“Oh.”

Liv, who had been staring at him with a strange expression, slowly lowered her gaze. As her faint smile disappeared, her lips pressed together in a straight line, exuding a cold aura.

She stood still, without asking further questions, and then moved as if to leave again. Daaemon instinctively reached out to stop her.

“Liv.”

He still couldn’t read any emotions from her green eyes. But at this moment, Daaemon had a strong feeling that he couldn’t just let her go like this.

He knew Liv.

He knew how kind and considerate she was, but also how rational she could be—how she could prioritize reason over emotions when necessary.

Daaemon had already accepted total defeat when it came to her, and he knew it would never change for the rest of his life. He didn’t want to provoke the anger of someone he could never win against. He didn’t even want to risk a tiny chance of it.

The memory of Liv’s calm, peaceful eyes still lingered, leaving him with some lingering attachment. However, he knew that ending this uneasy peace was the right thing to do. No matter how much he hid or avoided speaking of the past, it would not simply disappear.

Seeing Liv looking at him in confusion, Daaemon spoke with difficulty, “There’s a place in this mansion you haven’t seen.”

Even without her memories, Liv was still Liv. She had the right to know her true circumstances.

 

Today, the basement door opened unusually heavily.

With a deep, heavy sound, the somewhat dark interior slowly came into view. Liv shuddered slightly upon seeing a tall figure covered in a white sheet right in front of her.

However, she soon realized that it was just a “human figure.” There were other large and small objects similarly covered with white sheets next to it.

“This place…”

Although everything inside was hidden under white sheets, Liv could tell at a glance that this space was a large gallery.

Daaemon glanced at Liv, who was looking around with wide eyes, and then turned on the gallery lights himself. The darkness receded slightly, and the eerie atmosphere somewhat lifted.

After hesitating for a moment, Liv slowly stepped inside the gallery. She approached one of the covered figures and looked back at Daemon.

“May I take a look?”

When Daaemon nodded, Liv grabbed the sheet and pulled it off. The human figure that had been partially visible beneath the sheet was now fully revealed.

It was a nude statue. The pure white sculpture was intricately detailed, down to each strand of hair and every crease of skin, appearing almost lifelike.

Liv, stunned by the beauty of the statue, turned her attention to the next covered object. Once again, Daaemon nodded.

This process repeated several times, with multiple sheets ending up on the floor.

What emerged were undeniably valuable works of art. Liv was sure that the remaining covered items were similar.

“I took up this hobby to… solve a certain problem of mine.”

Daemon, who had been quietly watching Liv, finally spoke. Usually, he stood with a perfect, composed expression, but now he seemed to be avoiding her gaze, almost as if he was anxious.

“A hobby of collecting artwork based on a specific theme.”

That specific theme being “nudes.”

Liv listened to his words as she looked around the space. Even with a cursory glance, it was clear that the gallery was filled with numerous pieces—large and small sculptures, as well as hundreds of paintings hanging on the walls.

“Everything here is…”

“All of it,” Daaemon replied shortly, finally lowering his chin slightly.

After some hesitation, he moved past the many displayed pieces and stood in front of an area that was not immediately visible. Unusually, the entire wall was covered by curtains, suggesting it was usually kept hidden.

Even as he reached the spot, Daaemon seemed conflicted. Staring blankly at the box in front of him, he confessed in a somewhat melancholic voice.

“In truth, I lied to you.”

“About what?”

“About our first meeting.”

He pulled the heavy curtain’s cord, causing the gathered folds to part slowly to both sides.

“I didn’t fall for you the first time I visited Baron Pendance’s residence.”

The wall that had been hidden was now covered with paintings. These, too, were nudes—likely all featuring the same model.

“And our meeting wasn’t exactly romantic.”

“Ah.”

Liv let out a low exclamation. She stared blankly at the three nude paintings now revealed. Even without her memory, she somehow understood the context just from looking at the paintings.

“I understand now.”

 Daaemon watched Liv anxiously. Her eyes were fixed on the nude paintings, seemingly oblivious to his tense expression.

“I thought it was strange. You and I… we are so different in many ways. How could we have met, talked, or shared anything? I truly couldn’t understand…”

As if muttering to herself, Liv suddenly turned to Daemon.

“Why did I run away to Adelinde?”

“Run away? That’s not—”

“I heard it from Corida. Sneaking away, disguising my identity, not even packing properly, moving from place to place—that’s running away.”

Daaemon had intended to correct her, to say it wasn’t running away. But his voice faltered and his mouth closed.

The truth was, there was nothing wrong with what Liv said. At the time, even Daaemon had understood her departure as a “runaway.” Refusing to call it that was just his own stubborn pride. It was his attempt to romanticize the situation, even just a little.

But what would changing a simple word achieve at this point?

Daaemon recognized the determined look on Liv’s face. He had faced that expression several times before, each time making the wrong choice. He knew better now—he couldn’t afford another foolish decision.

“Did I really run away from you?”

“Yes.”

So, Daaemon could only respond honestly to her question.

“I didn’t respect you at all. I didn’t realize it was love and treated you like a mistress. To you, it must have been nothing short of torment. So you left—you ran away.”

Daaemon took a quiet breath, trying to explain as unemotionally as possible.

“I chased after you relentlessly and forcibly brought you back. When force didn’t work, I begged for sympathy. In the end, you couldn’t be cruel, and I thought we’d found our love for each other… But now, here we are.”

Liv listened to him calmly, without a trace of blame or reproach in her expression. The more he spoke, the more vivid those past events became—but only for Daemon. And that made it even harder for him.

It felt just like when Liv couldn’t remember his proposal. Once again, Daaemon felt himself sinking into despair.

“Perhaps forgetting everything about me, and everything that happened in Buerno, was an unconscious wish on your part.”

Daaemon was not a person who made emotional assumptions or uncertain guesses. But this time, his rising frustration overwhelmed him, and he couldn’t maintain a rational train of thought.

“Maybe you wanted to forget everything tied to this place.”

Before she met Daemon, before she worked as a nude model, before all the bad things in Buerno happened—perhaps some part of her wanted to return to that state.

Liv was a woman who could live receiving love from men much kinder and more gentle than Daemon. Sure, he might have captured her heart with his outer shell for now, but that would age and wither eventually. Even Daaemon had to admit that his temperamental, self-centered, and irritable personality made him quite an undesirable partner.

They said that a bride’s emotions could be very fickle before her wedding. What if Liv was feeling that way now?

What if her solitary horseback ride had been because she was unsure about this marriage?

His imagination spun wildly, eventually landing on the horrifying image of Liv running away from the wedding.

Grinding his teeth, Daaemon forcibly pulled himself out of the spiraling thoughts.

“Even so, I’m sorry, but I can’t let you go.”

If, by some extraordinary leniency, she asked to delay the wedding… as much as he hated it, he’d accept it. But calling it off entirely was impossible. The idea of it would suffocate him with overwhelming anxiety. Clenching his cane tightly, Daaemon tried to suppress the unease creeping up on him.

Liv, who had been watching him with a contemplative gaze, let out a soft sigh.

“Thank you for being honest with me.”

She could have easily criticized him or demanded answers for his past wrongs, but she didn’t seem inclined to do so. Her expression merely showed that she was deep in thought.

“I’m quick to let go of things. If something feels beyond my ability to handle, I think it’s more rational to give up. But despite that, I’m still here…”

Liv glanced at the nude paintings on the wall. She recognized herself as the model, yet her gaze was as if she were looking at a stranger.

“Whatever happened here, it’s because I believed I could overcome it.”

Perhaps she could already imagine the circumstances surrounding the creation of those paintings and her own state of mind at the time. After all, it wasn’t hard to deduce one’s own actions.

“There must have been a reason why I decided to marry you. I trust the person I was before losing my memory.”

Liv’s calm words were soon followed by a somewhat melancholy addition.

“However, I think I need some time to accept all of this. I don’t think I can go on any more dates with you for a while.”

“I understand.”

It was enough that she hadn’t said she wanted to leave the mansion or cancel the wedding. Daaemon nodded his head emphatically. Seeing him submit so easily, Liv sighed once again. Seeing this man—who seemed to lack nothing—completely humbled like this, she realized that his claim of having “begged for sympathy” hadn’t been an exaggeration.

With a conflicted look, Liv slowly parted her lips.

“I might regain my memory…”

She had intended to offer a clumsy reassurance, that if she remembered their love, they could return to their original state.

But suddenly, something caught Liv’s eye, and she froze in place. Past the covered artworks, in the deepest part of the basement gallery, there was one painting hanging alone. Unlike the others, it was not covered by a sheet.

Anyone could tell that it was the most important piece in the gallery. It hung proudly in the center of the broad wall, with a spotlight seemingly dedicated to it.

Daaemon followed Liv’s gaze, curious about her sudden silence.

“Ah, that painting…”

Daaemon began to explain, but Liv was already moving toward it. Her steps, at first hesitant, carried her swiftly across the floor until she stood before the painting.

The woman in the painting was smiling happily, her eyes crinkled with joy.

 

“The self-portrait you painted in my mansion’s studio—where did you hang it?”

 

The woman who had sat hunched over miserably earlier was now in the center of this grand wall, with a shy but unmistakably joyful smile.

Liv stared at the painting, as if mesmerized. Despite her unskilled hand, the happiness of the woman in the painting overflowed.

Ah, so this was the painting I made at the Pendance mansion.

 

“Your self-portrait!”

 

A self-portrait of Liv Rodaise, smiling happily.

…Painted by her own hand.

“Ugh.”

Suddenly, a sharp pain shot through her head.

“Liv?”

Liv clutched her head, her upper body folding over.

“Ah…!”

“Liv!”

Daaemon rushed to her side, supporting her. He seemed to be saying something, but the sharp pain in her head drowned out his voice.

Liv curled in on herself further, as if trying to lessen the pain. But ultimately, she couldn’t stop the overwhelming whiteness from overtaking her vision.

“Liv!”

She thought she heard the distant sound of something shattering.

 



 

While Liv was unconscious, Thierry returned from her nearby outing. She was shocked at the situation she encountered and did not hold back her rebuke.

“I told you to approach things carefully!”

She seemed to have forgotten she was speaking to Marquis Dietrion, glaring at him fiercely. Unable to watch any longer, Philip stepped in gently.

“Dr. Gertrude, Master is also feeling remorse.”

However, Philip’s gentle intervention only seemed to add fuel to Thierry’s fire.

“What’s the point of regretting things after they’ve gone wrong?”

“He couldn’t have anticipated this outcome.”

“Do you think the marquis is still a cadet at the military academy?”

Philip frowned at Thierry’s words, which referenced the long years they had known Daemon, since his academy days.

“No one can foresee an accident before it happens.”

“You might see the marquis as a child due to your age, Philip, but coddling only leads to bad habits.”

“Why bring my age into this now?”

“Both of you, be quiet.”

The bickering pair fell silent at once. Throughout their argument, Daaemon had kept his eyes fixed on Liv. Just as he frowned and prepared to dismiss them both, a faint groan came from the bed where Liv lay.

Everyone in the room turned their gaze toward her simultaneously.

 A faint groan escaped, and her eyelids fluttered. Then slowly, her eyes opened.

“Liv.”

Daaemon placed his hand over the back of Liv’s. Her delicate fingers twitched slightly within his large palm.

Liv’s green eyes, now fully open, stared blankly at the ceiling before turning to look at Daemon. The meeting of their eyes and their interlocking fingers happened almost simultaneously.

“Ah…”

Liv let out a sigh, almost like a soft gasp.

Daemon, unable to blink, simply stared at her. He could see the familiar affection of his lover in her gaze.

“Daemon.”

The one calling his name now was his lover, soon to be his wife—the very “Liv Rodaise” who shared all his memories.

“Ha…”

Overwhelmed by an indescribable feeling, Daaemon couldn’t speak for a while. Sensing his emotions, Liv offered a faint smile.

“You must have been really startled.”

“It wasn’t just that…”

He wanted to say that it wasn’t such a simple matter, that he had been terrified of losing everything they had built. Words rose up to his throat, clamoring to come out.

But Daaemon pressed it all down, burying his fears deep within. Instead, he finally spoke the words he had meant to say after she had woken from her fall.

“…Never ride alone again.”

“But… I was practicing so I could ride with you.”

“Wherever you want to go, I’ll take you myself. Never again.”

Daaemon paused after that.

He had intended to tell her not to ride at all—that she didn’t need to bother with horseback riding. But now, what he truly wanted to say had changed entirely. Daemon’s eyes narrowed as he spoke with a restrained voice.

“Never forget me again.”

At some point in the past, she may have hated him. She may have despised and loathed him.

But it wasn’t just bad memories that existed between them. There were precious moments too—small, ordinary times and unforgettable events filled with shared memories.

Not knowing how to express this emotion, Daaemon simply gripped Liv’s hand tightly. She looked at him quietly and smiled awkwardly.

“You must have been really scared.”

Ah, so that’s what it was—fear. Finally, the tangled emotion had a name, but it wasn’t a comforting realization. With a bitter expression, Daaemon asked in a low voice.

“Do you remember what happened while your memory was gone?”

“Yes, I remember.”

Liv replied readily, letting out a small groan as she shifted her body. With Daemon’s help, she sat up and leaned against the headboard, speaking again.

“I remember everything you did for me.”

“…Did I do the right thing this time?” he asked cautiously, like a child seeking approval from a teacher.

Liv hesitated for a moment, then said with a gentle smile, “I believe that every part of our journey led us to this moment. That’s why I’m happy you were honest about our story in the end.”

Fidgeting with the soft blanket, Liv thought back to the days when she had lost her memory.

It still felt surreal—as if she were reading someone else’s story. However, she remembered Daemon’s actions and emotions vividly. When she hadn’t remembered, she hadn’t understood, but now it was as clear as if she were looking at the palm of her hand.

“Some memories are painful to recall, it’s true. But…”

Now that she had regained her memory, Liv understood why Daaemon had lied about their first meeting. It was a past that was better left unknown.

But without that past, would they be here now, facing each other like this?

“The scars may not disappear, but after enough time passes, we’ll be able to look at them and laugh, calling them the medals of our love—the evidence of our devotion.”

Not all moments could be beautiful and filled with joy. Liv smiled calmly.

“Where there was once a wound, new skin has grown.”

Daaemon listened to her words, nodding as he muttered dryly, “Yes, I was trash.”

“That’s not what I’m saying.” Liv frowned and scolded him, then suddenly added in a serious tone, “But you were… a bit like that.”

“Yes.”

Half-joking, Liv’s words were met with a serious agreement from Daemon, devoid of any humor.

“If your pain ever resurfaces, I’ll apologize as many times as it takes, like it’s the first time.”

Just constantly, whenever, as long as you need it.

“So you have to give me the chance to apologize for the rest of our lives.”

Hearing him practically force his lifelong apologies upon her, Liv looked a bit taken aback. But she soon shrugged, accepting the reality with a calm demeanor.

“I guess there’s no helping it. I’ll just have to let you—it’s like saving a life.”

“It’s a good thing you’re such a compassionate person.”

Finally, a faint smile appeared on Daemon’s face. At the same time, their intertwined fingers shifted, his large hand gently rubbing Liv’s slender wrist. His thumb pressed down on the vein inside her wrist, the touch deliberate.

But the atmosphere, which had started to grow heavy, was suddenly interrupted by an indifferent voice.

“If you’ve finished your emotional reunion, may I conduct my examination now?”

Thierry, who had been forgotten for some time, stood with her arms crossed, looking at Daaemon and Liv with a bored expression. Next to her, Philip chuckled awkwardly.

“Thank you for your hard work, Dr. Gertrude.”

“I only have to do this occasionally, but you, Philip, have to deal with this kind of environment every day. You deserve more sympathy than I do.”

“Haha.”

The two of them, as if their earlier argument had been a lie, encouraged each other. Liv, embarrassed by their teasing tone, averted her gaze. Only Daaemon seemed oblivious, staring at them arrogantly as if he didn’t understand what the problem was.

“Tsk, how clueless.”

“Marquis, you haven’t forgotten that she’s still a patient, right?”

At those words, Daaemon reluctantly stood up. But even then, he moved slowly, making it clear that he didn’t want to leave. Liv, blushing, hung her head low, and Philip sighed, mixing a chuckle into it.

It was a typical day at the Langess mansion.

 



 

After losing her memory, Liv had been staying in a separate room from Daemon, but now she had decided to return to sharing the bedroom with him.

Moving rooms within the mansion wasn’t a hassle—after all, she was just returning to her original bedroom. However, it was only right to let Corida, who had shared the room to care for her, know about the change.

“Sorry, Corida. You’ve taken such good care of me all this time… but he can’t sleep without me.”

Corida snorted at Liv’s excuse. “Really, it’s just too much. Too dramatic.”

“Thanks to you, I was able to recover quickly. Thank you.”

“Alright, alright. Just go move your stuff.”

There wasn’t much to move, but Liv still looked around the room. It had been her living space for a while, so she wanted to make sure she hadn’t forgotten anything.

“Will your arm heal before the wedding?”

“Yes, they say it’s healing quickly, so it should be fine.”

“That’s good to hear.”

“Exactly. It means we’ll have a fun story to tell for the rest of our lives.”

As Liv and Corida chatted, a large shadow suddenly appeared in the doorway. It was Daemon, unable to wait any longer and having followed them.

“What do I need to move?”

“There’s no need for help. I’m just changing where I sleep, so there’s nothing heavy to move.”

There really wasn’t anything to move. When Liv held out her empty hands to prove her point, Daaemon frowned, denying her words.

“There’s something important that needs to be moved.”

“What?”

“You.”

“Ugh!”

Corida let out an exaggerated groan upon hearing that, rubbing her arms dramatically.

“Wow, seriously. No one will ever believe this.”

Liv, looking embarrassed, cleared her throat as if to regain her composure.

“Ahem. Not in front of Corida… No, I’m not letting you carry me!”

“Why not?”

Daemon, who had been about to pick her up as if it were the most natural thing in the world, frowned at her words, tilting his head in genuine confusion.

Seeing his earnest expression, Liv said with an exasperated look, “Because my legs aren’t injured!”

“But I promised I’d personally escort you wherever you go.”

“That wasn’t a promise; it was a unilateral declaration. And even if it was, no one actually expects you to follow through, Daemon!”

Not wanting to continue their overly affectionate display in front of Corida, Liv hurriedly dashed out of the room. Daaemon looked displeased as he watched her run off.

“Tsk.”

Daaemon clicked his tongue and turned as if to follow her. But then, unexpectedly, he stopped and looked back at Corida. Corida, who had been trying to calm her churning stomach, noticed his gaze and looked at him curiously.

Corida had seen Daaemon without Liv a few times before. So, the sudden transformation—the cold, aloof expression—didn’t scare her. It was just that…

“As you can see, we’re very happy. So, it would be best to tear up that useless train ticket.”

With that command disguised as a suggestion, Daaemon left the bedroom.

Left behind in a daze, Corida finally snapped out of it and pouted in annoyance. Mumbling under her breath, she pulled out the train ticket she had hidden deep in a drawer and thought to herself:

It’s a relief I can finally tear this up, but still… my sister is waaay too good for him.

 
---

THE END. Now rollins1338, Go write how you feel about it in your repo.
